{"Clinitest tablets poisoning": {"Symptoms": ["Blood in urine", "Burns and burning pain in the mouth and throat", "Collapse", "Convulsions", "Diarrhea, may be watery or bloody", "Low blood pressure", "No urine output", "Pain during a bowel movement (passing stool)", "Severe abdominal pain", "Throat swelling (causes breathing trouble)", "Vomiting"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Chemosis": {"description": "Chemosis is swelling of the tissue that lines the eyelids and surface of the eye (conjunctiva).", "Causes": "Angioedema, Allergic reaction, Bacterial infection (conjunctivitis), Viral infection (conjunctivitis). "}, "Cuticle remover poisoning": {"Symptoms": ["Collapse", "Diarrhea", "Drooling", "Eye pain and redness if product touched the eyes", "Inability to breathe because the throat swells shut", "Rapid drop in blood pressure", "Severe abdominal pain", "Severe pain in the mouth", "Severe pain in the throat", "Vomiting"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Calcium - ionized": {"description": "This article discusses the test used to measure the amount of ionized calcium in blood."}, "CSF myelin basic protein": {"description": "MBP is found in the material that covers many of your nerves."}, "Ceruloplasmin": {"description": "Ceruloplasmin is a copper-containing protein. This article discusses the test to measure the level of this protein in the clear liquid part of the blood (serum)."}, "CSF analysis": {"description": "Cerebrospinal fluid (CSF) analysis is a group of laboratory tests that measure chemicals in the fluid that surrounds and protects the brain and spinal cord. The tests may look for proteins, sugar (glucose), and other substances."}, "Chest tube insertion": {"description": "A chest tube is a hollow, flexible tube placed into the chest. It acts as a drain."}, "Crutches and children - sitting and getting up from a chair": {"description": "\r\n\r\n \r\nSitting down in a chair and getting up again with crutches can be tricky until your child gets the hang of it. Help your child learn how to do this safely.\r\n"}, "CPR - adult": {"Symptoms": ["No breathing or difficulty breathing (gasping)", "No pulse", "Unconsciousness"], "Prevention": "To avoid injuries and heart problems that can lead to cardiac arrest:Eliminate or reduce risk factors that contribute to heart disease, such as cigarette smoking, high cholesterol, high blood pressure, obesity, and stress., Get plenty of exercise., See your doctor regularly., Always use seat belts and drive safely., Avoid using illegal drugs.. ", "description": "Permanent brain damage or death can occur within minutes if a person's blood flow stops. Therefore, you must continue these procedures until the person's heartbeat and breathing return, or trained medical help arrives.", "Causes": "In adults, major reasons that heartbeat and breathing stop include:Drug overdose\r\n , Excessive bleeding\r\n , Heart disease (heart attack or abnormal heart rhythm, fluid in the lungs or compressing the heart)\r\n , Infection in the bloodstream (sepsis)\r\n , Injuries and accidents, Near-drowning, Stroke. "}, "Cholestasis": {"description": "Cholestasis is any condition in which the flow of bile from the liver is slowed or blocked.", "Possible Complications": "Diarrhea, Organ failure can occur if sepsis develops, Poor absorption of fat and fat-soluble vitamins, Severe itching, Weak bones (osteomalacia) due to having cholestasis for a very long time. ", "Symptoms": ["Clay-colored or white stools", "Dark urine", "Inability to digest certain foods", "Itching", "Nausea or vomiting", "Pain in the right upper part of the abdomen ", "Yellow skin or eyes"], "Exams and Tests": "Blood tests may show that you have too much bilirubin and alkaline phosphatase.Imaging tests are used to diagnose this condition. Tests include:CT scan of the abdomen, MRI of the abdomen, Endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) (can also determine cause), Ultrasound of the abdomen. ", "Treatment": "The underlying cause of cholestasis must be treated.", "Prevention": "Get vaccinated for hepatitis A and B if you are at risk. Do not use intravenous drugs and share needles. ", "Causes": "There are many causes of cholestasis.Extrahepatic cholestasis occurs outside the liver. It can be caused by:\r\n  Bile duct tumors\r\n  , \r\n  Cysts\r\n  , \r\n  Narrowing of the bile duct (strictures)\r\n  , \r\n  Stones in the common bile duct\r\n  , \r\n  Pancreatitis\r\n  , \r\n  Pancreatic tumor or pseudocyst\r\n  , \r\n  Pressure on the bile ducts due to a nearby mass or tumor\r\n  , \r\n  Primary sclerosing cholangitis\r\n  . Intrahepatic cholestasis occurs inside the liver. It can be caused by:\r\n  Alcoholic liver disease\r\n  , \r\n  Amyloidosis\r\n  , \r\n  Bacterial abscess in the liver\r\n  , \r\n  Being fed exclusively through a vein (IV)\r\n  , \r\n  Lymphoma\r\n  , \r\n  Pregnancy\r\n  , Primary biliary cirrhosis, Primary sclerosing cholangitis, Sarcoidosis, \r\n  Serious infections that have spread through the bloodstream (sepsis)\r\n  , Tuberculosis, Viral hepatitis . Certain medicines can also cause cholestasis, including:Antibiotics such as ampicillin and other penicillins, Anabolic steroids, Birth control pills, Chlorpromazine, Cimetidine, Estradiol, Imipramine, Prochlorperazine, Terbinafine, Tolbutamide . "}, "Carotid artery surgery": {"description": "There are two invasive ways to treat a carotid artery that has plaque buildup in it. This article focuses on a surgery called endarterectomy. The other method is called\u00a0angioplasty with stent placement."}, "Capillary nail refill test": {"description": "The capillary nail refill test is a quick test\u00a0done on the nail beds.\u00a0It is used\u00a0to monitor dehydration and the amount of blood flow to tissue."}, "Congenital cytomegalovirus": {"description": "Congenital cytomegalovirus is a group of symptoms that occur when an infant is infected with the cytomegalovirus (CMV) before birth.", "Possible Complications": "Psychomotor retardation, Vision problems or blindness\u00a0\r\n, Deafness. ", "Symptoms": ["Inflammation of the retina", "Jaundice", "Large spleen and liver", "Low birth weight", "Mineral deposits in the brain", "Rash at birth (petechiae)", "Seizures", "Small head size (microcephaly)"], "Exams and Tests": "During the exam, the health care provider may find:Abnormal breath sounds indicating pneumonia, Enlarged liver, Enlarged spleen, Psychomotor retardation. Tests include:Antibody titer against CMV for both the mother and infant, Bilirubin level and blood tests for liver function, CBC, CT scan or ultrasound of the head, Fundoscopy, TORCH screen, Urine culture for CMV virus in the first 2 to 3 weeks of life, X-ray of the chest. ", "Treatment": "There is no specific treatment for congenital CMV. Treatments, such as physical therapy and appropriate education for children with psychomotor retardation, focus on specific problems.Treatment with antiviral medications, such as the drug ganciclovir, is often used for infants with neurologic symptoms. It may reduce hearing loss later in the child's life.", "Prevention": "Cytomegalovirus is almost everywhere in the environment. The U.S. Centers for Disease Control and Prevention (CDC) recommend the following steps to reduce the spread of CMV:Wash hands with soap and water after touching diapers or saliva., Avoid kissing children under the age of 6 on the mouth or cheek., Do not share food, drinks, or eating utensils with young children., Pregnant women working in a day care center should work with children older than age 2 1/2.. ", "Causes": "Congenital cytomegalovirus occurs when an infected mother passes CMV to the fetus through the placenta. The mother's illness may not have symptoms, so she may be unaware that she has CMV."}, "Cushing disease": {"description": "Cushing disease is a form of Cushing syndrome.", "Possible Complications": "Compression fractures, Diabetes, High blood pressure, Infections, Kidney stones, Mental illness. ", "Symptoms": ["Upper body obesity (above the waist) and thin arms and legs", "Round, red, full face (moon face)", "Slow growth rate in children ", "Acne or skin infections", "Purple marks (1/2 inch or more wide), called striae, on the skin of the abdomen, thighs, and breasts", "Thin skin with easy bruising, most commonly on the arms and hands", "Backache, which occurs with routine activities", "Bone pain or tenderness", "Collection of fat between the shoulders (buffalo hump)", "Thinning of the bones, which leads to rib and spine fractures", "Weak muscles ", "Excess hair growth on the face, neck, chest, abdomen, and thighs", "Menstrual cycle that becomes irregular or stops ", "Decreased or no desire for sex", "Impotence", "Mental changes, such as depression, anxiety, or changes in behavior", "Fatigue", "Headache", "Increased thirst and urination "], "Exams and Tests": "Tests are done to confirm there is too much cortisol in the body, then to determine the cause.These tests confirm too much cortisol:24-hour urine cortisol, Dexamethasone suppression test (low dose), Salivary cortisol levels (early morning and late at night). These tests determine cause:Blood ACTH level, Brain MRI, Corticotropin-releasing hormone test, which acts on the pituitary gland to cause the release of ACTH, Dexamethasone suppression test (high dose), Inferior petrosal sinus sampling (IPSS) - measures ACTH levels in the veins that drain the pituitary gland compared to the veins in the chest . Other tests that may be done include any of the following:Fasting blood glucose and hemoglobin A1c\u00a0to test for diabetes, Lipid and cholesterol testing, Bone mineral density scan\u00a0to check for osteoporosis . ", "Treatment": "Treatment involves surgery to remove the pituitary tumor, if possible. After surgery, the pituitary gland may slowly start to work again and return to normal.During the recovery process, you may need cortisol replacement treatments. Radiation treatment of the pituitary gland may also be used if the tumor is not completely removed.If the tumor does not respond to surgery or radiation, you may need medicines to stop your body from making cortisol.If these treatments are not successful, the adrenal glands may need to be removed to stop the high levels of cortisol from being produced.", "Causes": "Cushing disease is caused by a tumor or excess growth (hyperplasia) of the pituitary gland. The pituitary gland is located at the base of the brain. A type of pituitary tumor called an adenoma is the most common cause. An adenoma is almost always benign (not a cancer).With Cushing disease, the pituitary gland releases too much ACTH. ACTH stimulates production and release of cortisol, a stress hormone. Too much ACTH causes the adrenal glands to make too much cortisol.Cortisol is normally released during stressful situations. It controls the body's use of carbohydrates, fats, and proteins and also helps reduce the immune system's response to swelling (inflammation)."}, "Chills": {"description": "Chills refers to feeling cold after an exposure to a cold environment. The word can also refer to an episode of shivering\u00a0along with\u00a0paleness and feeling cold.", "Causes": "Exposure to a cold environment, Viral and bacterial infections \r\n\r\nBacterial gastroenteritis, Colds, Infectious mononucleosis, Influenza, Meningitis, Pneumonia, Strep throat, Viral gastroenteritis, Urinary tract infections such as pyelonephritis. . "}, "Choanal atresia": {"description": "Choanal atresia is a narrowing or blockage of the nasal airway by tissue. It is a congenital condition, meaning it is present at birth.", "Possible Complications": "Possible complications include:Aspiration while feeding and attempting to breathe through the mouth, Respiratory arrest, Renarrowing of the area after surgery. ", "Symptoms": ["Chest retracts unless the child is breathing through mouth or crying", "Difficulty breathing following birth, which may result in cyanosis (bluish discoloration), unless infant is crying", "Inability to nurse and breathe at same time", "Inability to pass a catheter through each side of the nose into the throat", "Persistent one-sided nasal blockage or discharge "], "Exams and Tests": "A physical examination may show an obstruction of the nose.Tests that may be done include:CT scan, Endoscopy of the nose, Sinus x-ray. ", "Treatment": "The immediate concern is to resuscitate the baby if necessary. An airway may need to be placed so that the infant can breathe. In some cases, intubation or tracheostomy may be needed.An infant can learn to mouth breathe, which can delay the need for immediate surgery.Surgery to remove the obstruction cures the problem. Surgery may be delayed if the infant can tolerate mouth breathing. The surgery may be done through the nose (transnasal) or through the mouth (transpalatal).", "Prevention": "There is no known prevention.", "Causes": "The cause of choanal atresia is unknown. It is thought to occur when the thin tissue separating the nose and mouth area during fetal development remains after birth.The condition is the most common nasal abnormality in newborn infants, affecting about 1 in 7,000 live births. Females get this condition about twice as often as males. More than half of affected infants also have other congenital problems.Choanal atresia is generally diagnosed shortly after birth while the infant is still in the hospital."}, "Curvature of the penis": {"Symptoms": ["A bend in the penis, which usually begins at the area where you feel the scar tissue or hardening", "Narrowing of the penis", "Pain", "Problems with penetration or pain during intercourse", "Shortening of the penis"], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider can diagnose curvature of the penis with a physical examination. The hard plaques can be felt with or without an erection.The health care provider may give you a shot of medicine to cause an erection. Or, you may provide your health care provider with pictures of the erect penis for evaluation.An ultrasound may show the scar tissue in the penis, but it is not necessary.", "description": "Curvature of the penis is an abnormal bend in the penis that occurs during erection. It is also called Peyronie's disease.", "Causes": "In Peyronie's disease, fibrous scar tissue develops under the skin of the penis. The cause of this fibrous tissue is not known.Fracture of the penis (injury during intercourse) can lead to this condition. Patients have a higher risk after surgery or radiation treatment for prostate cancer.Peyronie's disease is uncommon and affects men ages 40 - 60 and older.Curvature of the penis can occur with Dupuytren's contracture, a cord-like thickening across the palm of one or both hands. It is a fairly common disorder in white men over age 50. However, only a very small number of people with Dupuytren's contracture develop curvature of the penis.Other risk factors have not been found. However, people with this condition have a certain type of immune cell marker, which indicates that it may be inherited.Newborns may have a curvature of the penis, which may be part of an abnormality called hypospadias (this is different from Peyronie's disease).", "Treatment": "At first, you may not need treatment. Some or all of the symptoms may improve over time or may not get worse.Treatments may include:Corticosteroid injections into the fibrous band of tissue, Potaba (a medicine taken by mouth), Radiation therapy, Shock wave lithotripsy, Verapamil injection (a medicine used to treat high blood pressure), Vitamin E. However, these treatments often do not help much, or at all. They may cause more scarring. If medicine and lithotripsy do not help, and you are unable to have intercourse because of the curve of the penis, surgery may be done to correct the problem. However, some types of surgery may cause impotence. It should only be done if intercourse is impossible.A penile prosthesis may be the best treatment choice for curvature of the penis with impotence."}, "CMV - pneumonia": {"description": "See also:", "Possible Complications": "Complications of CMV infection in people with AIDS include spread of disease to other parts of the body:CMV pneumonia, Esophageal disease, Intestinal disease, Inflammation of the retina (CMV retinitis) . Complications of CMV pneumonia include:Kidney impairment (from drugs used to treat the condition), Low white blood cell count (from drugs used to treat the condition), Overwhelming infection that doesn't respond to treatment, Return of CMV infections . ", "Symptoms": ["Cough", "Fatigue", "Fever", "General discomfort, uneasiness, or ill feeling (malaise)", "Loss of appetite", "Muscle aches or joint pains", "Shortness of breath", "Shortness of breath on exertion", "Sweating, excessive (night sweats) "], "Exams and Tests": "The doctor or nurse will perform a physical exam. In addition, the following tests may be done:Arterial blood gas, Blood culture, Blood tests to detect and measure substances specific to CMV infection, Bronchoscopy with biopsy, Chest x-ray, CT scan of chest, Urine culture (clean catch), Sputum gram stain and culture. ", "Treatment": "The objective of treatment is to stop the virus from copying in the body through the use of antiviral drugs. Some people with CMV pneumonia will need to get medication through a vein (intravenously). Some people might initially need oxygen therapy and breathing support with a ventilator to maintain oxygen until the infection is brought under control.", "Prevention": "The following procedures have been shown to help prevent CMV pneumonia in certain patients:Using organ transplant donors who don't have CMV, Using CMV-negative blood products for transfusion, Using CMV-immune globulin in certain patients. Preventing AIDS avoids certain other diseases, including CMV, that can occur in people who have a weakened immune system. Certain people with AIDS who have a CD4 count of less than 50 cells/microliter should consider taking preventive treatment for CMV.", "Causes": "CMV pneumonia is caused by a member of a group of herpes-type viruses. Infection with CMV is very common. Most humans are exposed to CMV in their lifetime, but typically only individuals with weakened immune systems become ill from CMV infectionSerious CMV infections can occur in people with weakened immune systems from conditions such as:AIDS, Bone marrow transplant, Chemotherapy or other treatments that suppress the immune system, Organ transplant. In people who have had organ and bone marrow transplants, the risk of infection is greatest 5 - 13 weeks after the transplant."}, "Charcot-Marie-Tooth disease": {"description": "Charcot-Marie-Tooth disease is a group of disorders passed down through families that affect the nerves outside the brain and spine. These are called the peripheral nerves.", "Possible Complications": "Progressive inability to walk\r\n, Progressive weakness\r\n, Injury to areas of the body that have decreased sensation. ", "Symptoms": ["Foot deformity (very high arch to feet)", "Foot drop (inability to hold foot horizontal)", "Loss of lower leg muscle, which leads to skinny calves", "Numbness in the foot or leg", "\"Slapping\" gait (feet hit the floor hard when walking)", "Weakness of the hips, legs, or feet"], "Exams and Tests": "A physical exam may show:Difficulty lifting up the foot and making toe-out movements (foot drop), Lack of stretch reflexes in the legs, Loss of muscle control and atrophy (shrinking of the muscles) in the foot or leg, Thickened nerve bundles under the skin of the legs . A muscle biopsy or nerve biopsy may confirm the diagnosis. Nerve conduction tests are often done to tell the difference between different forms of the disorder.Genetic testing is available for most forms of the disease.", "Treatment": "There is no known cure. Orthopedic surgery or equipment (such as braces or orthopedic shoes) may make it easier to walk.Physical and occupational therapy may help maintain muscle strength and improve independent functioning.", "Prevention": "Genetic counseling and testing is advised if there is a strong family history of the disorder.", "Causes": "Charcot-Marie-Tooth is one of the most common nerve-related disorders passed down through families (inherited). Problems in at least 40 genes cause different forms of this disease.The disease leads to damage or destruction to the covering (myelin sheath) around nerve fibers."}, "Cocaine intoxication": {"Symptoms": ["Anxiety and agitation", "Chest pain or pressure", "Enlarged pupils", "Feeling of being \"high\" (euphoria),", "Increased heart rate and blood pressure"], "Exams and Tests": "\r\nBlood chemistries and liver function tests such as CHEM-20, Cardiac enzymes (to look for evidence of heart damage or heart attack), CBC (complete blood count, measures red and whilte blood cells, and platelets, which help blood to clot), Toxicology (poison) screening, EKG (heart tracing), Chest x-ray, Urinalysis. ", "description": "See also:", "Causes": "Cocaine intoxication may be caused by:Taking too much cocaine, or too concentrated a form of cocaine, Using cocaine on hot weather days, which leads to more harm and side effects because of dehydration, Using cocaine with certain other drugs, Severe intoxication and death can occur in \"drug mules\" or \"body packers\" who intentionally swallow packets of cocaine. ", "Treatment": "The health care provider will measure and monitor the patient's vital signs, including temperature, pulse, breathing rate, and blood pressure.Symptoms will be treated as appropriate. A class of medications called benzodiazepines are given to calm slow a rapid heart beat, and lower blood pressure, and treat anxiety and/or agitation. The medicines include diazepam and lorazepam. Fluids will be administered through a vein.\u00a0 Heart, brain, muscle and kidney complications will be treated with additional medications. \r\n Long-term treatment requires drug counseling in combination with medical therapy."}, "Choosing a primary care provider": {"description": "A primary care provider (PCP) is a health care practitioner who sees people that have common medical problems. This person is usually a doctor, but may be a physician assistant or a nurse practitioner. Your PCP is often involved in your care for a long time, so it is important to select someone with whom you will work well."}, "Conjunctivitis": {"description": "Conjunctivitis is swelling (inflammation) or infection of the conjunctiva. This is the membrane that lines the eyelids and covers the white part of the eye.", "Possible Complications": "The infection can come back if you do not take steps to prevent it from spreading.", "Symptoms": ["Blurred vision", "Crusts that form on the eyelid overnight", "Eye pain", "Gritty feeling in the eyes", "Increased tearing", "Itching of the eye", "Redness in the eyes", "Sensitivity to light"], "Exams and Tests": "Your health care provider will:Examine your eyes, Swab the conjunctiva to get a sample for analysis. ", "Treatment": "Treatment of conjunctivitis depends on the cause.Allergic conjunctivitis may improve when allergies are treated. It may go away on its own when you avoid your allergy triggers. Cool compresses may help soothe allergic conjunctivitis.Antibiotic medicines most often in the form of eye drops work well to treat bacterial conjunctivitis. Viral conjunctivitis will go away on its own. Mild steroid eye drops may help ease discomfort. Many doctors give mild antibiotic eye drops for pink eye to prevent bacterial conjunctivitis.You can soothe the discomfort of viral or bacterial conjunctivitis by applying warm compresses (clean cloths soaked in warm water) to your closed eyes.", "Prevention": "Good hygiene can help prevent the spread of conjunctivitis. Things you can do include:Change pillowcases often., Do not share eye makeup and replace it regularly., Do not share towels or handkerchiefs., Handle and clean contact lenses properly., Keep hands away from the eye., Wash your hands often.. ", "Causes": "The conjunctiva is exposed to bacteria and other irritants. Tears help protect the conjunctiva by washing away bacteria. Tears also contain proteins and antibodies that kill bacteria.Conjunctivitis is most often caused by a virus. Viral conjuctivitis is referred to as \"pink eye.\" Certain forms of pink eye can spread easily among children.Other causes include:Allergies (allergic conjunctivitis), Bacteria, Certain diseases, Chemical exposure, Chlamydia, Fungi, Parasites (rarely), Use of contact lenses (especially extended-wear lenses) . Newborns can be infected by bacteria in the birth canal. This condition is called ophthalmia neonatorum. It must be treated at once to preserve eyesight."}, "Carotid artery disease": {"description": "The carotid arteries provide the main blood supply to your brain. They are located on each side of your neck. You can feel their pulse under your jawline.", "Possible Complications": "Major complications of carotid artery disease are:Transient ischemic attack. This occurs when a blot clot briefly blocks a blood vessel to the brain. It causes the same symptoms as stroke. Symptoms last only a few minutes to an hour or two, but no longer than 24 hours. A TIA does not cause lasting damage. TIAs are a warning sign that a stroke may happen in the future if nothing is done to prevent it.Stroke. When the blood supply to the brain is partly or completely blocked, it causes a stroke. Most often, this happens when a blood clot blocks a blood vessel to the brain. A stroke can also occur when a blood vessel breaks open or leaks. Stokes can cause long-term brain damage or death. ", "Symptoms": ["Blurred vision", "Confusion", "Loss of memory", "Loss of sensation", "Problems with speech and language", "Vision loss", "Weakness in one part of your body"], "Exams and Tests": "Your health care provider will perform a physical exam. Your provider may use a stethoscope to listen to the blood flow in your neck for an unusual sound called a bruit. This sound may be a sign of carotid artery disease.Your provider also may find clots in the blood vessels of your eye. If you have had a stroke or TIA, a nervous system (neurological) exam will show other problems.You may also have the following tests:Blood cholesterol and triglycerides test, Blood sugar (glucose) test, Ultrasound of the carotid arteries (carotid duplex ultrasound) to see how well blood is flowing through the carotid artery . The following imaging tests may be used to examine the blood vessels in the neck and brain:Cerebral angiography, Computerized tomographic angiography, Magnetic resonance angiography. ", "Treatment": "Treatment options include:Blood-thinning medicines such as aspirin, clopidogrel (Plavix), and warfarin (Coumadin) to lower your risk of stroke, Medicine and diet changes to lower your cholesterol or blood pressure, No treatment, other than checking your carotid artery every year . You may have certain procedures to treat a narrowed or blocked carotid artery:Carotid endarterectomy. This surgery removes the plaque buildup in the carotid arteries., Carotid angioplasty and stenting.This procedure opens a blocked artery and places a tiny wire mesh (stent) in the artery to keep it open. . ", "Prevention": "Here's what you can do to help prevent carotid artery disease and stroke:Quit smoking., Follow a healthy, low-fat diet., Do not drink more than 1 to 2 alcoholic drinks a day., Exercise at least 30 minutes a day, most days of the week., Get your cholesterol checked every 5 years. If you are being treated for high cholesterol, you need to have it checked more often., Get your blood pressure checked every 1 to 2 years. If you have high blood pressure, heart disease, diabetes, or you have had a stroke, you need to have it checked more often. Ask your doctor., Follow your doctor's treatment recommendations if you have high blood pressure, diabetes, high cholesterol, or heart disease.. ", "Causes": "Carotid artery disease occurs when fatty material called plaque builds up inside the arteries. This buildup of plaque is called atherosclerosis (hardening of the arteries).The plaque may slowly block or narrow the carotid artery. Or it may cause a clot to form suddenly. A clot that completely blocks the artery can lead to stroke. Risk factors for blockage or narrowing of the arteries include:Smoking (people who smoke one pack a day double their risk of stroke)Diabetes, High blood pressure, High cholesterol, Increasing age, Family history of stroke, Alcohol abuse, Cocaine use . "}, "Central venous line - infants": {"description": "If the baby has any of these problems, the CVL may be taken out. Talk to your baby's doctor about the risks of a CVL."}, "Chloride - urine test": {"description": "The urine chloride test measures the amount of chloride in a certain volume of urine."}, "Cirrhosis - discharge": {"description": "While you were in the hospital, you may have had:"}, "Chest x-ray": {"description": "A chest x-ray is an x-ray of the chest, lungs, heart, large arteries, ribs, and diaphragm."}, "Cushing syndrome": {"description": "Cushing syndrome is a disorder that occurs when your body has a high level of the hormone cortisol. ", "Possible Complications": "Diabetes, Enlargement of pituitary tumor, Fractures due to osteoporosis, High blood pressure, Kidney stones, Serious infections. ", "Symptoms": ["Round, red, full face (moon face)", "Slow growth rate in children", "Weight gain with fat accumulation on the trunk, but fat loss from the arms, legs, and buttocks (central obesity) ", "Skin infections", "Purple marks (1/2 inch or more wide) called striae on the skin of the abdomen, thighs, and breasts", "Thin skin with easy bruising ", "Backache, which occurs with routine activities", "Bone pain or tenderness", "Collection of fat between the shoulders and above collar bone", "Rib and spine fractures caused by thinning of the bones", "Weak muscles, especially of the hips and shoulders ", "Excess hair growth on the face, neck, chest, abdomen, and thighs", "Periods that become irregular or stop ", "Decreased or no desire for sex", "Impotence", "Mental changes, such as depression, anxiety, or changes in behavior", "Fatigue", "Headache", "Increased thirst and urination "], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider will perform a physical exam and ask about your symptoms and the medicines you are taking. Tell the provider about all medicines you have been taking for the past several months.Laboratory tests that may be done to diagnose Cushing syndrome and identify the cause are:Blood cortisol levels, Blood sugar, Saliva cortisol levels, Dexamethasone suppression test, 24-hour urine for cortisol and creatinine, ACTH level, ACTH stimulation test. Tests to determine the cause or complications may include:Abdominal CT, ACTH, Pituitary MRI, Bone mineral density. ", "Treatment": "Treatment depends on the cause.Cushing syndrome caused by corticosteroid use:Your doctor will instruct you to slowly decrease the medicine dosage. Stopping the medicine suddenly can be dangerous., If you cannot stop taking the medicine because of disease, your high blood sugar, high cholesterol levels, and bone thinning or osteoporosis should be closely monitored. . With Cushing syndrome caused by a pituitary or a tumor that releases ACTH (Cushing disease), you may need:Surgery to remove the tumor., Radiation after removal of a pituitary tumor in some cases., Cortisol replacement therapy after surgery and possibly for the rest of your life. . With Cushing syndrome due to an adrenal tumor\u00a0or other tumors:You may need surgery to remove the tumor., If the tumor cannot be removed, you may need medicines to help block the release of cortisol. . ", "Prevention": "If you take a corticosteroid, know the signs and symptoms of Cushing syndrome. Getting treated early can help prevent any long-term effects of Cushing syndrome. If you use inhaled steroids, you can decrease your exposure to the steroids by using a spacer and by rinsing your mouth after breathing in the steroids.", "Causes": "The most common cause of Cushing syndrome is taking too much glucocorticosteroid medicine. Prednisone, dexamethasone, and prednisolone are examples of this type of medicine. Glucocorticoids mimic the action of the body\u2019s natural hormone cortisol. These drugs are used to treat conditions such as asthma, skin inflammation, cancer, bowel disease, joint pain, rheumatoid arthritis.Other people develop Cushing syndrome because their bodies produce too much cortisol. This hormone is made in the adrenal glands. Causes of too much cortisol are:Cushing disease, which occurs when the pituitary gland makes too much of the hormone ACTH. ACTH then signals the adrenal glands to produce too much cortisol. A pituitary gland tumor can cause this condition., Tumor of the adrenal gland, Tumor elsewhere in the body that produces corticotropin-releasing hormone, Tumors elsewhere in the body that produce ACTH (ectopic Cushing syndrome) . "}, "Cervicitis": {"description": "Cervicitis is swelling (inflammation) of the end of the uterus (cervix).", "Possible Complications": "Cervicitis may last for months to years. Cervicitis may lead to pain with intercourse (dyspareunia).", "Symptoms": ["Abnormal vaginal bleeding that occurs after intercourse, after menopause, or between periods", "Unusual vaginal discharge that does not go away: Discharge may be gray, white or yellow in color", "Painful sexual intercourse", "Pain in the vagina", "Pressure or heaviness in the pelvis"], "Exams and Tests": "A pelvic exam is done to look for:Discharge from the cervix, Redness of the cervix, Swelling (inflammation) of the walls of the vagina . Tests that may be done include:Inspection of the discharge under a microscope (may show candidiasis, trichomoniasis, or bacterial vaginosis), Pap smear, Tests for gonorrhea or chlamydia . Rarely, colposcopy and biopsy of the cervix is necessary.", "Treatment": "Antibiotics are used to treat bacterial infections (such as chlamydia, gonorrhea, and others). Drugs called antivirals may be used to treat herpes infections.Hormonal therapy (with estrogen or progesterone) may be used in women who have reached menopause.When these treatments have not worked or when cervicitis has been present for a long time, treatment may include:Cryosurgery (freezing), Electrocauterization, Laser therapy. ", "Prevention": "Things you can do to reduce your risk of cervicitis include:Avoid chemical irritants such as douches and deodorant tampons., Make sure that any foreign objects you insert into your vagina (such as tampons) are properly placed. Be sure to follow instructions on how long to leave it inside, how often to change it, or how often to clean it., Being in a monogamous sexual relationship with someone who is known to be free of any STI. Monogamous means you and your partner do not have sex with any other people. Not having sexual intercourse (abstinence) is the only absolute method of preventing sexually transmitted cervicitis., Using by using a condom every time you have sex to lower your risk of getting an STI. Condoms are available for both men and women, but are most commonly worn by the man. A condom must be used properly every time.. ", "Causes": "Cervicitis is most often caused by an infection that is caught during sexual activity. Sexually transmitted infections (STIs) that can cause cervicitis include:Chlamydia, Gonorrhea, Herpes virus (genital herpes), Human papilloma virus (genital warts), Trichomoniasis. Other things that can cause cervicitis include::A device inserted into the pelvic area such as a cervical cap, diaphragm, or pessary, Allergy to spermicides used for birth control , Allergy to latex in condoms, Exposure to a chemical. Cervicitis is very common. It affects more than half of all women at some point during their adult life. Risks include:High-risk sexual behavior, History of STIs, Many sexual partners, Sex (intercourse) at an early age, Sexual partners who have engaged in high-risk sexual behavior or have had an STI . Bacteria (such as staphylococcus and streptococcus) and too much growth of normal bacteria in the vagina (bacterial vaginosis) can also cause cervicitis."}, "Cavernous sinus thrombosis": {"Symptoms": ["Bulging eyeball, usually on one side of face", "Cannot move the eye in a particular direction", "Drooping eyelids", "Headaches", "Vision loss"], "Exams and Tests": "Tests that may be ordered include:CT scan of the head, Magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) of the brain, Magnetic resonance venogram, Sinus x-ray. ", "description": "Cavernous sinus thrombosis is a blood clot in an area at the base of the brain that contains a vein, which carries blood from the brain to the heart. This area is called the cavernous sinus. ", "Causes": "Cavernous sinus thrombosis is usually caused by a bacterial infection that has spread from the sinuses, teeth, ears, eyes, nose, or skin of the face. You are more likely to get this condition if you have an increased risk of blood clots.", "Treatment": "Cavernous sinus thrombosis is treated with high-dose antibiotics given through a vein (IV). Sometimes surgery is needed to drain the infection."}, "Colon cancer screening": {"description": "Screening for these groups is more likely to be done using colonoscopy."}, "Congenital spherocytic anemia": {"description": "Congenital spherocytic anemia is a disorder of the surface layer (membrane) of red blood cells. It leads to red blood cells that are shaped like spheres, and premature breakdown of red blood cells (hemolytic anemia).", "Possible Complications": "Gallstones, Much lower red blood cell production (aplastic crisis) caused by a viral infection, which can make anemia worse. ", "Symptoms": ["Fatigue", "Irritability", "Shortness of breath", "Weakness"], "Exams and Tests": "In most cases, the spleen is enlarged.Laboratory tests can help diagnose this condition. Tests may include:Blood smear to show abnormally shaped cells, Bilirubin level, Complete blood count to check for anemia, Coombs' test, LDH level, Osmotic fragility or specialized testing to evaluate for the red blood\u00a0cell defect, Reticulocyte count. ", "Treatment": "Surgery to remove the spleen (splenectomy) cures the anemia but doesn't correct the abnormal cell shape.Families with a history of spherocytosis should have their children screened for this disorder.Children should wait until age 5 to have splenectomy because of the infection risk. In mild cases discovered in adults, it may not be necessary to remove the spleen.Children and adults should be given a pneumococcal vaccine before spleen removal surgery. They also should receive folic acid supplements. Additional vaccines may be\u00a0needed based on the patient's history.", "Prevention": "This is an inherited disorder and may not be preventable. Being aware of your risk, such as a family history of the disorder, may help you get diagnosed and treated early.", "Causes": "This disorder is caused by a defective gene. The defect results in an abnormal red blood cell membrane. The affected cells have a smaller surface area for their volume than normal red blood cells, and can break open easily. Having a family history of spherocytosis increases the risk for this disorder.The anemia can vary from mild to severe. In severe cases the disorder may be found in early childhood. In mild cases it may go unnoticed until adulthood.This disorder is most common in people of northern European descent, but it has been found in all races."}, "Clubfoot": {"description": "Clubfoot is when the foot turns inward and downward. It is a congenital condition, which means it is present at birth.", "Possible Complications": "Some defects may not be completely fixed. However, treatment can improve the appearance and function of the foot. Treatment may be less successful if the clubfoot is linked to other birth disorders.", "Symptoms": [], "Exams and Tests": "The disorder is identified during a physical examination. A foot x-ray may be done.", "Treatment": "Treatment may involve moving the foot into the correct position and using a cast to keep it there. This is often done by an orthopedic specialist. Treatment should be started as early as possible -- ideally, shortly after birth -- when it is easiest to\u00a0reshape the foot.Gentle stretching and recasting\u00a0will be done\u00a0every week to improve the position of the foot. Generally, five to 10 casts are needed. The final cast\u00a0will stay\u00a0in place for 3 weeks. After the foot is in the correct position, the child will wear a special brace nearly full time for 3 months. Then, the child will wear the brace at night and during naps for up to 3 years.Often, the problem is a tightened Achilles tendon, and a simple procedure is needed to release it.Some severe cases of clubfoot will\u00a0need surgery if other treatments do not work, or if the problem returns. The child should be monitored by a\u00a0health care provider\u00a0until the foot is fully grown. See: Clubfoot repair", "Causes": "Clubfoot is the most common congenital disorder of the legs. It can range from mild and flexible to severe and rigid.The cause is not known, but the condition may be passed down through families in some cases. Risk factors include a family history of the disorder and being male. The condition occurs in about 1 out of every 1,000 live births."}, "COPD - how to use a nebulizer": {"description": "Nebulizers can deliver medicine with less effort than inhalers. You and your doctor can decide if a nebulizer is the best way to get the medicine you need. The choice of device may be based on whether you find a nebulizer easier to use and what type of medicine you take."}, "Crying in infancy": {"description": "Infants have a cry reflex that is a normal response to stimuli, such as pain or hunger. Premature infants may not have a cry reflex. Therefore they must be monitored closely for signs of hunger and pain."}, "Carbuncle": {"description": "When there is more than one carbuncle, the condition is called carbunculosis.", "Possible Complications": "Abscess of the brain, skin, spinal cord, or organs such as the kidneys, Endocarditis, Osteomyelitis, Permanent scarring of the skin, Sepsis, Spread of infection to other areas. ", "Symptoms": ["Grow very fast", "Have a white or yellow center (contain pus)", "Weep, ooze, or crust", "Spread to other skin areas", "Fatigue", "Fever", "General discomfort or sick feeling", "Skin itching before the carbuncle develops"], "Exams and Tests": "Your doctor will look at your skin. The diagnosis is based on what the skin looks like. A sample of the pus may sent to a lab to determine the bacteria causing the infection (bacterial culture).\u00a0The test result helps your doctor determine the appropriate treatment.", "Treatment": "Carbuncles usually must drain before they will heal. This most often occurs on its own in less than 2 weeks.Placing a warm moist cloth on the carbuncle helps it to drain, which speeds healing.\u00a0Apply a clean, warm\u00a0moist cloth several times each day. Never squeeze a boil or\u00a0try to cut it open at home, because this can spread the infection and make it worse.You\u00a0need to seek treatment if the carbuncle lasts longer than 2 weeks, returns frequently, is located on the spine or the middle of the face, or occurs along with a fever or other symptoms. Treatment helps reduce complications related to an infection.Your doctor may prescribe:Antibacterial soaps, Antibiotics applied to the skin or taken by mouth. Deep or large lesions may need to be drained by a health care provider.Proper hygiene is very important to prevent the spread of infection. Wash your hands\u00a0thoroughly with soap and warm water \u00a0after touching a carbuncle. , Do not re-use or share washcloths or towels. This can cause the infection to spread. , Clothing, washcloths, towels, and sheets or other items that contact infected areas should be washed in very hot (preferably boiling) water. , Bandages should be changed often and thrown away in a bag that can be tightly closed.. ", "Prevention": "Good general health and hygiene may help prevent some staph skin infections. Such infections are contagious, so care must be taken to avoid spreading the bacteria to other people.If you get carbuncles often, your doctor may give you antibiotics to prevent them.", "Causes": "Most carbuncles are caused by the bacteria staphylococcus aureus. The infection is contagious. This means it\u00a0can\u00a0spread to other areas of the body or other people.A carbuncle is made up of several skin boils (furuncles). The infected mass is filled with fluid, pus, and dead tissue. Fluid may drain out of the carbuncle, but sometimes the mass is so deep that it cannot drain on its own.Carbuncles\u00a0can develop anywhere. But they are most common on the back and the nape of the neck. Men get carbuncles more often than women.Because the\u00a0 bacteria that causes the condition is contagious, family members may develop carbuncles at the same time. Often, the cause of a carbuncle cannot be determined.You are more likely to get a carbuncle if you have:Friction from clothing or shaving, Poor hygiene, Poor overall health. Persons with diabetes, dermatitis, and weakened immune systems are more likely to develop staph infections that can cause carbuncles."}, "Cytomegalovirus retinitis ": {"description": "Cytomegalovirus (CMV) retinitis is a viral inflammation of the retina of the eye.", "Possible Complications": "Blindness, Kidney impairment (from drugs used to treat the condition), Low white blood cell count (from drugs used to treat the condition), Retinal detachment. ", "Symptoms": ["Blind spots", "Blurred vision and other vision problems", "Floaters"], "Exams and Tests": "CMV retinitis is diagnosed through a standard ophthalmologic exam. Dilation of the pupils and ophthalmoscopy will show signs of CMV retinitis.CMV infection can be diagnosed with blood or urine tests that look for substances specific to the infection. A tissue biopsy can detect the viral infection and presence of CMV virus particles, but this is rarely done.", "Treatment": "The goal of treatment is to stabilize or restore vision and prevent blindness. Long-term treatment is often needed. Medications may be given by mouth (orally), through a vein (intravenously), or injected directly into the eye (intraviteously).", "Prevention": "A CMV infection usually only causes symptoms in people with a weakened immune system. Certain medicines (like cancer therapy) and diseases (such as AIDS) can cause a weakened immune system. People with AIDS who have a CD4 count of less than 250 cells/microliter should be examined regularly for this condition, even if they do not have symptoms. If you had CMV retinitis in the past, you should take preventive treatment for this condition, even if your CD4 count stays below 100. If your CD4 count has been greater than 100 for 6 months, your doctor may say you can safely stop the preventive treatment. ", "Causes": "CMV retinitis is caused by a member of a group of herpes-type viruses. CMV is very common. Most people are exposed to CMV in their lifetime, but typically only those with weakened immune systems become ill from CMV infection. Serious CMV infections can occur in people who have weakened immune systems as\u00a0a result of:AIDS, Bone marrow transplant, Chemotherapy, Drugs that suppress the immune system, Organ transplant. "}, "Choosing effective patient education materials": {"description": "The first step is to assess the patient\u2019s current knowledge about his or her condition. Some patients need time to adjust to new information, master new skills, or make short- or long-term lifestyle changes."}, "Calcification": {"description": "Calcification is a process in which calcium builds up in body tissue, causing the tissue to harden. This can be a normal or abnormal process."}, "Creatinine - urine": {"description": "Creatinine is a breakdown product of creatine, which is an important part of muscle. Creatinine is removed from the body entirely by the kidneys. Creatinine can also be measured by a blood test."}, "Cyproheptadine overdose": {"Symptoms": ["Inability to urinate ", "Blurred vision", "Dry mouth", "Enlarged pupils", "Severely dry eyes", "Ringing in the ears ", "Low blood pressure", "Rapid heartbeat", "Agitation", "Confusion", "Convulsions (seizures)", "Delirium", "Depression", "Drowsiness", "Hallucinations", "Increased sleepiness", "Nervousness", "Seizures", "Tremor", "Unsteadiness"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Common cold": {"description": "The common cold usually causes a runny nose, nasal congestion, and sneezing. You may also have a sore throat, cough, headache, or other symptoms.", "Possible Complications": "Colds are the most common trigger of wheezing in children with asthma.A cold may also lead to:Bronchitis, Ear infection, Pneumonia, Sinusitis. ", "Symptoms": ["Nasal congestion", "Runny nose", "Scratchy throat", "Sneezing", "Cough", "Decreased appetite", "Headache", "Muscle aches", "Postnasal drip", "Sore throat "], "Causes": "It is called the \u201ccommon cold\u201d for good reason. There are over one billion colds in the United States each year. You and your children will probably have more colds than any other type of illness.Colds are the most common reason that children miss school and parents miss work. Parents often get colds from their children.Children can get many colds every year. They usually get them from other children. A cold can spread quickly through schools or daycares.Colds can occur at any time of the year, but they are most common in the winter or rainy seasons.A cold virus spreads through tiny, air droplets that are released when the sick person sneezes, coughs, or blows their nose.You can catch a cold if:A person with a cold sneezes, coughs, or blows their nose near you, You touch your nose, eyes, or mouth after you have touched something contaminated by the virus, such as a toy or doorknob. . People are most contagious for the first 2 to 3 days of a cold. A cold is usually not contagious after the first week.", "Prevention": "To lower your chances of getting sick:\r\nAlways wash your hands. Children and adults should wash hands after nose-wiping, diapering, and using the bathroom, and before eating and preparing food.\r\n , Disinfect your environment. Clean commonly touched surfaces (such as sink handles, door knobs, and sleeping mats) with an EPA-approved disinfectant.\r\n , Choose smaller daycare classes for your children.\r\n , Use instant hand sanitizers to stop the spread of germs.\r\n , Use paper towels instead of sharing cloth towels.\r\n . The immune system helps your body fight off infection. Here are ways to support the immune system:\r\nAvoid secondhand smoke. It is responsible for many health problems, including colds.\r\n , Do not use antibiotics if they are not needed.\r\n , Breastfeed infants if possible. Breast milk is known to protect against respiratory tract infections in children, even years after you stop breastfeeding.\r\n , Drink plenty of fluids to help your immune system work properly.\r\n , Eat yogurt that contains \"active cultures.\" These may help prevent colds. Probiotics may help prevent colds in children.\r\n , Get enough sleep.\r\n . ", "Treatment": "\r\nMost colds go away in a few days. Some things you can do to\r\ntake care of yourself with a cold include:\r\nGet plenty of rest and drink fluids.\r\n , Over-the-counter cold and cough medicines may help ease symptoms in adults and older children. They do not make your cold go away faster, but can help you feel better. Over-the-counter (OTC) cough and cold medicines are not recommended for children under age 4.\r\n , Antibiotics should not be used to treat a common cold.\r\n , Many alternative treatments have been tried for colds, such as vitamin C, zinc supplements, and echinacea. Talk to your doctor before trying any herbs or supplements.\r\n . "}, "Child abuse - physical": {"Symptoms": ["Sudden change in behavior or school performance", "Alertness, watching for something bad to happen", "Acting out behavior", "Leaving home early, going home late, and not wanting to go home", "Fear when approached by adults", "Black eyes ", "Broken bones that cannot be explained. For example, infants who do not crawl or walk usually do not\u00a0have broken bones.", "Bruise marks shaped like hands, fingers, or objects (such as a belt)", "Bruises that cannot be explained by usual child activities", "Bulging fontanelle (soft spot) or separated sutures in an infant's skull", "Burn marks,\u00a0such as\u00a0cigarette burns", "Choke marks around the neck", "Circular marks around the wrists or ankles from twisting or being tied up", "Human bite marks", "Lash marks", "Unexplained unconsciousness in an infant", "Cannot explain or gives strange explanations for a child's injuries", "Talks about the child in a negative way", "Uses harsh discipline", "Was abused as a child", "Alcohol or drug problems", "Emotional problems or mental illness", "High stress", "Does not look after the child's hygiene or care", "Does not seem to love or have concern for the child"], "description": "Physical child abuse is when a person physically hurts a child. The abuse is not an accident. Here are some examples of physical child abuse:", "Treatment": "GETTING HELP FOR THE CHILD AND FAMILYThe child may need medical treatment and counseling. Abused children can be seriously hurt. Children may also have emotional problems.Counseling and support groups are available for children and for abusive parents who want to get help.There are state and other government departments or agencies that are responsible for the protection of children younger than age 18. Child protection agencies usually make a decision whether the child should go into foster care or can return home. Child protection agencies generally make every effort to reunite families when possible. The system varies from state to state, but usually involves a family court or a court that handles child abuse cases."}, "Cutaneous skin tag": {"Symptoms": ["Neck", "Underarms", "Middle of the body, or under folds of skin", "Eyelids", "Other body areas "], "Exams and Tests": "Your doctor can diagnose this condition by looking at your skin. Sometimes a skin biopsy is done. ", "description": "A cutaneous skin tag is a common skin growth. Most of the time, it is harmless (benign). ", "Causes": "A cutaneous tag usually occurs in older adults. They are more common in people who are overweight or who have diabetes. They are thought to occur from skin rubbing against skin.", "Treatment": "Treatment is often not needed. Your doctor may recommend treatment if the skin tag is irritating, or you don't like how it looks. Treatment may include: Surgery to remove it, Freezing it (cryotherapy), Burning it off\u00a0(cauterization) . "}, "Cosmetic ear surgery": {"description": "Cosmetic ear surgery is a procedure to move very large or prominent ears closer to the head."}, "Cellulite": {"description": "Cellulite is fat that collects in pockets just\u00a0below the\u00a0surface of the skin. It\u00a0forms around the hips, thighs, and buttocks. Cellulite deposits cause the skin to look dimpled."}, "Central venous catheter - dressing change": {"description": "See also: Central venous catheter - flushing"}, "Cow's milk and children": {"description": "Teens and adults also need plenty of dairy per day. A daily serving may include:"}, "CBC": {"description": "The platelet count is also usually included in the CBC.\u00a0\r\n \r\n \r\n"}, "Chlamydial infections - male": {"description": "Chlamydia infection in males is an infection of the urethra (the tube that drains urine from the bladder and passes through the penis). This type of chlamydia infection is passed from one person to another during sexual contact.", "Symptoms": ["Difficulty urinating, which includes painful urination or a burning sensation during urination", "Discharge from the penis", "Redness, swelling, or itching of the opening of the urethra at the tip of the penis", "Swelling and tenderness of the testicles "], "Exams and Tests": "If you have symptoms of a chlamydia infection, the health care provider may take a sample of discharge from the penis and send it to a lab to be tested, or have the lab do a test called PCR. Results will take 1 to 2 days to come back.Your health care provider may also check you for other types of infections, such as gonorrhea.Men who do not have symptoms of a chlamydia infection are usually not tested.", "Causes": "Chlamydia infection\u00a0is caused by the bacteria Chlamydia trachomatis. Both males and females\u00a0may have chlamydia without having any symptoms. As a result, you may become infected or pass the infection to your partner without knowing it.You are more likely to become infected with chlamydia if you:Have sex without wearing a male or female condom, Have more than one sexual partner, Use drugs or alcohol and then have sex . ", "Prevention": "Practicing safe sex means taking steps before and during sex that can prevent you from getting an infection, or from giving one to your partner.Before having sex:Get to know your partner and discuss your sexual histories., Don't feel forced into having sex., Don't have sexual contact with anyone but your partner. . Your sexual partner should be someone who you know does not have any sexually transmitted infection (STI). Before having sex with a new partner, each of you should get screened for STIs and share the test results with each other.If you have an STI such as HIV or herpes, let any sexual partner know before you have sex. Allow him or her to decide what to do. If you both agree to have sexual contact, use latex or polyurethane condoms.Use condoms for all vaginal, anal, and oral intercourse.The condom should be in place from the beginning to the end of the sexual activity. Use it every time you have sex., Keep in mind that STIs can be spread by contact with surrounding skin areas. A condom reduces your risk. . Other tips include:Use lubricants. They may help reduce the chance that a condom will break., Use only water-based lubricants. Oil-based or petroleum-type lubricants can cause latex to weaken and tear., Polyurethane condoms are less prone to breaking than latex condoms, but they cost more., Using condoms with nonoxynol-9 (a spermicide) may increase the chance of HIV transmission. . Stay sober. Alcohol and drugs impair your judgment. When you are not sober, you might not choose your partner as carefully. You may also forget to use condoms, or use them incorrectly.", "Treatment": "Chlamydia can be treated with a variety of antibiotics.Common side effects of these antibiotics include nausea, upset stomach, and diarrhea., You and your partner should finish all of the antibiotics, even if you feel better. . You and your sexual partner must be treated to avoid passing the infections back and forth. Even partners without symptoms need to be treated."}, "Common symptoms during pregnancy": {"description": "Even so, many pregnant women say that they feel healthier than ever before.\r\n"}, "Chronic pancreatitis": {"description": "Chronic pancreatitis is inflammation of the pancreas that does not heal or improve, gets worse over time, and leads to permanent damage.", "Possible Complications": "Complications may include:Ascites, Blockage (obstruction) of the small intestine or bile ducts, Blood clot in the vein of the spleen, Fluid collections in the pancreas (pancreatic pseudocysts) that may become infected, Poor function of the pancreas, including diabetes, fat or other nutrient malabsorption,\u00a0and vitamin malabsorption (most often the fat-soluble vitamins, A, D, E, or K)\r\n . ", "Symptoms": ["Greatest in the upper abdomen", "May last from hours to days", "Eventually may be continuous", "May get worse from eating or drinking", "May get worse from drinking alcohol", "May also be felt in the back ", "Chronic weight loss, even when eating habits and amounts are normal", "Diarrhea, nausea, and vomiting", "Fatty or oily stools", "Pale or clay-colored stools"], "Exams and Tests": "Tests for pancreatitis include:Fecal fat test, Serum amylase, Serum IgG4 (for diagnosing autoimmune pancreatitis), Serum lipase, Serum trypsinogen. Inflammation or calcium deposits of the pancreas, or changes to the ducts of the pancreas may be seen on:Abdominal CT scan, Abdominal ultrasound, Endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP), Endoscopic ultrasound (EUS), Magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography (MRCP). An exploratory laparotomy may be done to confirm the diagnosis, but this is usually done for acute pancreatitis.", "Treatment": "People with severe pain or who are losing weight may need to stay in the hospital for:Pain medicines, Fluids given through a vein (IV), Stopping food or fluid by mouth to limit the activity of the pancreas, and then slowly starting an oral diet, Inserting a tube through the nose or mouth to remove the contents of the stomach (nasogastric suctioning) may sometimes be done. The tube may stay in for 1 - 2 days, or sometimes for 1 - 2 weeks. . The right diet is important for people with chronic pancreatitis to keep a healthy weight and get the correct nutrients. A nutritionist can help you create a diet that includes:Drinking plenty of liquids, Limiting fats , Eating small, frequent meals (this helps reduce digestive symptoms), Getting enough vitamins and calcium in the diet, or as extra supplements, Limiting caffeine. The doctor may prescribe pancreatic enzymes. You must take these medicines with every meal. The enzymes will help you digest food better and gain weight.Avoid smoking and drinking alcoholic beverages, even if your pancreatitis is mild.Other treatments may involve:Pain medicines or a surgical nerve block to relieve pain, Taking insulin to control blood sugar (glucose) levels . Surgery may be recommended if a blockage is found. In severe cases, part or all of the pancreas may be removed.", "Prevention": "Determining the cause of acute pancreatitis and treating it quickly may help prevent chronic pancreatitis. Limiting the amount of alcohol you drink can reduce your risk of getting this condition. ", "Causes": "The pancreas is an organ located behind the stomach that produces chemicals (called enzymes) needed to digest food. It also produces the hormones insulin and glucagon.When inflammation and scarring of the pancreas occur, the organ is no longer able to make the right amount of these enzymes. As a result, your body may be unable to digest fat and key elements of food.Damage to the parts of the pancreas that make insulin may lead to diabetes.The condition is most often caused by alcohol abuse over many years. Repeated episodes of acute pancreatitis can lead to chronic pancreatitis. Genetics may be a factor in some cases. Sometimes, the cause is not known.Other conditions that have been linked to chronic pancreatitis:Autoimmune problems (when the immune system attacks the body), Blockage of the pancreatic duct or the common bile duct, the tubes that drain enzymes from the pancreas, Complications of cystic fibrosis, High levels of a fat, called triglycerides, in the blood (hypertriglyceridemia), Hyperparathyroidism, Use of certain medications (especially sulfonamides, thiazides, and azathioprine). Chronic pancreatitis occurs more often in men than in women. The condition often develops in people ages 30 - 40."}, "Coombs test": {"description": "The Coombs test looks for antibodies that may stick to your red blood cells and cause red blood cells to die too early. "}, "Chinese restaurant syndrome": {"Symptoms": ["Chest pain", "Flushing", "Headache", "Numbness or burning in or around the mouth", "Sense of facial pressure or swelling", "Sweating "], "Exams and Tests": "Chinese restaurant syndrome is most often diagnosed based on the symptoms. The health care provider may ask the following questions as well:Have you eaten Chinese food within the past 2 hours?, Have you eaten any other food that may contain monosodium glutamate within the past 2 hours? . The following signs may also be used to aid in diagnosis:Abnormal heart rhythm observed on an electrocardiogram, Decreased air entry into the lungs, Rapid heart rate. ", "description": "Chinese restaurant syndrome is a set of symptoms that some people have after eating Chinese food. A food additive called monosodium glutamate (MSG) has been blamed for the condition. However, this has not been proven to be the cause. ", "Causes": "Reports of serious reactions to Chinese food first appeared in 1968. At that time, MSG was thought to be the cause of these symptoms. There have been many studies since then that have failed to show a connection between MSG and the symptoms some people describe.For this reason, MSG continues to be used in some meals. However, it is possible that some people are particularly sensitive to food additives. MSG is chemically similar to one of the brain's most important chemicals, glutamate.", "Treatment": "Treatment depends on the symptoms. Most mild symptoms, such as headache or flushing, need no treatment.Life-threatening symptoms require immediate medical attention. They may be similar to other severe allergic reactions and include:Chest pain, Heart palpitations, Shortness of breath, Swelling of the throat . "}, "Concussion - child - discharge": {"description": "Your child was treated for a concussion. This is\u00a0a mild brain injury that can result when the head hits an object or a moving object strikes the head. It can affect how your child\u2019s brain works for a while. It may also have made your child lose consciousness for a short time. Your child may have a bad headache."}, "Choking - infant under 1 year": {"Symptoms": ["Bluish skin color", "Difficulty breathing - ribs and chest pull inward", "Loss of consciousness if blockage is not cleared", "Inability to cry or make much sound", "Weak, ineffective coughing", "Soft or high-pitched sounds while inhaling"], "Prevention": "Don't give children under 3 years old balloons or toys with fragile or small parts.\r\n, Keep infants away from buttons, popcorn, coins, grapes, nuts, or similar items.\r\n, Watch infants and toddlers while they are eating. Do not allow a child to crawl around while eating. Childproof your home.\r\n, The earliest safety lesson is \"No!\". ", "description": "This article discusses choking in infants.", "Causes": "Choking in infants is usually caused by breathing in a small object that the baby has placed in their mouth, such as a button, coin, balloon, toy part, or watch battery."}, "Choroidal dystrophies": {"Exams and Tests": "The following tests may be needed to diagnose the condition:Electroretinography, Fluorescein angiography, Genetic testing. ", "description": "The first symptoms are peripheral vision loss and vision loss at night. An eye surgeon who specializes in the back of the eye (retina specialist) can diagnose this disorder. "}, "Cytologic evaluation": {"description": "The Pap smear is a common cytologic evaluation that looks at cells from the cervix. Some other examples include:"}, "Cancer - renal pelvis or ureter": {"description": "Cancer of the renal pelvis or ureter is cancer that forms in the kidney's pelvis or the tube that carries urine from the kidney to the bladder (ureter).", "Possible Complications": "Kidney failure, Local spread of the tumor with increasing pain, Spread of the cancer. ", "Symptoms": ["Back pain, most often where ribs and spine meet", "Bloody urine", "Burning, pain, or discomfort with urination", "Dark, rust-colored, or brown urine", "Fatigue", "Flank pain", "Unintentional weight loss", "Urinary frequency or urgency"], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider will perform a physical exam, and examine your belly area (abdomen). In rare cases, this may reveal an enlarged kidney.If tests are done:Urinalysis may show blood in the urine., A complete blood count (CBC) may show anemia., Urine cytology (microscopic examination of cells) taken during a cystoscopy or urine clean catch sample may reveal cancer cells. . Other tests that may be ordered include:Abdominal CT scan, Chest x-ray, Cystoscopy with ureteroscopy, Intravenous pyelogram (IVP), Kidney ultrasound, MRI of abdomen, Renal scan. These tests may reveal a tumor or show that the cancer has spread from the kidneys.", "Treatment": "The goal of treatment is to eliminate the cancer.Surgery to remove all or part of the kidney (nephrectomy) is usually recommended. This may include removing part of the bladder and tissues around it, or the lymph nodes. If the tumor is in the ureter, it may be possible to remove it while preserving the kidney.When the cancer has spread outside of the kidney or ureter, chemotherapy is often used. Because these tumors are similar to a form of bladder cancer, they are treated with a similar type of chemotherapy.", "Prevention": "Follow your health care provider's advice regarding medications, including over-the-counter pain medicine., Stop smoking., Wear protective equipment if you may be exposed to substances that are toxic to the kidneys.. ", "Causes": "Cancer can grow in the urine collection system, but it\u00a0is uncommon. Renal pelvis and ureter cancers affect men more often than women and are more common in people older than 65.The causes of this cancer are not completely known. Long-term (chronic) irritation of the kidney from harmful substances removed in the urine may be a factor. This irritation may be caused by:Kidney damage due to overexposure to medicines, especially ones for pain (analgesic nephropathy), Exposure to certain dyes and chemicals used to manufacture leather goods, textiles, plastics, and rubber, Smoking . Patients with a history of bladder cancer are also at risk."}, "Cervical cancer": {"description": "Cervical cancer is cancer that starts in the cervix. The cervix is\u00a0the lower part of the uterus (womb) that opens at the top of the vagina.", "Possible Complications": "Women who have treatment to save the uterus have a high risk of the cancer coming back.\u00a0 , Surgery and radiation can cause problems with\u00a0sexual, bowel, and bladder\u00a0function. . ", "Symptoms": ["Abnormal vaginal bleeding between periods, after intercourse, or after menopause", "Vaginal discharge that does not stop,\u00a0and may be pale, watery, pink, brown, bloody, or foul-smelling", "Periods that\u00a0become heavier and last longer than usual ", "Back pain", "Bone pain or fractures", "Fatigue", "Leaking of urine or feces from the vagina", "Leg pain", "Loss of appetite", "Pelvic pain", "Single swollen leg", "Weight loss "], "Exams and Tests": "Precancerous changes of the cervix and cervical cancer cannot be seen with the naked eye. Special tests and tools are needed to spot such conditions:A Pap smear screens for precancers and cancer, but does not help\u00a0make a final diagnosis., If abnormal changes are found, the cervix is usually examined under magnification. This procedure\u00a0is called colposcopy. Pieces of tissue are removed (biopsied) during this procedure. The tissue is sent to a lab for examination.\u00a0, A procedure called cone biopsy may also be done.. If cervical cancer is diagnosed, the health care provider will order more tests.\u00a0These help\u00a0determine how far the cancer has spread. This is called staging. Tests may include:Chest x-ray, CT scan of the pelvis, Cystoscopy, Intravenous pyelogram (IVP), MRI of the pelvis. ", "Treatment": "Treatment of cervical cancer depends on:The stage of the cancer, The size and shape of the tumor, The woman's age and general health, Her desire to have children in the future. Early cervical cancer can be cured by removing or destroying the precancerous or cancerous tissue. There are surgical ways to do this without removing the uterus or damaging the cervix, so that a woman can still have children in the future.Types of surgery for early cervical cancer include:Loop electrosurgical excision procedure (LEEP) -- uses electricity to remove abnormal tissue, Cryotherapy -- freezes abnormal cells, Laser therapy -- uses light to burn abnormal tissue . A hysterectomy (surgery to remove\u00a0the uterus but not the ovaries) is not often\u00a0done for cervical cancer that has not spread. It may be done in women who have repeated LEEP procedures.Treatment for more advanced cervical cancer may include:Radical hysterectomy, which removes the uterus and much of the surrounding tissues, including lymph nodes and the upper part of the vagina., Pelvic exenteration, an extreme type of surgery in which all of the organs of the pelvis, including the bladder and rectum, are removed. . Radiation may be used to treat cancer that has spread beyond the cervix or cancer that has returned.Chemotherapy uses drugs to kill cancer. It may be given alone or with surgery or radiation.", "Prevention": "Cervical cancer can be prevented by doing the following:Get the HPV vaccine. The vaccine prevents against most types of HPV infection that cause cervical cancer. Your health care provider can tell you if the vaccine is right for you., Practice safer sex. Using condoms during sex reduces the risk of HPV and other sexually transmitted infections (STIs)., Limit the number of sexual partners you have. Avoid partners who are active in high-risk sex., Get regular Pap smears as often as your health care provider recommends. Pap smears can help detect early changes, which can be treated before they turn into cervical cancer., If you smoke, quit. Smoking increases your chance of getting cervical cancer.. ", "Causes": "Worldwide, cervical cancer is the third most common type of cancer in women. It is much less common in the United States because of the routine use of Pap smears.Cervical cancer starts in the cells on the surface of the cervix. There are two types of cells on the surface of the cervix, squamous and columnar. Most cervical cancers are from squamous cells.Cervical cancer usually develops slowly. It starts as a precancerous condition called dysplasia. This condition can be detected by a Pap smear and is 100% treatable. It can take years for\u00a0these changes\u00a0develop into cervical cancer. Most women who are diagnosed with cervical cancer today have not had regular Pap smears, or they have not followed up on abnormal Pap smear results.Almost all cervical cancers are caused by HPV (human papilloma virus). HPV is a common virus that is spread through sexual intercourse. There are many different types (strains)\u00a0of HPV. Some strains lead to cervical cancer. Other strains\u00a0can cause genital warts.\u00a0Others do not cause any problems at all.A woman's sexual habits and patterns can increase her risk\u00a0of developing\u00a0cervical cancer. Risky sexual practices include: Having sex at an early age , Having multiple sexual partners, Having\u00a0a partner or many\u00a0partners who\u00a0are active\u00a0in high-risk sexual activities. Risk factors for cervical cancer include:Not getting the HPV vaccine, Being economically disadvantaged, Women whose mothers took the drug DES (diethylstilbestrol) during pregnancy in the early 1960s to prevent miscarriage, Weakened immune system . "}, "Chloride test - blood": {"description": "This article\u00a0is about\u00a0the laboratory test used to measure the amount of chloride in the fluid portion (serum) of the blood."}, "Cholera": {"description": "Cholera is an infection of the small intestine that causes a large amount of watery diarrhea.", "Possible Complications": "Severe dehydration, Death. ", "Symptoms": ["Abdominal cramps", " \r\n Dry mucus membranes or\u00a0dry mouth \r\n ", "Dry skin", "Excessive thirst", "Glassy or sunken eyes", "Lack of tears", "Lethargy", "Low urine output", "Nausea", "Rapid dehydration", "Rapid pulse (heart rate)", "Sunken \"soft spots\" (fontanelles) in infants", "Unusual sleepiness or tiredness", "Vomiting", "Watery diarrhea that starts suddenly and has a \"fishy\" odor"], "Exams and Tests": "Tests that may be done include: Blood culture, Stool culture \r\n and gram stain. ", "Treatment": "The goal of treatment is to replace fluid and salts that are\u00a0lost through diarrhea. Diarrhea and fluid loss can be fast and extreme. It can be hard to replace lost fluids. Depending on your condition, you may be given fluids by mouth or through a vein (intravenous, or IV). Antibiotics may shorten the time you feel ill. The World Health Organization (WHO) has developed a solution that helps restore fluids. It is cheaper and easier to use than the typical IV fluid. This solution is now being used around the world.", "Prevention": "The U.S. Centers for Disease Control and Prevention does not recommend cholera vaccines for most travelers. (This vaccine is not available in the United States.)Travelers should always be careful when eating food and drinking water, even if they are vaccinated.When outbreaks of cholera occur, efforts should be made to establish clean water, food, and sanitation. Vaccination is not very effective in managing outbreaks.", "Causes": "Cholera is caused by the bacterium Vibrio cholerae. These bacteria release a toxin that causes an\u00a0increased amount of water to be released from cells\u00a0that line\u00a0the intestines. The increase in water produces severe diarrhea.People get the infection from eating or drinking food or water containing the cholera germ. Living in or traveling to areas where there is cholera raises the risk of getting it.Cholera occurs in places with a lack of water treatment or sewage treatment, crowding, war, and famine. Common locations for cholera include:Africa, Asia, India, Mexico, South and Central America. "}, "Child neglect and emotional abuse": {"description": "Know that children and parents can get help. The long-term outcome depends on:"}, "Chediak-Higashi syndrome": {"description": "Chediak-Higashi syndrome is a rare disease of the immune and nervous systems that involves pale-colored hair, eyes, and skin.", "Possible Complications": "Frequent infections especially with Epstein-Barr virus\r\n, Lymphoma-like cancer\r\n, Early death. ", "Symptoms": ["Silver hair, light-colored eyes (albinism)", "Increased infections in the lungs, skin, and mucous membranes", "Jerky eye movements (nystagmus)", "Decreased vision", "Intellectual disability", "Muscle weakness", "Nerve problems in the limbs (peripheral neuropathy)", "Nosebleeds or easy bruising", "Numbness", "Tremor", "Seizures", "Sensitivity to bright light (photophobia)", "Unsteady walking (ataxia)"], "Exams and Tests": "The doctor will perform a physical exam. This may show signs of a swollen spleen or liver or jaundice.Tests that may be done include:Complete blood count, including white blood cell count, Blood platelet count, Blood culture and smear, Brain MRI or CT, EEG, EMG, Nerve conduction tests. ", "Treatment": "There is no specific treatment for Chediak-Higashi syndrome. Bone marrow transplants appear to have been successful in several patients, especially when performed early in the disease.Antibiotics are used to treat infections. Antiviral drugs such as acyclovir and chemotherapy drugs are often used in the accelerated phase of the disease. Surgery may be needed to drain abscesses in some cases. ", "Prevention": "Genetic counseling is recommended before becoming pregnant if you have a family history of Chediak-Higashi.", "Causes": "Chediak-Higashi syndrome is passed down through families (inherited). It is an autosomal recessive disease. This means that both parents are carriers of a non-working copy of the gene, and each parent must pass their non-working gene to the child for them to show symptoms of the disease.Defects have been found in the CHS1 (also called LYST) gene. The primary defect in this disease is found in certain substances normally present in skin cells and certain white blood cells."}, "Choriocarcinoma": {"Symptoms": ["Irregular vaginal bleeding", "Pain "], "Exams and Tests": "A pregnancy test will be positive even\u00a0if you are not pregnant. The pregnancy hormone (HCG) level will be\u00a0high.A pelvic exam may show uterine swelling or a tumor.Blood tests that may be done include:Quantitative serum HCG, Complete blood count, Kidney function tests, Liver function tests. Imaging tests that may be done include:CT scan, MRI . You should be carefully monitored after a hydatidiform mole or at the end of a pregnancy. Early diagnosis of choriocarcinoma can improve the outcome.", "description": "Choriocarcinoma is a type of gestational trophoblastic disease.", "Causes": "Choriocarcinoma is an uncommon cancer that occurs during pregnancy. A baby may or may not develop in this type of pregnancy.The cancer may\u00a0occur after a normal pregnancy.\u00a0But it most often\u00a0occurs with a complete hydatidiform mole. The abnormal tissue from the mole can continue to grow even after it is removed, and can turn into cancer. About half of all women with a choriocarcinoma had a hydatidiform mole, or molar pregnancy.Choriocarcinomas may also occur after an early pregnancy that does not\u00a0continue (miscarriage), or after an\u00a0ectopic pregnancy or genital tumor.", "Treatment": "After you are diagnosed, a careful history and\u00a0exam will be\u00a0done to make sure the cancer has not spread to other organs. Chemotherapy is the main type of treatment.Hysterectomy and radiation therapy are rarely needed."}, "Cranial sutures": {"description": "Cranial sutures are fibrous bands of tissue that connect the bones of the skull."}, "Cold intolerance": {"description": "Cold intolerance is an abnormal sensitivity to a cold environment or cold temperatures.", "Causes": "Anemia, Anorexia nervosa, Blood vessel (vascular) problems, such as Raynaud's phenomenon, Chronic severe illness, General poor health, Hypothyroidism (an underactive thyroid)\r\n , Problem with the hypothalamus (a part of the brain that controls many body functions, including body temperature)\r\n . "}, "Corneal injury": {"description": "Corneal injury is a wound to the part of the eye known as the cornea. The cornea is the crystal clear (transparent) tissue that covers the front of the eye. It works with the lens of the eye to focus images on the retina.", "Symptoms": ["Blurred vision", "Eye pain or stinging and burning in the eye", "Feeling like something is in your eye (may be caused by a scratch or something in your eye)", "Light sensitivity", "Redness of the eye", "Swollen eyelids", "Watery eyes or increased tearing "], "Exams and Tests": "You will need to have a complete eye test. The health care provider may use eye drops called fluorescein dye to help look for injuries.Tests may include: Standard ophthalmic exam, Slit lamp examination. ", "Causes": "Injuries to the cornea are common.Injuries to the outer surface may be due to:Abrasions: Includes scratches or scrapes on the surface of the cornea, Chemical injuries: Caused by almost any fluid that gets into the eye, Contact lens problems: Overuse, poor fit, or sensitivity to contact lens care solutions, Foreign bodies: Exposure to something in the eye such as sand or dust, Ultraviolet injuries: Caused by sunlight, sun lamps, snow or water reflections, or arc-welding . Infections may also damage the cornea.You are more likely to develop a corneal injury if you:Are exposed to sunlight or artificial ultraviolet light for long periods of time, Have ill-fitting contact lenses or overuse your contact lenses, Have very dry eyes, Work in a dusty environment . High-speed particles, such as chips from hammering metal on metal, may get stuck in the surface of the cornea. Rarely, they may penetrate deeper into the eye.Watch this video about:Corneal injury", "Prevention": "Wear safety goggles at all times when using hand or power tools or chemicals, during high impact sports, or during other activities where you may get an eye injury., Wear sunglasses that screen ultraviolet light when you are exposed to sunlight. Wear this type of sunglasses even during the winter., Be careful when using household cleaners. Many household products contain strong chemicals. Drain and oven cleaners are very dangerous. They can lead to blindness if not used properly.. ", "Treatment": "First aid for eye emergencies:DO NOT try to remove an object that is stuck in your eye without professional medical help., If chemicals are splashed in the eye, IMMEDIATELY flush the eye with water for 15 minutes. The person should be quickly taken to the nearest emergency room. . Anyone with severe eye pain needs to be seen in an emergency care center or examined by an ophthalmologist right away.Treatment for corneal injuries may involve:Removing foreign material from the eye, Wearing an eye patch or temporary bandage contact lens, Using eye drops or ointments prescribed by the doctor, Not wearing contact lenses until the eye has healed, Taking pain medicines . "}, "Calcium channel blocker overdose": {"Symptoms": ["Confusion", "Constipation", "Dizziness", "Drowsiness", "Increased blood sugar", "Irregular heartbeat", "Nausea", "Slow heartbeat", "Slurred speech", "Shortness of breath", "Weakness"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Colon cancer - resources": {"description": "The following organizations are good resources for information on colon cancer:"}, "Chickenpox (varicella) vaccine - what you need to know": {"description": "Content source: National Center for Immunization and Respiratory Diseases"}, "Cytology exam of urine": {"description": "A cytology exam of urine is a test used to detect cancer and\u00a0other\u00a0diseases of the urinary tract."}, "Changing your ostomy pouch": {"description": "Your nurse will teach you how to care for your ostomy pouch and how to change it. You will need to empty it when it is about 1/3 full, and change it about every 2 to 4 days, or as your nurse tells you."}, "Cardiac catheterization - discharge ": {"description": "If you had a blockage, you may have had angioplasty and a stent placed in your heart during the procedure."}, "Chronic granulomatous disease": {"description": "Chronic granulomatous disease is an inherited disorder in which immune system cells called phagocytes do not function properly. This leads to ongoing and severe infection.", "Possible Complications": "Bone damage, Chronic pneumonia, Lung damage, Skin damage. ", "Symptoms": ["Bone infections", "Frequent and difficult-to-clear skin infections \r\n\r\nAbscesses, Chronic infection inside the nose, Furuncles, Impetiginized eczema (eczema complicated by an infection), Impetigo, Perianal abscesses (abscesses around the anus). ", "Abscesses", "Chronic infection inside the nose", "Furuncles", "Impetiginized eczema (eczema complicated by an infection)", "Impetigo", "Perianal abscesses (abscesses around the anus)", "Joint infections", "Persistent diarrhea", "Pneumonia \r\n\r\nOccurs frequently, Difficult to cure. ", "Occurs frequently", "Difficult to cure", "Swollen lymph nodes in the neck; those develop early in life, and stay swollen or occur frequently. The lymph nodes may form abscesses that require surgical drainage."], "Exams and Tests": "\r\nYour doctor or nurse will examine you. This may show:\u00a0Liver swelling\u00a0(hepatomegaly), Spleen swelling (splenomegaly), Swollen lymph nodes. There may be signs of a bone infection (osteomyelitis ), sometimes affecting multiple bones.Tests that may be done include:Bone scan, Chest x-ray, Complete blood count (CBC), Flow cytometry tests to help confirm the disease, Nitroblue tetrazolium test (NBT) to help confirm the disease and detect that the mother is a carrier, Tissue biopsy. ", "Treatment": " \r\n Antibiotics are used to treat the disease and may also be used to prevent infections.\u00a0Interferon-gamma may also help reduce the number of severe infections. Surgery may be needed to treat some abscesses. The only cure for chronic granulomatous disease is a bone marrow or stem cell\u00a0transplant.", "Prevention": "Genetic counseling is recommended if you are planning to have children and have a family history of\u00a0 this disease. Advances in genetic screening and increasing use of chorionic villus sampling have made early recognition of CGD possible. However, the practice is not yet widespread or fully accepted. There are tests available for women to identify if you carry the disease.", "Causes": "Chronic granulomatous disease (CGD) is a genetic disorder in which certain immune system cells are unable to kill some types of bacteria and fungi. The disorder leads to long term (chronic) and repeated (recurrent) infections. The condition is often discovered in very early childhood. Milder forms may be diagnosed during the teen years or even in adulthood.Impetigo, skin abscesses and furuncles, and perianal and rectal abscesses are common in people with this disorder. Pneumonia that keeps coming back, and is caused by bacteria not typical of most pneumonias, is a significant problem. Chronic swelling of the lymph nodes in the neck, with the formation of abscesses, is common.Risk factors include a family history of recurrent or chronic infections.About half of CGD cases are passed down through families as a recessive, sex-linked trait. This means that boys are more likely to get the disorder than girls. Boys have an X and a Y chromosome. Girls have two X chromosomes. The defective gene is carried on the X chromosome. So, if a girl has one X chromosome with the defective gene, the other X chromosome may have a working gene to make up for it. A girl has to inherit the defective gene from both parents in order to have the disease."}, "Congenital adrenal hyperplasia": {"description": "Congenital adrenal hyperplasia is the name given to\u00a0a group of inherited disorders of the adrenal gland.", "Possible Complications": "High blood pressure, Low blood sugar, Low sodium. ", "Symptoms": ["Children with milder forms may not have signs or symptoms of congenital adrenal hyperplasia and may not be diagnosed until as late as adolescence.", "Girls with a more severe form often have abnormal genitals at birth and may be diagnosed before symptoms appear.", "Boys will appear normal at birth even if they have a more severe form. ", "Poor feeding or vomiting", "Dehydration", "Electrolyte changes (abnormal levels of sodium and potassium in the blood)", "Abnormal heart rhythm ", "Abnormal menstrual periods or failure to menstruate", "Early appearance of pubic or armpit hair", "Excessive hair growth or facial hair", "Failure to menstruate", "Some enlargement of the clitoris\u00a0 ", "Deepening voice", "Early appearance of pubic or armpit hair", "Enlarged penis but normal testes\u00a0", "Well-developed muscles "], "Exams and Tests": "Your child's doctor will order certain tests. Common blood tests include:Serum electrolytes, Aldosterone, Renin, Cortisol. X-ray of the left hand and wrist may show that the child's bones appear to be those of someone older than their actual age. Genetic tests can help diagnose or confirm the disorder, but they are rarely needed.", "Treatment": "The goal of treatment is to return hormone levels to normal, or near normal. This is done by taking a form of cortisol, most often hydrocortisone. People may need additional doses of medicine during times of stress, such as severe illness or surgery.The health care provider will determine the genetic sex of the baby with abnormal genitalia by checking the chromosomes (karyotyping). Girls with male-looking genitals may have surgery\u00a0of their genitalia during infancy.Steroids used to treat congenital adrenal hyperplasia do not usually cause side effects such as obesity or weak bones, because the doses replace\u00a0the hormones that\u00a0the child's body\u00a0cannot make. It is important for parents to report signs of infection and stress to\u00a0their child's health care provider because the child may need more medication. Steroids cannot be stopped suddenly because doing so may lead to adrenal insufficiency.", "Prevention": "Parents with a family history of congenital adrenal hyperplasia (of any type) or a child who has the condition should consider genetic counseling.Prenatal diagnosis is available for some forms of congenital adrenal hyperplasia. Diagnosis is made in the first trimester by chorionic villus sampling. Diagnosis in the second trimester is made by measuring hormones such as 17-hydroxyprogesterone in the amniotic fluid.A newborn screening test is available for the most common form of congenital adrenal hyperplasia. It can be done on heel stick blood (as part of the routine screenings done on newborns). This test is currently performed in most states.", "Causes": "People have 2 adrenal glands, one located on top of each of their kidneys. These glands make hormones, cortisol and aldosterone, that are essential for life. People with congenital adrenal hyperplasia lack an enzyme the adrenal gland needs to make the hormones.At the same time, the body produces more androgen, a type of male sex hormone. This causes male characteristics to appear early (or inappropriately).Congenital adrenal hyperplasia can affect both boys and girls. About 1 in 10,000 to 18,000 children are born with congenital adrenal hyperplasia."}, "Cholinesterase - blood": {"description": "Acetylcholinesterase is found in nerve tissue and red blood cells. Pseudocholinesterase is found primarily in the liver."}, "Changes in the newborn at birth": {"description": "Changes in the newborn at birth refer to the changes an infant's body undergoes to adapt to life outside the womb. "}, "Chronic obstructive pulmonary disease - control drugs": {"description": "COPD - control drugs"}, "Cholangiocarcinoma": {"description": "Cholangiocarcinoma is a cancerous (malignant) growth in one of the ducts that carries bile from the liver to the small intestine.", "Possible Complications": "Infection, Liver failure, Spread (metastasis) of tumor to other organs. ", "Symptoms": ["Chills", "Clay-colored stools", "Fever", "Itching", "Loss of appetite", "Pain in the upper right abdomen that may radiate to the back", "Weight loss", "Yellowing of the skin (jaundice) "], "Exams and Tests": "Your health care provider will perform a physical exam. Tests will be done to check for a tumor or blockage in the bile duct. These may include:Abdominal CT scan, Abdominal ultrasound, CT scan-directed biopsy, Cytology of samples from the bile duct\r\n , Endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP), Magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography (MRCP), Percutaneous transhepatic cholangiogram (PTCA). Blood tests that may be done include:Liver function tests (especially alkaline phosphatase or bilirubin levels). ", "Treatment": "The goal is to treat the cancer and the blockage it causes. When possible, surgery to remove the tumor is the treatment of choice and may result in a cure. If the tumor is large, the entire liver may need to be removed and a liver transplant will be needed. Often the cancer has already spread locally or to another area of the body by the time it is diagnosed. As a result, surgery to cure the cancer is not possible.Chemotherapy or radiation may be given after surgery to decrease the risk of the cancer returning. But the benefit of this treatment is not certain.Endoscopic therapy with stent placement can temporarily relieve blockages in the biliary ducts and relieve jaundice in patients when the tumor cannot be removed. Laser therapy combined with light-activated chemotherapy medications is another treatment option for those with blockages of the bile duct.", "Causes": "Cancerous tumors of the bile ducts are usually slow-growing and do not spread (metastasize) quickly. However, many of these tumors are already quite advanced by the time they are found.A cholangiocarcinoma may start anywhere along the bile ducts. These tumors block off the bile ducts.Both men and women are affected. Most patients are older than 65.Risks of this condition include:\r\n  Bile duct (choledochal) cysts, \r\n  Chronic biliary and liver inflammation\r\n  , \r\n  History of infection with the parasitic worm, liver flukes\r\n  , \r\n  Primary sclerosing cholangitis, \r\n  Ulcerative colitis\r\n  . Cholangiocarcinoma is rare. It occurs in approximately 2 out of 100,000 people."}, "Carotid duplex": {"description": "Carotid duplex is an ultrasound test that shows how well blood is flowing through the carotid arteries. The carotid arteries are located in the neck. They supply blood directly\u00a0to the brain."}, "Cranial CT scan": {"description": "A cranial computed tomography\u00a0(CT) scan uses many x-rays to create pictures of the head, including the skull, brain, eye sockets, and sinuses."}, "Color vision test": {"description": "A color vision test checks your ability to distinguish between different colors."}, "Cryptococcosis": {"Symptoms": ["Blurred vision or double vision", "Bone pain or tenderness of the breastbone", "Chest pain", "Confusion", "Cough -- dry", "Fatigue", "Fever", "Headache", "Nausea", "Skin rash, including pinpoint red spots (petechiae), ulcers, or other skin lesions", "Sweating -- unusual, excessive at night", "Swollen glands", "Unintentional weight loss"], "Exams and Tests": "Physical examination may reveal:Abnormal breath sounds, Fast heart rate, Fever, Mental status changes, Stiff neck . Tests that may be done include:Blood culture, CT scan of the head, Sputum culture and stain, Lung biopsy, Bronchoscopy, Spinal tap to obtain a sample of cerebrospinal fluid (CSF), Cerebrospinal fluid (CSF) culture and other tests to check for signs of infection, Chest x-ray, Cryptococcal antigen test (looks for a certain molecule that the Cryptococcus neoformans\u00a0fungus can shed into the blood) . ", "description": "Cryptococcosis is infection with Cryptococcus neoformans fungus.", "Causes": "Cryptococcus neoformans is the fungus that causes this disease. It is usually found in soil. If you breathe it in, it infects your lungs. The infection may go away on its own, remain in the lungs only, or spread throughout the body (disseminate).This infection is most often seen in people with a weakened immune system, such as those who: Are infected with HIV, Take high doses of corticosteroid medications, Are on chemotherapy drugs for cancer, Have Hodgkin's disease. Cryptococcus is the most common life-threatening fungal infection in people with AIDS.", "Treatment": "Some infections require no treatment. Even so, there should be regular check-ups for a full year to make sure the infection has not spread. If there are lung lesions or the disease spreads, antifungal medications are prescribed. These drugs may need to be taken for a long time.Medications include:Amphotericin B, Flucytosine, Fluconazole. Amphotericin B can have severe side effects. "}, "Caplan syndrome": {"description": "Caplan syndrome is swelling (inflammation) and scarring of the lungs in people with rheumatoid arthritis who have been exposed to mining dust containing coal. The lung disease is called coal worker's pneumoconiosis.", "Possible Complications": "Increased risk for tuberculosis, Progressive massive fibrosis (scarring), Side effects of medications. ", "Symptoms": ["Cough", "Joint swelling and pain", "Nodules of the skin (rheumatoid nodules)", "Shortness of breath", "Wheezing"], "Exams and Tests": "Your health care provider will take a detailed medical history that will include questions about your jobs (past and present) and other possible sources of exposure to mining dust. The health care provider will also do a physical exam, paying special attention to any joint and skin disease.Other tests can include:Chest x-ray, CT scan of the chest, Joint x-rays, Pulmonary function tests, Rheumatoid factor test. ", "Treatment": "There is no specific treatment for Caplan syndrome, other than treating any lung and joint disease.", "Prevention": "People with rheumatoid arthritis should avoid exposure to hazardous dust.", "Causes": "Caplan syndrome is caused by breathing in coal mining dust. This causes inflammation and can lead to the development of many small lung lumps (nodules) and mild asthma-like airway disease.Some people who have been exposed to the dust have severe lung scarring that makes it difficult for their lungs to carry oxygen to the bloodstream (called progressive massive fibrosis). People with rheumatoid arthritis do not seem more likely to have this complication of scarring.Caplan syndrome is very rare in the United States."}, "Cardiovascular": {"description": "The term cardiovascular refers to the heart (cardio) and the blood vessels (vascular). The cardiovascular system includes:"}, "Contraindication": {"description": "Many medications should not be used together by the same person. For instance, a person who takes warfarin to thin the blood should not take aspirin, which is a blood thinner. This is an example of a relative contraindication."}, "Colposcopy - directed biopsy": {"description": "A colposcopy is a special way of looking at the cervix. It uses a light and a low-powered microscope to make the cervix appear much larger. This helps your health care provider find and then biopsy abnormal areas in your cervix."}, "Calcium - urine": {"description": "See also: Calcium - blood"}, "Compartment syndrome": {"description": "Compartment syndrome is a serious condition that involves increased pressure in a muscle compartment. It can lead to muscle and nerve damage and problems with blood flow.", "Possible Complications": "Complications include permanent injury to nerves and muscles that can dramatically impair function.\u00a0This is called\u00a0Volkmann's ischemia.In more severe cases, amputation may be required.", "Symptoms": ["Decreased sensation", "Numbness and tingling", "Paleness of skin", "Severe pain that gets worse", "Weakness"], "Exams and Tests": "A physical exam will reveal:Pain when the area is squeezed, Extreme pain when you move the affected area (for example, a person with compartment syndrome in the foot or lower leg will have severe pain when moving the toes up and down), Swelling in the area. To confirm the diagnosis, the doctor or nurse may need to directly measure the pressure in the compartment. This is done using a needle attached to a pressure meter, which is placed into the body area. The test must be done during and after an activity that causes pain.", "Treatment": "Surgery is needed immediately. Delaying surgery can lead to permanent damage. Long surgical cuts are made through the muscle tissue to relieve the pressure. The wounds can be left open (covered with a sterile dressing) and closed during a second surgery, usually 48\u00a0to 72 hours later. Skin grafts may be needed to close the wound.If a cast or bandage is causing the problem, the dressing should be loosened or cut to relieve the pressure.", "Prevention": "There is probably no way to prevent this condition. Early diagnosis and treatment helps prevent many of the complications.If you wear a cast, be aware of the risk of swelling. See your health care provider or go to the emergency room if pain under the cast increases, even\u00a0after you have taken\u00a0pain medicines and raised the area.", "Causes": "Thick layers of tissue, called fascia, separate groups of muscles in the arms and legs from each other. Inside each layer of fascia is a confined space, called a compartment. The compartment includes the muscle tissue, nerves, and blood vessels. Fascia surrounds these structures, similar to the way in which insulation covers wires.Fascia do not expand. Any swelling in a compartment will lead to increased pressure in that area, which will press on the muscles, blood vessels, and nerves. If this pressure is high enough, blood flow to the compartment will be blocked. This can lead to permanent injury to the muscle and nerves. If the pressure lasts long enough, the muscles may die and the arm or leg will\u00a0no longer\u00a0work. It may need to be amputated.Swelling that leads to compartment syndrome occurs from trauma such as a car accident or crush injury, or surgery. Swelling can also be caused by complex fractures or soft tissue injuries due to trauma.Long-term (chronic) compartment syndrome can be caused by repetitive activities, such as running. The pressure in a compartment only increases during that activity.Compartment syndrome is most common in the lower leg and forearm. It can also occur in the hand, foot, thigh, and upper arm."}, "Calcium in diet": {"description": "Calcium is the most plentiful mineral found in the human body. The teeth and bones contain the most calcium. Nerve cells, body tissues, blood, and other body fluids contain the rest of the calcium."}, "Canavan disease": {"description": "Canavan disease is an inherited condition that affects the breakdown and use (metabolism) of aspartic acid.", "Possible Complications": "This is often a fatal disorder. It includes severe disabilities such as:Blindness, Inability to walk, Intellectual disability. ", "Symptoms": ["Abnormal posture with flexed arms and straight legs", "Backflow of food material into the nose (nasal regurgitation)", "Feeding problems", "Increasing head size (macrocephaly)", "Irritability", "Poor muscle tone, especially of the neck muscles", "A lack of head control when baby is pulled from a lying to a sitting position (head lag)", "Poor visual tracking or blindness", "Reflux with vomiting", "Seizures", "Severe intellectual disability", "Swallowing difficulties "], "Exams and Tests": "Exaggerated reflexes (hyperreflexia), Joint stiffness, Loss of tissue in the optic nerve of the eye (optic atrophy) . Tests:Blood chemistry, CSF chemistry, Genetic testing for aspartoacylase gene mutations, Head CT scan, Head MRI scan, Urine chemistry for elevated aspartic acid. ", "Treatment": "Treatment mostly aims to ease the symptoms of the disease. Lithium and other drugs are being investigated.", "Prevention": "Genetic counseling is recommended for people who want to have children and have a family history of Canavan disease. Counseling should be considered if both parents are of Ashkenazi Jewish descent. For this group, DNA testing can almost always tell\u00a0if the parents\u00a0are carriers.A diagnosis may be made before the baby is born (prenatal diagnosis) by testing the amniotic fluid.", "Causes": "Canavan disease is passed down (inherited) through families. It is more common among the Ashkenazi Jewish population\u00a0than in the general population.The lack of the enzyme, aspartoacylase, leads to a buildup of material called N-acetylaspartic acid in the brain. This causes the white matter of the brain to break down (deteriorate)."}, "Coughing up blood": {"description": "Hemoptysis is the medical term for coughing up blood from the respiratory tract.", "Causes": "A number of conditions, diseases, and medical tests may make you cough up blood. These include:Blood clot in the lung, Breathing food or other material into the lungs (pulmonary aspiration), Bronchoscopy with biopsy, Bronchiectasis, Bronchitis, Cancer, Cystic fibrosis, Inflammation of the blood vessels in the lung (vasculitis), Injury to the arteries of the lungs, Irritation of the throat from violent coughing (small amounts of blood), Pneumonia or other lung infections, Pulmonary edema, Systemic lupus erythematosus, Tuberculosis. "}, "Calcium, vitamin D, and your bones": {"description": "Vitamin D helps your body absorb calcium. Eat foods that provide the right amounts of calcium, vitamin D, and protein. This kind of diet will give your body the building blocks it needs to make and maintain strong bones."}, "Chemotherapy": {"description": "The term chemotherapy is used to describe cancer-killing drugs. Chemotherapy may be used to:"}, "Clean catch urine sample": {"description": "A clean catch is a method of collecting a urine sample to be tested. The clean-catch urine method is used to prevent germs from the penis or vagina from getting into a urine sample."}, "Chromatography": {"description": "In general, chromatography takes advantage of the differences in the chemicals you want to separate, such as their size, electric charge, or ability to stick to (bind) to material."}, "Causes and risks for obesity - children": {"description": "No single factor or behavior causes obesity. Obesity is caused by many things, including a person\u2019s habits, lifestyle, and environment. Genes and some medical\u00a0problems also increase a person's chances of becoming obese."}, "CSF leak": {"description": "A CSF leak is an escape of the fluid that surrounds the brain and spinal cord.", "Possible Complications": "Complications may occur if the cause is surgery or trauma. Infections after surgery or trauma can lead to meningitis and serious complications, such as swelling of the brain.", "Symptoms": ["A headache that is worse when you sit up and improves when you lie down. It may be associated with light sensitivity, nausea, and neck stiffness.", "Drainage of CSF from the ear (rarely)", "Drainage of CSF from the nose (rarely)"], "Exams and Tests": "Diagnosis is usually based on your history of injury, surgery, or lumbar puncture.Tests may include:CT scan of the head with contrast dye, CT myelogram, MRI of the head or spine\r\n , Radioisotope test of the CSF to track the leakage. ", "Treatment": "Depending on the cause of the leak, many symptoms improve on their own after a few days. Complete bed rest for several days is usually recommended. Drinking increased fluids, especially drinks with caffeine, can help slow or stop the leak and may help with headache pain.Headache may be treated with pain relievers and fluids. If the headache lasts longer than a week after a lumbar puncture, a procedure may be done to block the hole that may be leaking fluid. This is called a blood patch, because a blood clot can be used to seal the leak. In most cases, this makes symptoms go away. Rarely, surgery is needed to repair a tear in the dura and stop the headache.Symptoms of infection (fever, chills, change in mental status) that occur after surgery on the brain or spinal cord or a lumbar puncture are a medical emergency and need to be treated with antibiotics.", "Prevention": "Most\u00a0CSF leaks are a complication of a spinal tap or surgery. The health care provider should use the smallest needle possible when doing a spinal tap.", "Causes": "Any tear or hole in the membrane that surrounds the brain and spinal cord (dura) can allow the fluid that surrounds those organs to leak.This fluid is called the cerebrospinal fluid (CSF). When it leaks out, the pressure around the brain and spinal cord drops.Causes of leakage through the dura include:Certain head, brain, or spinal surgeries, Head injury, Placement of tubes for epidural anesthesia or pain medications, Spinal tap (lumbar puncture). Sometimes, no cause can be found. This is called a spontaneous CSF leak."}, "Cleft lip and palate repair - discharge ": {"description": "Your child had surgery to repair birth defects that caused a cleft in which the lip or the roof of the mouth did not grow together normally while your child was in the womb. Your child had general anesthesia (asleep and not feeling pain) for the surgery."}, "Cherry angioma": {"description": "A cherry angioma is a noncancerous (benign) skin growth made up of blood vessels.", "Possible Complications": "A cherry angioma may cause:Bleeding if\u00a0it is injured, Changes in appearance, Emotional distress . ", "Symptoms": ["Bright cherry-red", "Small -- pinhead size to about\u00a0one quarter\u00a0inch in diameter", "Smooth, or can stick out from the skin "], "Exams and Tests": "Your health care provider will look at the growth on your your skin to\u00a0diagnose a cherry angioma. No further tests are usually necessary. Sometimes a\u00a0skin biopsy may be used to confirm the diagnosis.", "Treatment": "Cherry angiomas usually do not need to be treated. If they affect your appearance\u00a0or bleed often, they may be removed by:Burning (electrosurgery/cautery), Freezing (cryotherapy), Laser, Shave excision. ", "Causes": "Cherry angiomas are fairly common skin growths that vary in size. They can occur almost anywhere on the body, but usually develop on the trunk.They are most common after age 30. The cause is unknown, but they tend to be inherited (genetic)."}, "Craniopharyngioma": {"description": "A craniopharyngioma is a noncancerous (benign) tumor that develops at the base of the brain near the pituitary gland (a small endocrine gland).", "Possible Complications": "A\u00a0large percentage of patients have long-term hormone, vision, and\u00a0nervous system\u00a0problems after craniopharyngioma is treated.When the tumor is not completely removed, the condition may return.", "Symptoms": ["Increasing pressure on the brain, usually from hydrocephalus", "Disrupting hormone production by the pituitary gland", "Decreasing vision\u00a0due to\u00a0pressure or damage to the optic nerve"], "Exams and Tests": "The doctor or nurse will examine you. Tests that may be done include:Blood tests to measure hormone levels, CT scan or MRI scan of the brain, Neurological examination. ", "Treatment": "Traditionally, surgery has been the main treatment for craniopharyngioma. However, radiation treatment instead of surgery or along with a smaller surgery may be the best choice for some patients.In tumors that cannot be removed completely with surgery alone, radiation therapy is usually necessary. If the tumor has a classic appearance on CT scan, a biopsy may not be necessary if treatment with radiation alone is planned.Stereotactic radiosurgery is performed at some medical centers.This tumor is best treated at a center with experience in treating patients with craniopharyngiomas.", "Causes": "This tumor most commonly affects children 5\u00a0to 10 years of age. Adults can sometimes be affected. Boys and girls are equally likely to develop this condition."}, "Cholangitis": {"description": "Cholangitis is an infection of the common bile duct, the tube that carries bile from the liver to the gallbladder and intestines. Bile is a liquid made by the liver that helps digest food.", "Possible Complications": "Sepsis. ", "Symptoms": ["Pain on the upper right side or upper middle part of the abdomen. It may also be felt in the back or below the right shoulder blade. The pain may come and go and feel sharp, cramp-like, or dull.", "Fever and chills", "Dark urine and clay-colored stools", "Nausea and vomiting", "Yellowing of the skin (jaundice), which may come and go "], "Exams and Tests": "You may have the following tests to look for blockages:Abdominal ultrasound, Endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP), Magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography (MRCP), Percutaneous transhepatic cholangiogram (PTCA) . You may also have the following blood tests: Bilirubin level, Liver enzyme levels, Liver function tests, White blood count (WBC) . ", "Treatment": "Quick diagnosis and treatment are very important.Antibiotics to cure infection is the first treatment done in most cases. ERCP or other surgical procedure is done when the patient is stable.Patients who are very ill or are quickly getting worse may need surgery right away.", "Prevention": "Treatment of gallstones, tumors, and infestations of parasites may reduce the risk for some people. A metal or plastic stent that is placed in the bile system may be needed to prevent the\u00a0infection from returning.", "Causes": "Cholangitis is most often caused by a bacterial infection. This can occur when the duct is blocked by something, such as a gallstone or tumor. The infection causing this condition may also spread to the liver.Risk factors include a previous history of gallstones, sclerosing cholangitis, HIV, narrowing of the common bile duct, and, rarely, travel to countries where you might catch a worm or parasite infection."}, "Controlling your high blood pressure": {"description": "You are more likely to have high blood pressure as you get older. This is because your blood vessels become stiffer as you age. When that happens, your blood pressure goes up."}, "Comprehensive metabolic panel": {"description": "A comprehensive metabolic panel is a group of blood tests. They\u00a0provide an overall picture of your body's chemical balance and metabolism. Metabolism refers to all the physical and chemical processes in the body that use energy."}, "Cryotherapy - skin": {"description": "Cryotherapy is a method of superfreezing tissue in order to destroy it. This article discusses cryotherapy of the skin."}, "Constipation": {"description": "Constipation is most often defined as having a bowel movement less than 3 times per week. It is often associated with hard stools or problems passing stools. You may have pain while passing stools or may be unable to have a bowel movement after straining or pushing.", "Causes": "Constipation is most often caused by:Low-fiber diet, Lack of physical activity, Not drinking enough water, Delay in going to the bathroom when you have the urge to move your bowels . Stress and travel can also contribute to constipation or other changes in bowel habits.Other causes of constipation may include:Colon cancer, Diseases of the bowel, such as irritable bowel syndrome, Mental health disorders, Nervous system disorders, Pregnancy, Underactive thyroid, Use of certain medications . Constipation in children often occurs if they hold\u00a0their bowel movements. This may happen when the child is not ready for toilet training or is afraid of it."}, "Compazine overdose": {"Symptoms": ["Inability to completely empty the bladder ", "Blurred vision", "Drooling", "Dry mouth", "Nasal congestion", "Small pupils", "Yellow eyes ", "Constipation", "Loss of appetite", "Nausea", "Swallowing difficulties ", "Low blood pressure (severe)", "Rapid heartbeat", "Muscle spasms", "Stiff muscles in neck, face, or back ", "Coma (decreased level of consciousness and lack of responsiveness)", "Convulsions (seizures)\u00a0", "Disorientation", "Drowsiness", "Fever", "Involuntary motor tics", "Lower-than-normal body temperature (hypothermia) ", "Restlessness associated with repetitive foot shuffling,\u00a0rocking of the trunk, or pacing", "Tremor", "Uncoordinated movement, slow movement, or shuffling (with\u00a0long-term use or overuse)", "Weakness ", "Changes in menstrual patterns ", "Rash", "Yellow skin "], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Cortisol blood test": {"description": "Cortisol can also be measured using a urine test."}, "Craniosynostosis repair - discharge ": {"description": "Craniectomy - child - discharge; Synostectomy - discharge; Strip craniectomy - discharge; Endoscopy-assisted craniectomy - discharge; Sagittal craniectomy - discharge; Frontal-orbital advancement - discharge; FOA - discharge"}, "Calla lily": {"Symptoms": ["Burning in mouth and throat", "Swelling of mouth and tongue", "Redness, swelling, pain, and burning of the eyes, and possible corneal damage", "Diarrhea", "Nausea", "Vomiting"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222.", "Prevention": "Do not touch or eat any plant with which you are not familiar. Wash your hands after working in the garden or walking in the woods."}, "Chronic pain - resources": {"description": "The following organizations are good resources for information on chronic pain:"}, "CSF cell count": {"description": "A CSF cell count is a test to measure the number of red and white blood cells that are in cerebrospinal fluid (CSF). CSF is a clear fluid that in the space around the spinal cord and brain."}, "Cystic hygroma": {"description": "A cystic hygroma is a growth that often occurs in the head and neck area. It is a birth defect.", "Possible Complications": "Complications may include:Bleeding, Damage to structures in the neck caused by surgery, Infection, Return of the cystic hygroma. ", "Symptoms": [], "Exams and Tests": "Sometimes, a cystic hygroma is seen using a pregnancy ultrasound, when the baby is still in the womb. This can mean that the baby has a chromosomal problem or other birth defects.The following tests may be done:Chest x-ray, Ultrasound, CT scan, MRI scan. If the cystic hygroma is detected during a pregnancy ultrasound, other ultrasound tests or amniocentesis may be recommended.", "Treatment": "Treatment involves removing all of the abnormal tissue. However, cystic hygromas can often grow, making it impossible to remove all of the tissue.Other treatments have been tried with only limited success. These include:Chemotherapy medications, Injection of sclerosing medications, Radiation therapy, Steroids. ", "Causes": "A cystic hygroma occurs as the baby grows in the womb. It forms from pieces of material that carry fluid and white blood cells. This material is called embryonic lymphatic tissue.After birth, a cystic hygroma usually looks like a soft bulge under the skin. The cyst may not be found at birth. It typically grows as the child grows. Sometimes it is not noticed until the child is older."}, "Choking - adult or child over 1 year": {"Symptoms": ["Bluish skin color", "Difficulty breathing", "Inability to speak", "Loss of consciousness if blockage is not cleared", "Noisy breathing or high-pitched sounds while inhaling", "Weak, ineffective coughing"], "Prevention": "Eat slowly and chew food thoroughly.\r\n, Make sure dentures fit properly.\r\n, Don't drink too much alcohol before or during eating.\r\n, Keep small objects away from young children.. ", "description": "Choking is when someone can't breathe because food, a toy, or other object is blocking the airway (throat or windpipe).", "Causes": "Eating too fast, failing to chew food well enough, or eating with improperly fitted dentures, Drinking alcohol (even a small amount of alcohol affects awareness), Being unconscious and breathing in vomited material, Breathing in small objects, Injury to the head and face (swelling, blood, or a deformity can cause choking), Aftereffects of a stroke (adult), Enlarging tonsils or tumors of the neck and throat. "}, "Central nervous system": {"description": "The central nervous system is composed of the brain and spinal cord. Your brain and spinal cord serve as the main \"processing center\" for the entire nervous system, and control all the workings of your body."}, "Cardiac tamponade": {"description": "Cardiac tamponade is pressure on the heart that occurs when blood or fluid builds up in the space between the heart muscle (myocardium) and the\u00a0outer covering sac of the heart (pericardium).", "Possible Complications": "Heart failure, Pulmonary edema, Shock, Death. ", "Symptoms": ["Anxiety, restlessness", "Sharp chest pain that is felt in the neck, shoulder, back, or abdomen", "Chest pain that gets worse with deep breathing or coughing", "Problems breathing", "Discomfort, sometimes relieved by sitting upright or leaning forward", "Fainting, light-headedness", "Pale, gray, or blue skin", "Palpitations", "Rapid breathing", "Swelling of the abdomen or other areas ", "Dizziness", "Drowsiness", "Weak or absent pulse "], "Exams and Tests": "There are no specific laboratory tests that diagnose tamponade. Echocardiogram is very often used to help make the diagnosis. This test may be done at the bedside in emergency cases. A physical exam may show:Blood pressure that falls (pulsus paradoxical) when breathing deeply, Rapid breathing, Heart rate over 100 (normal is 60 to 100 beats per minute), Heart sounds are only faintly heard through a stethoscope, Neck veins that may be bulging (distended) but the blood pressure is low, Weak or absent peripheral pulses . Other tests may include:Chest CT or MRI of chest, Chest x-ray, Coronary angiography, ECG, Right heart catheterization . ", "Treatment": "Cardiac tamponade is an emergency condition that needs to be treated in the hospital. The fluid around the heart must be drained as quickly as possible. Pericardiocentesis is a procedure that uses a needle to remove fluid from the tissue that surrounds the heart (pericardial sac).A surgical procedure to cut and remove part of the pericardium may also be done. This is known as surgical pericardiectomy or pericardial window. Fluids are given to keep blood pressure normal until the fluid can be drained from around the heart. Medicines that increase blood pressure may also help keep the person alive until the fluid is drained.Oxygen may be given to help reduce the workload on the heart by decreasing tissue demands for blood flow.The cause of tamponade must be found and treated. ", "Prevention": "Many cases are not preventable. Knowing your personal risk factors may help you get early diagnosis and treatment.", "Causes": "In this condition, blood or fluid collects in the pericardium, the sac surrounding the heart. This prevents the heart ventricles from expanding fully. The excess pressure from the fluid prevents the heart from working properly. As a result, the body does not get enough blood. Cardiac tamponade can occur due to:Dissecting aortic aneurysm (thoracic), End-stage lung cancer, Heart attack (acute MI), Heart surgery, Pericarditis caused by bacterial or viral infections, Wounds to the heart . Other possible causes include:Heart tumors, Hypothyroidism, Kidney failure, Leukemia, Placement of central lines, Radiation therapy to the chest, Recent invasive heart procedures, Recent open heart surgery, Systemic lupus erythematosus. Cardiac tamponade occurs in about 2 out of 10,000 people due to disease."}, "Carpal tunnel biopsy": {"description": "Carpal tunnel biopsy is a test in which a small piece of tissue is removed from the carpal tunnel (part of the wrist)."}, "Cervix cryosurgery": {"description": "Cervix cryosurgery is a surgical treatment to freeze and destroy abnormal tissue in the cervix."}, "Cyanoacrylates": {"Symptoms": ["Skin tissue sticks together\u00a0"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Cleidocranial dysostosis": {"description": "Cleidocranial dysostosis is a disorder involving the abnormal development of bones in the skull and collar (clavicle) area. The condition is passed down through families (inherited).", "Possible Complications": "Complications include dental problems and shoulder dislocations.", "Symptoms": ["Ability to touch shoulders together in front of body", "Delayed closure of fontanelles (\"soft spots\")", "Loose joints", "Prominent forehead (frontal bossing)", "Short forearms", "Short fingers "], "Exams and Tests": "There is often a family history of cleidocranial dysostosis. X-rays are usually taken and may show:Undergrowth of the collarbone, Undergrowth of the shoulder blade, Failure of the area in the front of the pelvis bone to close. ", "Treatment": "There is no specific treatment for the bone problems. An oral surgeon should monitor teeth regularly. An otologist should check for hearing problems.", "Prevention": "Genetic counseling is appropriate if a person with a family or personal history of cleidocranial dysostosis is planning to have children.", "Causes": "Cleidocranial dysostosis is caused by an abnormal gene. It is passed down through families as an autosomal dominant trait. That means you only need to get the abnormal gene from one parent in order for you to inherit the disease.Cleidocranial dysostosis is a congenital condition, which means it is present from before birth. The condition affects girls and boys equally."}, "Claw hand": {"description": "See also: Claw foot", "Causes": "Congenital abnormality, Nerve damage in the arm, Scarring after a severe burn of the hand or forearm. "}, "Certified nurse-midwife": {"description": "Certification is done through a national organization and all states have the same requirements for professional practice standards. Only graduates of nurse-midwifery programs accredited by the American College of Nurse-Midwives (ACNM) are eligible to take the certification exam given by the ACNM Certification Council, Inc."}, "Cystitis - acute": {"Symptoms": ["Cloudy or bloody urine", "Strong or foul smelling urine", "Low fever (not everyone will have a fever)", "Pain or burning with urination", "Pressure or cramping in the lower middle abdomen or back", "Strong need to urinate often, even right after the bladder has been emptied "], "Exams and Tests": "In most cases, a urine sample is collected to do the following tests:Urinalysis. This test is done to look for white blood cells, red blood cells, bacteria, and to check for certain chemicals, such as nitrites in the urine. Most of the time, your health care provider can diagnose an infection using a urinalysis., Urine culture. A clean catch urine sample may be needed to identify the bacteria in the urine and decide on the correct antibiotic. . ", "description": "Acute cystitis is an infection of the bladder or lower urinary tract. Acute means that the infection begins suddenly.", "Causes": "Cystitis is caused by germs, most often bacteria. These organisms enter the urethra and then the bladder and can cause an infection. The infection commonly develops in the bladder. It can also spread to the kidneys.Most of the time, your body can get rid of these bacteria when you urinate. But, the bacteria can stick to the wall of the urethra or bladder, or grow so fast that some stay in the bladder.Women tend to get infections more often than men. This happens because their urethra is shorter and closer to the anus. Women are more likely to get an infection after sexual intercourse or when using a diaphragm for birth control. Menopause also increases the risk for a urinary tract infection.The following also increase your chances of having cystitis:A tube called a urinary catheter inserted in your bladder, Blockage of the bladder or urethra, Diabetes, Enlarged prostate, narrowed urethra, or anything that blocks the flow of urine, Loss of bowel control (bowel incontinence), Older age (especially in people who live in nursing homes), Pregnancy, Problems fully emptying your bladder (urinary retention), Procedures that involve the urinary tract, Staying still (immobile) for a long period of time (for example, when you are recovering from a hip fracture) . Most cases are caused by Escherichia coli (E. coli), a type of bacteria found in the intestines.", "Treatment": "Antibiotics taken by mouth are most often given to prevent the infection from spreading to the kidneys.For a simple bladder infection, you will take antibiotics for 3 days (women) or 7 - 14 days (men). For a bladder infection with complications such as pregnancy or diabetes, or a mild kidney infection, you will most often take antibiotics for 7 - 14 days., It is important that you finish all the antibiotics prescribed, even if you feel better before the end of your treatment. People who do not finish their antibiotics may develop an infection that is harder to treat., Your health care provider will also want to know if you are pregnant.. Your health care provider may prescribe medicines to ease discomfort. Phenazopyridine hydrochloride (Pyridium) is the most common of this type of drug. You will still need to take antibiotics.Everyone with a bladder infection should drink plenty of water.Some women have repeat bladder infections. Your health care provider may suggest treatments such as:Taking a single dose of an antibiotic after sexual contact may prevent these infections if they occur after sexual activity., Keeping a 3-day course of antibiotics at home to use for infections, based on their symptoms., Taking a single, daily dose of an antibiotic to prevent infections.. Over-the-counter products that increase acid in the urine, such as ascorbic acid or cranberry juice, may be recommended. These medicines lower the concentration of bacteria in the urine.Follow-up may include urine cultures to make sure the bacterial infection is gone.Lifestyle changes may help prevent some urinary tract infections."}, "Coronary angiography": {"description": "Coronary angiography is a procedure that uses a special dye (contrast material) and x-rays to see how blood flows through the arteries in your heart. "}, "Colds and the flu - what to ask your doctor - child": {"description": "Below are some questions you may want to ask your child's doctor or nurse to help you take care of your child with a cold or the flu."}, "Cognitive behavioral therapy for back pain": {"description": "Cognitive behavioral therapy (CBT) can help many people deal with chronic back pain."}, "Conduct disorder": {"description": "Conduct disorder is a set of ongoing emotional and behavioral problems that occurs in children and teens. Problems may involve defiant or impulsive behavior, drug use, or criminal activity.", "Possible Complications": "Children with conduct disorder may go on to develop personality disorders as adults, particularly antisocial personality disorder. As their behaviors worsen, these individuals may also develop problems with\u00a0drug abuse\u00a0and the law.Depression and bipolar disorder may develop in the teen years\u00a0and early adulthood. Suicide and violence toward others are also possible complications.", "Symptoms": ["Breaking rules without\u00a0clear reason", "Cruel or aggressive behavior toward people or animals (for example: bullying, fighting, using dangerous weapons, forcing sexual activity, and stealing)", "Not going\u00a0to school (truancy -- beginning before age 13)", "Heavy drinking and/or heavy drug abuse", "Intentionally setting fires", "Lying to get a favor or avoid things they have to do", "Running away", "Vandalizing or destroying property "], "Exams and Tests": "There is no real test for diagnosing conduct disorder. The diagnosis is made when a child or adolescent has a history of conduct disorder behaviors.A physical examination and blood tests can help rule out medical conditions that are similar to conduct disorder. In rare cases, a brain scan helps rule out other disorders.", "Treatment": "For treatment to be successful,\u00a0it must\u00a0be started early. The child's family also needs to be involved. Parents can learn techniques to help manage their child's problem behavior. In cases of abuse, the child may need to be removed from the family and placed in a less chaotic home. Treatment with medicines or talk therapy may be used for depression and attention-deficit disorder.Many \"behavioral modification\" schools, \"wilderness programs,\" and \"boot camps\" are sold to parents as solutions for conduct disorder. There is no research to support these programs. Research does\u00a0suggest that treating children at home, along with their families, is more effective.", "Prevention": "The sooner the treatment for conduct disorder is started, the more likely the child will learn adaptive behaviors and\u00a0avoid potential complications.", "Causes": "Conduct disorder has been linked to:Child abuse, Drug or alcohol abuse\u00a0in the parents, Family conflicts, Genetic defects, Poverty . The diagnosis is more common among boys.It is hard to know how common the disorder is. This is\u00a0because many of the qualities\u00a0for diagnosis, such as \"defiance\" and \"rule breaking,\"\u00a0are hard to define. For a diagnosis of conduct disorder, the behavior must be much\u00a0more extreme than is socially acceptable.Conduct disorder is often\u00a0linked to\u00a0attention-deficit disorder. Conduct disorder also can be an early sign of depression or bipolar disorder."}, "Cranial mononeuropathy III - diabetic type": {"description": "Cranial mononeuropathy III -- diabetic type -- is usually a complication of diabetes that causes double vision and eyelid drooping.", "Possible Complications": "Permanent eyelid drooping, Permanent vision changes. ", "Symptoms": ["Double vision", "Drooping of one eyelid (ptosis)", "Pain in the head or behind the eye "], "Exams and Tests": "An examination of the eyes will determine whether only the third nerve is affected or if other nerves have also been damaged. Signs may include:\r\nEyes that are not aligned\r\n  , \r\nPupil reaction that is almost always normal\r\n  . Your health care provider will do a complete examination to determine the possible effect on other parts of the nervous system. Depending on the suspected cause, you may need:Blood tests, Tests to look at blood vessels in the brain (cerebral angiogram, CT angiogram, MR angiogram), MRI or CT scan of the brain, Spinal tap (lumbar puncture) . You may need to be referred to a doctor who specializes in vision problems related to the nerves in the eye\u00a0(neuro-ophthalmologist).", "Treatment": "There is no specific treatment to correct the nerve injury.Treatments may include:Close control of blood sugar levels, Eye patch or glasses with prisms to reduce double vision, Pain medications, Surgery to correct eyelid drooping or eyes that are not aligned. Some people may recover without treatment.", "Prevention": "Controlling your blood sugar level may reduce the risk of developing this disorder.", "Causes": "Cranial mononeuropathy III - diabetic type -- is a mononeuropathy. This means that only one nerve is damaged. The condition affects the third cranial (oculomotor) nerve. This is one of the cranial nerves that control eye movement.This type of damage may occur along with diabetic peripheral neuropathy. Cranial mononeuropathy III is the most common cranial nerve disorder in people with diabetes. It is due to damage to the small blood vessels that feed the nerve. Other causes may include:Infarction of the nerve (tissue damage from loss of blood flow), Pressure on the nerve, Mononeuritis multiplex. "}, "Clubbing of the fingers or toes": {"description": "Clubbing is changes in the areas under and around the toenails and fingernails that occur with some disorders. The nails also show changes.", "Causes": "Lung cancer is the most common cause of clubbing. Clubbing often occurs in heart and lung diseases that reduce the amount of oxygen in the blood. These may include:Heart defects that are present at birth (congenital), Chronic lung infections that occur in people with bronchiectasis, cystic fibrosis, or lung abscess, Infection of the lining of the heart chambers and heart valves (infectious endocarditis). This can be caused by bacteria, fungi, or other infectious substances, Lung disorders in which the deep lung tissues become swollen and then scarred (interstitial lung disease). Other causes of clubbing:Celiac disease, Cirrhosis of the liver and other liver diseases, Dysentery, Graves disease, Overactive thyroid gland, Other types of cancer, including liver, gastrointestinal, Hodgkin's lymphoma. "}, "Cervix": {"description": "\r\nA PAP smear is a screening test to check\u00a0for cancer of the cervix.\u00a0\r\n"}, "Cranial mononeuropathy III": {"description": "Cranial mononeuropathy III is a nerve disorder. It affects the function of the third cranial nerve. As a result, the person may have double vision and eyelid drooping.", "Symptoms": ["Double vision, which is the most common symptom", "Drooping of one eyelid (ptosis)", "Enlarged pupil that does not get smaller when a light shines on it", "Headache or eye pain "], "Exams and Tests": "An eye examination may show:Enlarged (dilated) pupil of the affected eye, Eye movement abnormalities, Eyes that are not aligned . Your health care provider will do a complete examination to determine the possible effect on other parts of the nervous system. Depending on the suspected cause, you may need:Blood tests, Tests to look at blood vessels to the brain (cerebral angiogram, CT angiogram, or MR angiogram), MRI or CT scan of the brain, Spinal tap (lumbar puncture) . You may need to be referred to a doctor who specializes in vision problems related to the nervous system (neuro-ophthalmologist).", "Causes": "Cranial mononeuropathy III is a mononeuropathy, which means that only one nerve is affected. It affects the third cranial (oculomotor) nerve. This is one of the cranial nerves that control eye movement. Local tumors or swelling can press on and damage the nerve.Causes may include:Brain aneurysms, Infections, Abnormal blood vessels (vascular malformations), Sinus thrombosis, Tissue damage from loss of blood flow (infarction), Trauma (from head injury or caused accidentally during surgery), Tumors or other growths (especially tumors at the base of the brain and pituitary gland) . In rare cases, people with migraine headaches may have a temporary problem with the oculomotor nerve. This is probably due to a spasm of the blood vessels. In some cases, no cause can be found.", "Prevention": "Quickly treating disorders that could press on the nerve may reduce the risk of developing cranial mononeuropathy III.", "Treatment": "Some people get better without treatment. Treating the cause (if it can be found) may relieve the symptoms.Treatment may include:Corticosteroid medications to reduce swelling and relieve pressure on the nerve (when caused by a tumor or injury), Eye patch or glasses with prisms to reduce double vision, Pain medications, Surgery to treat eyelid drooping or eyes that are not aligned . "}, "Chlorine poisoning": {"Symptoms": ["Breathing difficulty (from breathing in the chlorine)", "Throat swelling (may also cause breathing difficulty)", "Water filling the lungs (pulmonary edema)", "Severe change in acid level of the blood (pH balance), which leads to damage in all of the body organs", "Loss of vision", "Severe pain in the throat", "Severe pain or burning in the nose, eyes, ears, lips, or tongue", "Blood in the stool", "Burns of the food pipe (esophagus)", "Severe abdominal pain", "Vomiting", "Vomiting blood", "Collapse", "Low blood pressure that develops rapidly", "Burns", "Holes (necrosis) in the skin or tissues underneath", "Irritation"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Chemical dependence - resources": {"description": "The following organizations are a good resource for information on drug dependence:"}, "Central line infections - hospitals": {"description": "Central line infections are very serious. They can make you sick and increase how long you are in the hospital. Your central line needs special care to prevent infection."}, "Cellulitis": {"description": "Cellulitis is a common skin infection caused by bacteria.", "Possible Complications": "Blood infection (sepsis), Bone infection (osteomyelitis), Inflammation of the lymph vessels (lymphangitis), Inflammation of the heart (endocarditis), Meningitis, Shock, Tissue death (gangrene). ", "Symptoms": ["Fever", "Pain or tenderness in the affected area", "Skin redness or inflammation that gets bigger as the infection spreads", "Skin sore or rash that starts suddenly, and grows quickly in the first 24 hours", "Tight, glossy, stretched appearance of the skin", "Warm skin in the area of redness", "Chills or shaking", "Fatigue", "General ill feeling", "Muscle aches and pains", "Warm skin", "Sweating", "Hair loss at the site of infection", "Joint stiffness caused by swelling of the tissue over the joint", "Nausea and vomiting"], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider will perform a physical exam. This may reveal:Redness, warmth, and swelling of the skin, Possible drainage, if there is an infection, Swollen glands (lymph nodes) near the affected area. Your health care provider may mark the edges of the redness with a pen, to see if the redness goes past the marked border over the next several days.Tests that may be ordered include:Blood culture, Complete blood count (CBC), Culture of any fluid or material inside the affected area. ", "Treatment": "You will likely be prescribed antibiotics to be\u00a0taken by mouth. You may be given pain medicine as well.At home, raise the infected area higher than your heart to reduce swelling. Rest until your symptoms improve.You may need to stay in a hospital if:You are very sick (for example, you have a very high temperature, blood pressure problems, or nausea and vomiting that does not go away), You have been on antibiotics and the infection is getting worse, Your immune system is not working well (due to cancer, HIV), You have an infection around your eyes, You require antibiotics through a vein (IV). ", "Prevention": "Protect your skin by:Keeping your skin moist with lotions or ointments to prevent cracking, Wearing shoes that fit well and provide enough room for your feet, Learning how to trim your nails to avoid harming the skin around them, Wearing appropriate protective equipment when participating in work or sports. Whenever you have a break in the skin:Clean the break carefully with soap and water. Apply an antibiotic cream or ointment every day., Cover with a bandage and change it every day until a scab forms., Watch for redness, pain, drainage, or other signs of infection.. ", "Causes": "Staphylococcus and streptococcus bacteria are the most common causes of cellulitis.Normal skin has many types of bacteria living on it. When there is a break in the skin, these bacteria can cause a skin infection. Skin in the infected area will become red, hot, irritated, swollen,\u00a0and painful.Risk factors for cellulitis include:Cracks or peeling skin between the toes, History of peripheral vascular disease, Injury or trauma with a break in the skin (skin wounds), Insect bites and stings, animal bites, or human bites, Ulcers from certain diseases, including diabetes and vascular disease, Use of corticosteroid medications or medications that suppress the immune system, Wound from a recent surgery. "}, "Cobalt poisoning": {"Symptoms": ["Cardiomyopathy (a problem where your heart becomes big and floppy and has problems pumping blood)", "Possible nerve problems", "Thickening of your blood", "Thyroid problems"], "description": "\r\n This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or\u00a0a local poison control center\u00a0at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Chiropractic care for back pain": {"description": "Hands-on adjustment of the spine, called spinal manipulation, is the basis of chiropractic care. Most chiropractors also use other types of treatments as well."}, "Carcinoid syndrome": {"description": "Carcinoid syndrome is a group of symptoms associated with carcinoid tumors -- tumors of the small intestine, colon, appendix, and bronchial tubes in the lungs.", "Possible Complications": "Increased risk of falls and injury (from low blood pressure), Bowel obstruction (from tumor), Gastrointestinal bleeding, Heart valve failure. ", "Symptoms": ["Abdominal pain that comes and goes", "Bright red flushing of the face, neck, or upper chest", "Diarrhea", "Heart palpitations", "Low blood pressure", "Skin lesions on the face called telangiectasias\r\n ", "Wheezing"], "Exams and Tests": "Most of these tumors are found when tests or procedures are done for other reasons, such as during abdominal surgery.A physical examination may show:Heart valve lesions, Signs of niacin-deficiency disease (pellagra). Tests may include:5-HIAA levels in urine, Blood tests (including serotonin blood test), CT and MRI scan of the chest or abdomen, Echocardiogram, Octreotide radiolabeled scan. ", "Treatment": "Surgery to remove the tumor is usually the first treatment. It can permanently cure the condition if the tumor is completely removed.If the tumor has spread to the liver, treatment involves destroying the local blood supply of the tumor or giving chemotherapy directly into the liver.When the entire tumor cannot be removed, removing large portions of the tumor (\"debulking\") can help relieve the symptoms.Octreotide (Sandostatin)\u00a0injections are sometimes given to people with advanced carcinoid tumors that cannot be removed with surgery. Interferon is often given with octreotide to help stop tumor growth. Patients whose carcinoid tumor secretes histamine will benefit from treatment with antihistamine drugs.People with carcinoid syndrome should avoid alcohol, large meals, and foods high in tyramine (aged cheeses, avocado, many processed foods), because they may trigger symptoms.Some common medicines, like selective serotonin reuptake inhibitors (SSRIs), such as paroxetine (Paxil) and fluoxetine (Prozac), may make symptoms worse by increasing levels of serotonin. However, do not stop taking these medicines unless your doctor tells you to do so.", "Prevention": "Treating the tumor reduces the risk of carcinoid syndrome.", "Causes": "Carcinoid syndrome is the pattern of symptoms sometimes seen in people with carcinoid tumors. These tumors are rare, and often slow growing. About 70% of carcinoid tumors are found in the gastrointestinal tract.Carcinoid syndrome occurs in about 1 in 10 people with carcinoid tumors, usually after the tumor has spread to the liver or lung.These tumors release too much of the hormone serotonin, as well as several other chemicals that cause the blood vessels to open (dilate). This causes carcinoid syndrome."}, "Cytology exam of pleural fluid": {"description": "A cytology exam of pleural fluid is a laboratory test to detect cancer cells and certain other cells in\u00a0the area that surrounds the lungs. This area is called the pleural space. Cytology means the study of cells."}, "Cold knife cone biopsy": {"description": "A cold knife cone biopsy (conization) is surgery to remove a sample of abnormal tissue from the cervix. The cervix is the lower part of the uterus (womb) that opens at the top of the vagina. Abnormal changes in the cells on the surface of the cervix is called cervical dysplasia."}, "Catecholamines - blood": {"description": "Catecholamines are more often measured with a\u00a0urine test than with a blood test."}, "Canker sore": {"Symptoms": ["One or more painful, red spots or bump that develops into an open ulcer", "White or yellow center", "Small size\u00a0(most often under 1/3 inch across) ", "Gray color as healing starts", "Fever", "General discomfort or uneasiness (malaise)", "Swollen lymph nodes"], "Exams and Tests": "Your health care provider can often make the diagnosis by looking at the sore.If canker sores persist or continue to return, tests should be done to look for other causes, such as erythema multiforme, drug allergies, herpes infection, and bullous lichen planus.You may need\u00a0further testing or a biopsy\u00a0to\u00a0look for other causes of mouth ulcers.\u00a0Canker sores are not cancer and do not cause cancer. There are types of cancer, however, that may first appear as a mouth ulcer that does not heal. \r\n ", "description": "A canker sore is not the same as a fever blister (cold sore).", "Causes": "Canker sores are a common form of mouth ulcer. They may occur with viral infections. In some cases, the cause is unknown.\u00a0Canker sores may also be linked to problems with the body's immune system. The sores may also be brought on by: Mouth injury from dental work, Cleaning the teeth too roughly, Biting the tongue or cheek. Other things that can trigger canker sores include:Emotional stress, Lack of certain vitamins and minerals in the diet (especially iron, folic acid, or vitamin B-12) \r\n , Hormonal changes, Food allergies. Anyone can develop a canker sore. Women are more likely to get them than men. Canker sores may run in families.", "Treatment": "In most cases, the canker sores go away without treatment.\u00a0Try not to eat hot or spicy foods, which can cause pain.Use over-the-counter medicines that\u00a0ease pain in the area.Rinse your mouth with mild, over-the-counter mouthwashes or salt water., Apply a mixture of half hydrogen peroxide and half water directly to the sore using a cotton swab. Follow by dabbing a small amount of Milk of Magnesia on the canker afterward. Repeat these steps 3-4 times a day., Rinse your mouth with a mixture of half Milk of Magnesia and half Benadryl liquid allergy medicine. Swish mixture in the mouth for about 1 minute, then spit out.\u00a0. Medicines prescribed by your health care provider may be needed for severe cases. These may include:Chlorhexidine mouthwash, Stronger medicines called corticosteroids that are placed on the sore or take in pill form. Brush your teeth twice a day and floss your teeth every day. Also, get routine dental check ups."}, "Concussion - what to ask your doctor - child ": {"description": "Below are some questions you may want to ask your doctor or nurse to help you take care of your child's concussion."}, "Congenital rubella": {"description": "Congenital rubella is a condition that occurs in an infant whose mother is infected with the virus that causes German measles.", "Possible Complications": "Complications may involve many parts of the body.Eyes:Cataracts, Glaucoma, Retinitis. Heart:Patent ductus arteriosus, Pulmonary artery stenosis, Other heart defects. Central nervous system:Intellectual disability, Motor disability, Small head from failed brain development, Encephalitis, Meningitis. Other:Deafness, Low blood platelet count, Enlarged liver and spleen, Abnormal muscle tone, Bone disease. ", "Symptoms": ["Cloudy corneas or white appearance to pupil", "Deafness", "Developmental delay", "Excessive sleepiness", "Irritability", "Low birth weight", "Intellectual disability", "Seizures", "Small head size", "Skin rash at birth"], "Exams and Tests": "The baby's health care provider will run blood and urine tests to check for the virus.", "Treatment": "There is no specific treatment for congenital rubella. Symptoms are treated as appropriate.", "Prevention": "Vaccination prior to pregnancy can prevent congenital rubella. Pregnant women who are not immune to rubella should avoid contact with persons who have the virus.", "Causes": "Congenital rubella occurs when the rubella virus in the mother affects the developing baby at a critical time, in the first 3 months of pregnancy. After the fourth month, the mother's rubella infection is less likely to harm the developing baby.The number of babies born with congenital rubella has decreased dramatically since the introduction of the rubella vaccine.Pregnant women who are not vaccinated for rubella and who have not had the disease in the past risk infecting themselves and their unborn baby."}, "Costochondritis": {"Exams and Tests": "Your health care provider can diagnose costochondritis by pressing on the area where the ribs meet the chest bone (sternum). If this area is tender and sore, costochondritis is the most likely cause of your chest pain. However, your doctor should make this diagnosis only after speaking with you and examining you.", "description": "Costochondritis is an inflammation of a rib or the cartilage connecting a rib. It is a common cause of\u00a0chest pain.\r\n", "Treatment": "Pain relievers, such as ibuprofen or acetiminophen, are used to treat costochondritis."}, "Chronic myelogenous leukemia (CML)": {"description": "CML causes an uncontrolled growth of immature cells that make a certain type of white blood cell called myeloid cells. The diseased cells build up in the bone marrow and blood.", "Possible Complications": "Blast crisis can lead to complications, including infection, bleeding, fatigue, unexplained fever, and kidney problems. Chemotherapy can have serious side effects, depending on the drugs used.", "Symptoms": ["\r\n  Chronic\r\n  ", "\r\n  Accelerated\r\n  ", "\r\n  Blast crisis\r\n  ", "Bruising", "Excessive sweating (night sweats)", "Fatigue", "Fever", "Pressure under the lower left ribs from a swollen spleen", "Rash - small pinpoint red marks on the skin (petechiae)", "Weakness"], "Exams and Tests": "A physical examination often reveals a swollen spleen. A complete blood count (CBC) shows an increased number of white blood cells with many immature forms present and an increased number of platelets. These are parts of the blood that help blood clot.Other tests that may be done include:Bone marrow biopsy, Blood and bone marrow testing for the presence of the Philadelphia chromosome, Platelet count. ", "Treatment": "Medicines that target the abnormal protein made by the Philadelphia chromosome are usually the first treatment for CML. These medicines can be taken as pills.Sometimes, chemotherapy is used first to reduce the white blood cell count if it is very high at diagnosis.The blast crisis phase is very difficult to treat. This is because there is a very high count of immature white blood cells (leukemia cells).The only known cure for CML is a bone marrow transplant, or stem cell transplant. Most patients, though, do not need a transplant because the targeted medicines are successful. Discuss your options with your oncologist.You and your healthcare provider may need to manage many other issues or concerns during your leukemia treatment, including:Being at home during chemotherapy, Managing your pets during chemotherapy, Bleeding problems, Eating enough calories when you are sick, Swelling and pain in your mouth, Safe eating during cancer treatment. ", "Prevention": "Avoid exposure to radiation when possible.", "Causes": "Cause of CML is related to an abnormal chromosome called the Philadelphia chromosome.Radiation exposure can increase the risk of developing CML. Radiation exposure can be from radiation treatments used in the past to treat thyroid cancer or Hodgkin lymphoma or from a nuclear disaster.It takes many years to develop leukemia from radiation exposure. Most people treated for cancer with radiation do not develop leukemia. Most patients with CML have not been exposed to radiation.CML most often occurs in middle-age adults and in children."}, "Craniotabes": {"description": "Craniotabes is a softening of the skull bones.", "Possible Complications": "There are usually no complications.", "Symptoms": ["Soft areas of the skull, especially along the suture line", "Soft areas pop in and out", "Bones may feel soft, flexible, and thin along the suture lines"], "Exams and Tests": "Typically craniotabes is demonstrated by pressing the bone along the area where the bones of the skull come together. The bone often pops in and out, similar to pressing on a Ping-Pong ball.No testing is done unless osteogenesis imperfecta or rickets is suspected.", "Treatment": "Craniotabes that are not associated with other conditions are not treated.", "Prevention": "Most of the time, craniotabes is not preventable (except when associated with\u00a0rickets\u00a0and\u00a0osteogenesis imperfecta).", "Causes": "Craniotabes can be a normal finding in infants, especially premature infants. Studies suggest it occurs in up to one third of all newborn infants.Craniotabes is a harmless finding in the newborn, unless it is associated with other problems, such as rickets and osteogenesis imperfecta (brittle bones)."}, "Cerebral palsy": {"description": "There are several different types of cerebral palsy, including spastic, dyskinetic, ataxic, hypotonic, and mixed.", "Possible Complications": "Bone thinning or osteoporosis, Bowel obstruction, Hip dislocation and arthritis in the hip joint, Injuries from falls, Joint contractures, Pneumonia caused by choking, Poor nutrition, Reduced communication skills (sometimes), Reduced intellect (sometimes), Scoliosis, Seizures (in about half of patients), Social stigma. ", "Symptoms": ["Be very mild or very severe", "Only involve one side of the body or both sides", "Be more pronounced in either the arms or legs, or involve both the arms and legs", "Muscles that are very tight and do not stretch. They may tighten up even more over time.", "Abnormal walk (gait): arms tucked in toward the sides, knees crossed or touching, legs make \"scissors\" movements, walk on the toes", "Joints are tight and do not open up all the way (called joint contracture)", "Muscle weakness or loss of movement in a group of muscles (paralysis)", "The symptoms may affect one arm or leg, one side of the body, both legs, or both arms and legs", "Abnormal movements (twisting, jerking, or writhing) of the hands, feet, arms, or legs while awake, which gets worse during periods of stress", "Tremors", "Unsteady gait", "Loss of coordination", "Floppy muscles, especially at rest, and joints that move around too much", "Decreased intelligence or learning disabilities are common, but intelligence can be normal", "Speech problems (dysarthria)", "Hearing or vision problems", "Seizures", "Pain, especially in adults (can be difficult to manage)", "Difficulty sucking or feeding in infants, or chewing and swallowing in older children and adults", "Problems swallowing (at all ages)", "Vomiting or constipation", "Increased drooling", "Slower than normal growth", "Irregular breathing", "Urinary incontinence"], "Exams and Tests": "A full neurological exam is critical. In older people, testing cognitive function is also important.The following other tests may be performed:Blood tests, CT scan of the head, Electroencephalogram (EEG), Hearing screen, MRI of the head, Vision testing. ", "Treatment": "There is no cure for cerebral palsy. The goal of treatment is to help the person be as independent as possible.Treatment requires a team approach, including:Primary care doctor, Dentist (dental check-ups are recommended around every 6 months), Social worker, Nurses, Occupational, physical, and speech therapists, Other specialists, including a neurologist, rehabilitation physician, pulmonologist, and gastroenterologist. Treatment is based on the person's symptoms and the need to prevent complications.Self and home care include:Getting enough food and nutrition, Keeping the home safe, Performing exercises recommended by the health care providers, Practicing proper bowel care (stool softeners, fluids, fiber, laxatives, regular bowel habits), Protecting the joints from injury. Putting the child in regular schools is recommended, unless physical disabilities or mental development makes this impossible. Special education or schooling may help.The following may help with communication and learning:Glasses, Hearing aids, Muscle and bone braces, Walking aids, Wheelchairs. Physical therapy, occupational therapy, orthopedic help, or other treatments may also be needed to help with daily activities and care.Medications may include:Anticonvulsants to prevent or reduce the frequency of seizures, Botulinum toxin to help with spasticity and drooling, Muscle relaxants to reduce tremors and spasticity. Surgery may be needed in some cases to:Control gastroesophageal reflux, Cut certain nerves from the spinal cord to help with pain and spasticity, Place feeding tubes, Release joint contractures. ", "Prevention": "Getting the proper prenatal care may reduce the risk of some rare causes of cerebral palsy. In most cases though, the injury causing the disorder is\u00a0not preventable.Pregnant mothers with certain medical conditions may need to be followed in a high-risk prenatal clinic.", "Causes": "Cerebral palsy is caused by injuries or abnormalities of the brain. Most of these problems occur as the baby grows in the womb. But they can happen at any time during the first 2 years of life, while the baby's brain is still developing.In some people with cerebral palsy, parts of the brain are injured due to a low level of oxygen (hypoxia) in the area. It is not known why this occurs.Premature infants have a slightly higher risk of developing cerebral palsy. Cerebral palsy may also occur during early infancy as a result of several conditions, including:Bleeding in the brain, Brain infections (encephalitis, meningitis, herpes simplex infections), Head injury, Infections in the mother during pregnancy (rubella), Severe jaundice. In some cases, the cause of cerebral palsy is never determined."}, "Cystic fibrosis": {"description": "Cystic fibrosis is a disease that causes thick, sticky mucus to build up in the lungs, digestive tract, and other areas of the body. It is one of the most common chronic lung diseases in children and young adults. It is a life-threatening disorder.", "Possible Complications": "The most common complication is chronic respiratory infection.Other complications include:Bowel problems, such as gallstones, intestinal blockage, and rectal prolapse, Coughing up blood, Chronic respiratory failure, Diabetes , Infertility, Liver disease or liver failure, pancreatitis, biliary cirrhosis, Malnutrition, Nasal polyps and sinusitis, Osteoporosis and arthritis, Pneumonia that keeps coming back, Pneumothorax, Right-sided heart failure (cor pulmonale). ", "Symptoms": ["Delayed growth", "Failure to gain weight normally during childhood", "No bowel movements in first 24 to 48 hours of life", "Salty-tasting skin", "Belly pain from severe constipation", "Increased gas, bloating, or a belly that appears swollen (distended)", "Nausea and loss of appetite", "Stools that are pale or clay-colored, foul smelling, have mucus, or that float", "Weight loss", "Coughing or increased mucus in the sinuses or lungs", "Fatigue", "Nasal congestion caused by nasal polyps", "Repeated episodes of pneumonia\u00a0(symptoms of pneumonia in someone with cystic fibrosis include fever, increased coughing and shortness of breath, increased mucus, and loss of appetite)", "Sinus pain or pressure caused by infection or polyps ", "Infertility (in men)", "Repeated inflammation of the pancreas (pancreatitis)", "Respiratory symptoms", "Clubbed fingers "], "Exams and Tests": "A blood test is available to help detect CF. The test looks for\u00a0changes in a gene known to cause the disease. Other tests used to diagnose CF include:Immunoreactive trypsinogen (IRT) test is a standard newborn screening test for CF. A high level of IRT suggests possible CF and requires further testing., Sweat chloride test is the standard diagnostic test for CF. A high salt level in the patient's sweat is a sign of the disease. . Other tests that identify problems that can be related to cystic fibrosis include:Chest x-ray or CT scan, Fecal fat test, Lung function tests, Measurement of pancreatic function, Secretin stimulation test, Trypsin and chymotrypsin in stool, Upper GI and small bowel series. ", "Treatment": "An early diagnosis of CF and treatment plan can improve both survival and quality of life. Follow-up and monitoring are very important. When possible, patients should get care at a cystic fibrosis specialty clinic. When children reach adulthood, they should transfer to a cystic fibrosis specialty center for adults.Treatment for lung problems includes:Antibiotics to prevent and treat lung and sinus infections. They may be taken by mouth, or given in the veins or by breathing treatments. People with cystic fibrosis may take antibiotics only when needed, or all the time. Doses are usually higher than normal., Inhaled medicines to help open the airways, Other medicines that are given by a breathing treatment to thin mucus and make it easier to cough up are DNAse enzyme therapy and highly concentrated salt solutions (hypertonic saline), Flu vaccine and pneumococcal polysaccharide vaccine (PPV) yearly (ask your health care provider), Lung transplant is an option in some cases, Oxygen therapy may be needed as lung disease gets worse . Lung problems are also treated with therapies to thin the mucus. This makes it easier cough the\u00a0mucus out of the lungs. These methods include:Activity or exercise that causes you to breathe deeply, Devices that are used during the day to help clear the airways of too much mucus, Manual chest percussion (or chest physiotherapy), in which a family member or a therapist lightly claps the patient's chest, back, and area under the arms. Treatment for bowel and nutritional problems may include:A special diet high in protein and calories for older children and adults, Pancreatic enzymes to help absorb fats and protein,\u00a0which are taken with every meal, Vitamin supplements, especially vitamins A, D, E, and K, Your doctor can suggest other treatments if you have very hard stools . Care and monitoring\u00a0at home\u00a0should\u00a0include: Avoiding smoke, dust, dirt, fumes, household chemicals, fireplace smoke, and mold or mildew., Drinking plenty of fluids. This is particularly true for infants, children, in hot weather, when there is diarrhea or loose stools, or during extra physical activity., Exercising two or three times each week. Swimming, jogging, and cycling are good options., Clearing or bringing up mucus or secretions from the airways. This must be done one to four times each day. Patients, families, and caregivers must learn about doing chest percussion and postural drainage to help keep the airways clear.. ", "Prevention": "Cystic fibrosis cannot be prevented. Screening those with a family history of the disease may detect the cystic fibrosis gene in many carriers.", "Causes": "Cystic fibrosis (CF) is a disease that is passed down through families. It is caused by a defective gene that makes the body produce abnormally thick and sticky fluid, called mucus. This mucus builds up in the breathing passages of the lungs and in the pancreas.The buildup of mucus results in life-threatening lung infections and serious digestion problems. The disease may also affect the sweat glands and a man's reproductive system.Millions of Americans carry a CF gene, but do not have symptoms. This is because a person with CF must inherit two defective genes, one from each parent. About 1 in 29 Caucasian Americans have the CF gene. It is\u00a0more common among those of northern or central European descent.Most children with CF are diagnosed by age 2. For a small number, the disease is not detected until age 18 or older. These children often have a milder form of the disease."}, "Chronic lymphocytic leukemia (CLL)": {"description": "CLL causes a slow increase in a certain type of white blood cells called B lymphocytes, or B cells. Cancer cells spread through the blood and bone marrow. CLL can also affect the lymph nodes or other organs such as the liver and spleen. CLL eventually can cause the bone marrow to lose its function.", "Possible Complications": "Autoimmune hemolytic anemia, Bleeding from low platelet count, Hypogammaglobulinemia, a condition in which you have lower levels of antibodies, which increases your risk of infection, Idiopathic thrombocytopenic purpura (ITP), Infections that keep coming back (recur), Overwhelming fatigue, Other cancers, including a much more aggressive lymphoma (Richter's transformation), Side effects of chemotherapy . ", "Symptoms": ["Abnormal bruising (if platelets are low)", "Enlarged lymph nodes, liver, or spleen", "Excessive sweating, night sweats", "Fatigue", "Fever", "Infections that keep coming back (recur)", "Loss of appetite or becoming full too quickly (early satiety)", "Weight loss"], "Exams and Tests": "Patients with CLL usually have a high white blood cell count.Tests to diagnose CLL include:Complete blood count (CBC) with white blood cell differential\r\n  , \r\n  Bone marrow biopsy\r\n  , CT scan of the chest, abdomen, and pelvis\r\n  , \r\n  Immunoglobulin testing\r\n  , \r\n  Flow cytometry test of the white blood cells\r\n  . If your doctor discovers you have CLL, tests will be done to see how much the cancer has spread. This is called staging.Tests that look at changes in DNA\u00a0inside the cancer cells may also be done. Results from these tests and from staging tests help your doctor determine your treatment.", "Treatment": "If you have early stage CLL, your doctor will monitor you closely. Usually, no medicines or other treatment is given for early-stage CLL, unless you have: A high-risk or aggressive (grows quickly) type of CLL, Infections that keep coming back, Leukemia that is rapidly getting worse, Low red blood cells or platelet counts, Fatigue, loss of appetite, weight loss, or night sweats, Painful swollen lymph nodes . Chemotherapy medicines are used to treat CLL. Your doctor will determine which ones are right for you.In rare cases, radiation is used for painful and enlarged lymph nodes. Blood transfusions or platelet transfusions may be required if blood counts are low.Bone marrow or stem cell transplantation may be used in younger patients with advanced or high-risk CLL. A transplant is the only therapy that offers a potential cure for CLL, but it also has risks. Your doctor will discuss the risks and benefits with you.", "Causes": "The cause of CLL is unknown. There is no link to radiation. It is not clear whether certain chemicals cause CLL. But exposure to Agent Orange during the Vietnam War has been linked to a slight increased risk of developing CLL.CLL usually affects older adults, especially those older than age 60. Persons under age 45 rarely get it. CLL is more common in whites than in other ethnic groups. It is more common in men than in women. Some persons with CLL have family members with the disease."}, "COPD - what to ask your doctor ": {"description": "Below are some questions you may want to ask your doctor or nurse to help you take care of your lungs."}, "Cystic fibrosis - nutritional considerations": {"description": "Cystic fibrosis\u00a0(CF) is a life-threatening disease that causes thick, sticky mucus to build up in the lungs and digestive tract. Persons with cystic fibrosis need to eat high-calorie and high-protein foods throughout the day."}, "Cyclothymic disorder": {"description": "Cyclothymic disorder is a mental disorder. It is a\u00a0mild form of bipolar disorder (manic depressive illness), in which a person has mood swings over a period of years that go from mild depression to emotional highs.", "Possible Complications": "The condition can progress to bipolar disorder.", "Symptoms": ["Periods (episodes) of extreme happiness and high activity or energy (mania), or low mood, activity, or energy (depression) for at least 2 years (1 or more years in children and adolescents)", "Mood swings (these are less severe than in bipolar disorder or\u00a0major depression)", "Ongoing symptoms, with no more than\u00a02 symptom-free months in a row "], "Exams and Tests": "The diagnosis is usually based on your\u00a0mood history. Your health care provider may order blood and urine tests to rule out medical causes of mood swings.", "Treatment": "Treatments for this disorder include mood-stabilizing medicine, antidepressants, talk therapy, or some combination of these three treatments.Some of the more commonly used mood stabilizers are lithium and antiseizure medicines.Some people\u00a0with cyclothymia may not respond to medications as\u00a0well as patients with bipolar disorder.", "Causes": "The causes of cyclothymic disorder are unknown. Major depression, bipolar disorder, and cyclothymia often occur together in families. This suggests that these mood disorders share similar causes.Cyclothymia usually begins early in life. It appears to be equally common in men and women."}, "Crutches and children - standing and walking": {"description": "\r\n\r\n \r\nHelp your child learn how to stand and walk safely with crutches.\r\n"}, "Chlamydia": {"Symptoms": ["Burning feeling during urination", "Discharge from the penis or rectum", "Tenderness or pain in the testicles", "Rectal discharge or pain ", "Burning feeling during urination", "Painful sexual intercourse", "Rectal pain or discharge", "Symptoms of pelvic inflammatory disease (PID), salpingitis (inflammation of the fallopian tubes), or liver inflammation similar to hepatitis", "Vaginal discharge or bleeding after intercourse"], "Exams and Tests": "If you have symptoms of a chlamydia infection, your health care provider will collect a culture or perform a test called a PCR:The culture will be collected during a pelvic exam in women, or from the tip of the penis or rectum in men., Results will take 1\u00a0to 2 days to come back., Your health care provider may also check you for other types of infections, such as gonorrhea. . Even women with no symptoms may need a chlamydia test if they:Are 25 years old or younger and are sexually active (get tested every year), Have a new sexual partner or more than one partner . Most of these tests may also be done on urine samples. Your health care provider may also check you for syphilis, HIV, hepatitis, trichomoniasis, and herpes.", "description": "Chlamydia is an infection caused by the bacteria Chlamydia trachomatis. It is most often spread through sexual contact.", "Causes": "Both males and females may have chlamydia without having any symptoms. As a result, you may become infected or pass the infection to your partner without knowing it.You are more likely to become infected with chlamydia if you:Have sex without wearing a male or female condom, Have more than one sexual partner, Use drugs or alcohol and then have sex. ", "Treatment": "The usual treatment for chlamydia is antibiotics.Sexual partners must be treated so they do not pass the infection back and forth. A person may become infected with chlamydia many times.A follow-up evaluation may be done in 4 weeks to see if the infection has been cured."}, "Cloudy cornea": {"description": "A cloudy cornea is a loss of transparency of the cornea.", "Causes": "The cornea makes up the front wall of the eye. It is normally clear. It helps\u00a0focus the light entering the eye.Causes of cloudy cornea include:Inflammation, Sensitivity to non-infectious bacteria, Ulcers on the eye, Infection, Keratitis, Trachoma, River blindness, Swelling due to glaucoma, birth injury, or Fuchs' dystrophy, Dryness of the eye due to Sjogren syndrome, vitamin A deficiency, and sometimes after LASIK eye surgery, Dystrophy (inherited metabolic disease), Keratoconus, Injury to the eye, including chemical burns and welding injury, Scarring.  Clouding may affect all or part of the cornea. It leads to different amounts of vision loss. You may not have any symptoms in the early stages.\u00a0"}, "Creating a birth plan": {"description": "Your birth plan should be flexible."}, "Cerebrospinal fluid culture": {"description": "A cerebrospinal fluid (CSF) culture is a laboratory test to look for bacteria, fungi, and viruses in the normally clear fluid that moves in the space\u00a0around the spinal cord."}, "Culture-negative endocarditis": {"description": "Endocarditis is usually a result of a blood infection. Bacteria can enter the bloodstream during certain medical procedures, including dental procedures. Then bacteria can travel to the heart, where they can settle on damaged heart valves."}, "Carrying angle of the elbow - excessive": {"description": "Because the carrying angle varies from person to person, it is important to compare one elbow with the other when evaluating a problem with the carrying angle."}, "Coal worker's pneumoconiosis": {"description": "Coal worker's pneumoconiosis is a lung disease that results from breathing in dust from coal, graphite, or man-made carbon over a long period of time.", "Possible Complications": "Complications may include:Chronic bronchitis, Chronic obstructive pulmonary disease (COPD), Cor pulmonale (failure of the right side of the heart), Respiratory failure. ", "Symptoms": ["Cough", "Shortness of breath"], "Exams and Tests": "The doctor will do a physical exam and listen to your lungs with a stethoscope. A chest x-ray or chest CT scan will be performed. You may also need lung function tests.", "Treatment": "There is no specific treatment for this disorder. You should avoid further exposure to the dust.", "Prevention": "Wear a protective mask when working around coal, graphite, or man-made carbon. Companies should enforce the maximum permitted dust levels. Avoid smoking.", "Causes": "Coal worker's pneumoconiosis occurs in two forms: simple and complicated (also called progressive massive fibrosis, or PMF).Your risk of getting coal worker's pneumoconiosis depends on how long you have been around coal dust. Most people with this disease are older than 50. Smoking does not increase your risk of developing this disease, but it may have an additional harmful effect on the lungs.If coal worker's pneumoconiosis occurs with rheumatoid arthritis, it is called Caplan syndrome."}, "Copper in diet": {"description": "Copper is an essential trace mineral present in all body tissues."}, "Chronic subdural hematoma": {"description": "A chronic subdural hematoma is an \"old\" collection of blood and blood breakdown products between the surface of the brain and its outermost covering (the dura). The chronic phase of a subdural hematoma begins several weeks after the first bleeding.", "Possible Complications": "Permanent brain damage, Persistent symptoms,\u00a0such as\u00a0anxiety, confusion,\u00a0difficulty paying attention, dizziness, headache, and\u00a0memory loss , Seizures . ", "Symptoms": ["Confusion or coma", "Decreased memory", "Difficulty speaking or swallowing", "Difficulty walking", "Drowsiness", "Headache", "Seizures", "Weakness or numbness of arms, legs, face "], "Exams and Tests": "Your health care provider will ask questions about your medical history. The physical exam will carefully check your brain and nervous system to check for problems with:Balance, Coordination, Mental functions, Sensation, Strength, Walking. Because the symptoms and signs are often subtle, if there is any suspicion of a hematoma, a head CT or head MRI scan will be done to further evaluate your symptoms.", "Treatment": "The goal of treatment is to control symptoms and reduce or prevent permanent damage to the brain. Anticonvulsant medications such as carbamazepine, lamotrigine or levetiracetam may be used to control or prevent seizures.Surgery may be needed. This may include drilling small holes in the skull to relieve pressure and allow blood and fluids to be drained. Large hematomas or solid blood clots may need to be removed through a larger opening in the skull (craniotomy).Hematomas that do not cause symptoms may not require treatment. Chronic subdural hematomas often come back after being drained. Therefore, it is sometimes better to leave them alone unless they are causing symptoms.", "Prevention": "Avoid head injuries by using seat belts, bicycle and motorcycle helmets, and hard hats when appropriate.", "Causes": "A subdural hematoma develops when the tiny veins that run between the dura and surface of the brain (bridging veins) tear and leak blood. This is usually the result of a head injury.A collection of blood then forms over the surface of the brain. In a chronic subdural collection, blood leaks from the veins slowly over time, or a fast hemorrhage is left to clear up on its own.A subdural hematoma is more common in the elderly because of normal brain shrinkage that occurs with aging. This shrinkage stretches and weakens the bridging veins. These veins are more likely to break in the elderly, even after a minor head injury. You or your family may not remember any injury that could explain it. Risks include:Long-term heavy alcohol use, Long-term use of aspirin, anti-inflammatory drugs such as ibuprofen, or blood thinning (anticoagulant) medication such as warfarin, Diseases associated with reduced blood clotting, Head injury, Old age. "}, "Concussion - what to ask your doctor - adult ": {"description": "Below are some questions you may want to ask your doctor or nurse to help you take care of your concussion."}, "Collagen vascular disease": {"description": "Collagen vascular diseases include:"}, "Cancer": {"description": "Cancer is the uncontrolled growth of abnormal cells in the body. Cancerous cells are also called malignant cells.", "Possible Complications": "Complications depend on the type and stage of cancer. The cancer may spread. ", "Symptoms": ["Chills", "Fatigue", "Fever", "Loss of appetite", "Malaise", "Night sweats", "Weight loss"], "Exams and Tests": "Like symptoms, the signs of cancer vary based on the type and location of the tumor. Common tests include the following:Biopsy of the tumor, Blood tests (which look for chemicals such as tumor markers), Bone marrow biopsy (for lymphoma or leukemia), Chest x-ray, Complete blood count (CBC), CT scan, Liver function tests, MRI scan, PET scan. Most cancers are diagnosed by biopsy. Depending on the location of the tumor, the biopsy may be a simple procedure or a serious operation. Most patients with cancer have CT scans to determine the exact location and size of the tumor or tumors.A cancer diagnosis is often difficult to cope with. It is important that you discuss the type, size, and location of the cancer with your\u00a0health care provider\u00a0when you are diagnosed. You also will want to ask about treatment options, along with their benefits and risks.It's a good idea to have someone with you at the provider's office to help you get through the diagnosis. If you have trouble asking questions after hearing about your diagnosis, the person you bring with you can ask them for you.", "Treatment": "Treatment varies based on the type of cancer and its stage. The stage of a cancer refers to how much it has grown and whether the tumor has spread from its original location.If the cancer is in one location and has not spread, the most common treatment approach is surgery to cure the cancer. This is often the case with skin cancers, as well as cancers of the lung, breast, and colon., If the tumor has spread to local lymph nodes only, sometimes these can be removed., If surgery cannot remove all of the cancer, the options for treatment may include radiation, chemotherapy, targeted cancer therapies, or other types of treatment. Some cancers require a combination of treatments. Lymphoma, or cancer of the lymph glands, is rarely treated with surgery. Chemotherapy, radiation therapy, and other nonsurgical therapies are often used.. Although treatment for cancer can be difficult, there are many ways to keep up your strength.If you have radiation treatment:Treatment is usually scheduled every weekday., You should allow 30 minutes for each treatment session, although the treatment itself usually takes only a few minutes., You should get plenty of rest and eat a well-balanced diet during the course of your radiation therapy., Skin in the treated area may become sensitive and easily irritated., Some side effects of radiation treatment are temporary. They vary depending on the area of the body that is being treated. . If you have chemotherapy:Eat right., Get plenty of rest, and don't feel like you have to accomplish tasks all at once., Avoid people with colds or the flu. Chemotherapy can cause your immune system to weaken.. Talk with family, friends, or a support group about your feelings. Work with your health care providers throughout your treatment. Helping yourself can make you feel more in control.", "Prevention": "You can reduce the risk of getting a cancerous (malignant) tumor by:Eating healthy foods, Exercising regularly, Limiting alcohol, Maintaining a healthy weight, Minimizing your exposure to radiation and toxic chemicals, Not smoking or chewing tobacco, Reducing sun exposure, especially if you burn easily. Cancer screenings, such as mammography and breast examination for breast cancer and colonoscopy for colon cancer, may help catch these cancers at their early stages when they are most treatable. Some people at high risk for developing certain cancers can take medication to reduce their risk.", "Causes": "Cancer grows out of cells in the body. Normal cells multiply when the body needs them, and die when they are damaged or the body doesn't need them. Cancer appears to occur when the genetic material of a cell becomes changed. This results in cells growing out of control. Cells divide too quickly and do not die in a normal way.There are many kinds of cancer. Cancer can develop in almost any organ or tissue, such as the lung, colon, breast, skin, bones, or nerve tissue.There are many risk factors for cancer, including:Benzene and other chemicals, Drinking too much alcohol, Environmental toxins, such as certain poisonous mushrooms and a type of poison that can grow on peanut plants (aflatoxins), Genetic problems, Obesity , Radiation exposure, Too much sunlight exposure, Viruses. The cause of many cancers remains unknown.The most common cause of cancer-related death is lung cancer.In the U.S., skin cancer is the most commonly diagnosed cancer.In U.S. men, other than skin cancer the three most common cancers are:Prostate cancer, Lung cancer, Colorectal cancer. In U.S. women, other than skin cancer the three most common cancers are:Breast cancer, Lung cancer, Colorectal cancer. Some cancers are more common in certain parts of the world. For example, in Japan, there are many cases of stomach cancer. But in the United States, this type of cancer is less common. Differences in diet or environmental factors may play a role.Some other types of cancer include:Brain cancer, Cervical cancer, Hodgkin lymphoma, Kidney cancer, Leukemia, Liver cancer, Non-Hodgkin lymphoma, Ovarian cancer, Pancreatic cancer, Testicular cancer, Thyroid cancer, Uterine cancer. "}, "Cardiac glycoside overdose": {"Symptoms": ["Blurred vision", "Halos around objects (yellow, green, white)* ", "Allergic reaction (See also: Stevens-Johnson syndrome)", "Hives", "Rash ", "Diarrhea", "Loss of appetite*", "Nausea", "Stomach pain", "Vomiting ", "Irregular heartbeat (or slow heartbeat)", "Weakness", "Confusion", "Depression*", "Disorientation", "Drowsiness", "Fainting", "Hallucinations*", "Headache", "Lethargy", "Apathy (not caring what happens) "], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Calcium carbonate with magnesium overdose": {"Symptoms": ["Bone pain (from chronic overuse)", "Constipation", "Decreased reflexes", "Diarrhea", "Dry mouth", "Irregular heartbeat", "Poor balance", "Shallow, rapid breathing", "Stupor (lack of alertness)"], "description": "See also: Calcium carbonate overdose"}, "Congenital cataract": {"description": "A congenital cataract is a clouding of the lens of the eye that is present at birth. The lens of the eye is normally clear. It focuses light that comes into the eye onto the retina.", "Possible Complications": "With cataract surgery there is a very slight risk of:Bleeding, Infection, Inflammation. Infants who have surgery for congenital cataracts are likely to develop another type of cataract, which may need further surgery or laser treatment.Many of the diseases that are associated with congenital cataract can also affect other organs.", "Symptoms": ["An infant doesn\u2019t seem to be visually aware of the world around him or her (if cataracts are in both eyes)", "Gray or white cloudiness of the pupil (which is normally black)", "The \"red eye\" glow of the pupil is missing in photos, or is different between the two eyes", "Unusual rapid eye movements (nystagmus)"], "Exams and Tests": "To diagnose congenital cataract, the infant should have a complete eye examination by an ophthalmologist. The infant may also need to be examined by a pediatrician who is experienced in treating inherited disorders. Blood tests or x-rays may also be needed.", "Treatment": "If congenital cataracts are mild and do not affect vision, they may not need to be treated, especially if they are in both eyes.Moderate to severe cataracts that affect vision, or a cataract that is in only one eye, will need to be treated with cataract removal surgery. In most (noncongenital) cataract surgeries, an artificial intraocular lens (IOL) is inserted into the eye. The use of IOLs in infants is controversial. Without an IOL, the infant will need to wear a contact lens.Patching to force the child to use the weaker eye is often needed to prevent amblyopia.The infant may also need to be treated for the inherited disorder that is causing the cataracts.", "Prevention": "If you have a family history of inheritable disorders that could cause congenital cataracts, consider seeking genetic counseling.", "Causes": "Unlike most cataracts, which occur with aging, congenital cataracts are present at birth.Congenital cataracts are rare. In most patients, no cause can be found.Congenital cataracts often occur as part of the following birth defects:Chondrodysplasia syndrome, Congenital rubella, Conradi syndrome, Down syndrome (trisomy 21), Ectodermal dysplasia syndrome, Familial congenital cataracts, Galactosemia, Hallerman-Streiff syndrome, Lowe syndrome, Marinesco-Sjogren syndrome, Pierre-Robin syndrome, Trisomy 13. "}, "Cooking utensils and nutrition": {"description": "Cooking utensils can have an effect on your nutrition."}, "Chemical burn or reaction": {"Symptoms": ["Abdominal pain", "Breathing difficulty", "Bright red or bluish skin and lips", "Convulsions (seizures)", "Dizziness", "Headache", "Hives, itching, swelling, nausea, vomiting, or weakness resulting from an allergic reaction", "Irritability", "Pain where the skin has come in contact with the toxic substance", "Rash, blisters, burns on the skin", "Unconsciousness"], "description": "Chemicals that touch skin can lead to a reaction on the skin, throughout the body, or both.", "Prevention": "All chemicals should be stored out of the reach of young children -- preferably in a locked cabinet., Avoid mixing different products that contain toxic chemicals such as ammonia and bleach. The mixture can give off hazardous fumes., Avoid prolonged (even low-level) exposure to chemicals., Avoid using potentially toxic substances in the kitchen or around food., Buy potentially poisonous substance in safety containers, and buy only as much as needed., Many household products are made of toxic chemicals. It is important to read and follow label instructions, including any precautions., Never store household products in food or drink containers. Leave them in their original containers with the labels intact., Store chemicals safely immediately after use., Use paints, petroleum products, ammonia, bleach, and other products that give off fumes only in a well-ventilated area.. "}, "Congenital toxoplasmosis": {"description": "Congenital toxoplasmosis is a group of symptoms that occur when an unborn baby (fetus) is infected with the parasite Toxoplasma gondii.", "Possible Complications": "Hydrocephalus, Blindness or severe visual disability, Severe intellectual disability or other neurological problems. ", "Symptoms": ["Enlarged liver and spleen\r\n  ", "Vomiting\r\n  ", "Eye damage from inflammation of the retina or other parts of the eye\r\n  ", "Feeding problems\r\n  ", "Hearing loss\r\n  ", "Jaundice (yellow skin)\r\n  ", "Low birth weight (intrauterine growth restriction)\r\n  ", "Skin rash (tiny red spots or bruising) at birth\r\n  ", "Vision problems\r\n  ", "Seizures\r\n  ", "Intellectual disability\r\n  "], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider will examine the baby. The baby may have:Swollen spleen and liver, Yellow skin (jaundice), Inflammation of the eyes, Fluid on the brain (hydrocephalus), Swollen lymph nodes (lymphadenopathy), Large head size (macrocephaly) or smaller-than-normal head size (microcephaly). Tests that may be done during pregnancy include:Amniotic fluid testing and fetal blood testing, Antibody titer, Ultrasound of the abdomen. After birth, the following tests may be done on the baby:Antibody studies on cord blood and cerebrospinal fluid, CT scan of the brain, MRI scan of the brain, Neurological exams, Standard eye exam, Toxoplasmosis test. ", "Treatment": "Spiramycin can treat infection in the pregnant mother.Pyrimethamine and sulfadiazine can treat fetal infection (diagnosed during the pregnancy).Treatment of infants with congenital toxoplasmosis most often includes pyrimethamine, sulfadiazine, and leucovorin for one year. Infants are also sometimes given steroids if their vision is threatened or if the protein level in the spinal fluid is high.", "Prevention": "Women who are pregnant or planning to become pregnant can be tested to find out if they are at risk for the infection.Pregnant women who have cats as house pets may be at higher risk. They should avoid contact with cat feces, or things that could be contaminated by insects exposed to cat feces (cockroaches, flies, etc.).\r\nAlso, cook meat until it is well done, and wash your hands after handling raw meat to avoid getting the parasite.", "Causes": "Toxoplasmosis infection can be passed to a developing baby if the mother becomes infected while pregnant. The infection spreads to the developing baby across the placenta. Most of the time, the infection is mild in the mother. The woman may not be aware she has the parasite. However, infection of the developing baby can cause serious problems. Problems are worse if the infection occurs in early pregnancy."}, "Cleft lip and palate": {"Symptoms": ["Change in nose shape (how much the shape changes varies)", "Poorly aligned teeth", "Failure to gain weight", "Feeding problems", "Flow of milk through nasal passages during feeding", "Poor growth", "Repeated ear infections", "Speech difficulties"], "Exams and Tests": "A physical examination of the mouth, nose, and palate confirms a cleft lip or cleft palate. Medical tests may be done to rule out other possible health conditions.", "description": "Cleft lip and palate are birth defects that affect the upper lip and the roof of the mouth.", "Causes": "There are many causes of cleft lip and palate. Problems with genes passed down from one or both parents, drugs, viruses, or other toxins can all cause these birth defects. Cleft lip and palate may occur along with other syndromes or birth defects.A cleft lip and palate can:Affect the appearance of the face, Lead to problems with feeding and speech, Lead to ear infections. Risk factors include a family history of cleft lip or palate and other birth defects. About 1 out of 2,500 people have a cleft palate.", "Treatment": "Surgery to close the cleft lip is often done when the child is between 6 weeks and 9 months old. Surgery may be needed later in life if the problem has a big effect on the nose area. See also: Cleft lip and palate repairA cleft palate is usually closed within the first year of life so that the child's speech develops normally. Sometimes a prosthetic device is temporarily used to close the palate so the baby can feed and grow until surgery can be done.Continued follow-up may be needed with speech therapists and orthodontists."}, "Carbohydrates": {"description": "Carbohydrates are one of the basic food groups. This category of foods includes sugars, starches, and fiber."}, "Childhood disintegrative disorder": {"Symptoms": ["Delay or lack of spoken language", "Impairment in nonverbal behaviors", "Inability to start or maintain a conversation", "Lack of play", "Loss of bowel and bladder control", "Loss of language or communication skills", "Loss of motor skills", "Loss of social skills", "Problems forming relationships with other children and family members"], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider will determine whether the child has this disorder, or a similar condition such as childhood schizophrenia or pervasive developmental disorder (autism).The most important sign of childhood disintegrative disorder is the loss of developmental milestones. Generally, the diagnosis is made if the child has lost function in at least two areas of development.", "description": "Childhood disintegrative disorder is a condition in which children develop normally through age 3 or 4. Then, over a few months, children lose language, motor, social, and other skills that they already learned.", "Causes": "The cause of childhood disintegrative disorder is unknown, but it has been linked to brain and nervous system problems. A child who is affected loses:Communication skills, Nonverbal behaviors, Skills they had already learned. The condition is similar to autistic disorder (autism).", "Treatment": "Treatment is the same as for autistic disorder (autism) because the two disorders are similar.One experimental treatment uses steroid medications to slow the progression of the condition."}, "Chagas disease": {"description": "Chagas disease is an illness spread by insects. It is common in South and Central America.", "Possible Complications": "Chagas disease can cause these complications:Enlarged colon, Enlarged esophagus with swallowing difficulty, Heart disease, Heart failure, Malnutrition. ", "Symptoms": ["Fever", "General ill feeling", "Swelling of an eye if the bite is near the eye", "Swollen red area at site of the insect bite ", "Constipation", "Digestive problems", "Heart failure", "Pain in the abdomen", "Pounding or raging heart", "Swallowing difficulties "], "Exams and Tests": "Physical examination can confirm the symptoms. Signs of Chagas disease may include:Disease of the heart muscle, Enlarged liver and spleen, Enlarged lymph nodes, Irregular heartbeat, Rapid heartbeat . Tests include:Blood culture to look for signs of infection, Chest x-ray, Echocardiogram (uses sound waves to create pictures of the heart), Electrocardiogram (ECG, tests electrical activity in the heart), Enzyme-linked immunoassay (ELISA) to look for signs of infection, Peripheral blood smear to look for signs of infection . ", "Treatment": "The acute phase and reactivated Chagas disease should be treated. Infants born with the infection should also be treated.Treating the chronic phase is recommended for children and most adults. Adults with chronic Chagas disease should talk to their health care provider to decide whether treatment is needed.Two drugs are used to treat this infection: benznidazole and nifurtimox.Both drugs often have side effects. The side effects may be worse in older people. They may include:Headaches and dizziness, Loss of appetite and weight loss, Nerve damage, Problems sleeping, Skin rashes . ", "Prevention": "Insect control with insecticides and houses that are less likely to have high insect populations will help control the spread of the disease.Blood banks in Central and South America screen donors for exposure to the parasite. The blood is discarded if the donor has the parasite. Most blood banks in the United States began screening for Chagas disease in 2007.", "Causes": "Chagas disease is caused by the parasite Trypanosoma cruzi. It is spread by the bite of reduviid bugs and is one of the major health problems in South America. Due to immigration, the disease also affects people in the United States.Risk factors for Chagas disease include:Living in a hut where reduviid bugs live in the walls, Living in Central or South America, Poverty, Receiving a blood transfusion from a person who carries the parasite but does not have active Chagas disease . "}, "Cancer - vulva": {"description": "Vulvar cancer is cancer that starts in the vulva. Vulvar cancer most often affects the labia, the folds of skin outside the vagina. In some cases, vulvar cancer starts on the clitoris or in glands on the sides of the vagina opening. ", "Possible Complications": "Complications may include:Spread of the cancer to other areas of the body, Side effects of radiation, surgery, or chemotherapy . ", "Symptoms": ["Mole or freckle, which may be pink, red, white, or gray", "Skin thickening or lump", "Skin sore (ulcer) ", "Pain or burning with urination", "Pain with intercourse", "Unusual odor "], "Exams and Tests": "The following tests are used to diagnose vulvar cancer:Biopsy, CT scan or MRI of the pelvis to look for cancer spread, Pelvic examination to look for any skin changes . ", "Treatment": "Treatment involves surgery to remove the cancer cells. If the tumor is large (more than 2 cm) or has grown deeply into the skin, the lymph nodes in the groin area may also be removed.Radiation, with or without chemotherapy, may be used to treat advanced tumors or vulvar cancer that comes back.", "Prevention": "Practicing safer sex may decrease your risk of vulvar cancer. This includes using condoms to protect against sexually transmitted infections (STIs).A vaccine is available to protect against certain forms of HPV infection. The vaccine is approved to prevent cervical cancer and genital warts. It may help prevent other cancers linked to HPV, such as vulvar cancer. The vaccine is given to young girls before they become sexually active, and to adolescents and women up to age 26.Routine pelvic exams can help diagnose vulvar cancer at an earlier stage. Earlier diagnosis improves your chances that treatment will be successful.", "Causes": "Most vulvar cancers begin in skin cells called squamous cells. Other vulvar cancers are:\r\n  Adenocarcinoma\r\n  , \r\n  Basal cell carcinoma\r\n  , \r\n  Melanoma\r\n  , \r\n  Sarcoma\r\n  . Vulvar cancer is rare. Risk factors include:Human papilloma virus (HPV, or genital warts) infection in women under age 50, Chronic skin changes such as lichen sclerosis or squamous hyperplasia in women over age 50, History of cervical cancer or vaginal cancer, Smoking . Women with a condition called vulvar intraepithelial neoplasia (VIN) have a high risk of developing vulvar cancer that spreads. Most cases of VIN, though, never lead to cancer."}, "Candles poisoning": {"Symptoms": [], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Campylobacter serology test": {"description": "Campylobacter serology test is a blood test to look for antibodies to a bacteria called campylobacter."}, "Clubfoot repair": {"description": "Clubfoot repair is surgery to correct a birth defect of the foot and ankle."}, "Changing your sleep habits": {"description": "Insomnia is difficulty falling asleep or staying asleep. In many cases, you can relieve insomnia by making a few simple lifestyle changes. However, it may take some time if you've had the same sleep habits for years."}, "Confusion": {"description": "Confusion is the inability to think as clearly or quickly as you normally do. You may feel disoriented and have difficulty paying attention, remembering, and making decisions.", "Causes": "Confusion may be caused by different health problems, such as:Alcohol or drug intoxication, Brain tumor, Head trauma or head injury (concussion), Fever, Fluid and electrolyte imbalance, Illness in an elderly person, such as loss of brain function (dementia) , Illness in a person with existing neurological disease, such as a stroke, Infections, Lack of sleep (sleep deprivation), Low blood sugar, Low levels of oxygen (for example, from chronic lung disorders), Medications, Nutritional deficiencies, especially niacin, thiamine, or vitamin B12, Seizures, Sudden drop in body temperature (hypothermia). "}, "Claw foot": {"description": "Claw foot is a deformity of the foot. The toe\u00a0joint nearest the ankle is bent upward and the other toe joints are bent downward. The toe looks like a claw.", "Causes": "Ankle fractures or surgery, Cerebral palsy, Charcot-Marie-Tooth disease, Other brain and nervous system disorders, Rheumatoid arthritis. "}, "Cardiac catheterization": {"description": "Cardiac catheterization involves passing a thin flexible tube (catheter) into the right or left side of the heart. The catheter is most often inserted from the groin or the arm."}, "Crutches and children - proper fit and safety tips": {"description": "\r\n\r\n \r\nAfter surgery or an injury, your child may need crutches to walk. Your child needs crutches for support so that she doesnot put weight on her hurt leg. Using crutches isn\u2019t easy and takes practice. Make sure that your child\u2019s crutches fit right and learn some safety tips.\r\n"}, "Cat scratch disease": {"description": "Cat scratch disease is an infection with Bartonella bacteria that is believed to be transmitted by cat scratches and bites.", "Possible Complications": "Complications may include:Encephalopathy, Neuroretinitis, Osteomyelitis, Parinaud's syndrome (granulomatous conjunctivitis with adenopathy) . ", "Symptoms": ["Bump (papule) or blister (pustule) at site of injury (usually the first sign)", "Fatigue", "Fever (in some people)", "Headache", "Lymph node swelling (lymphadenopathy) near the site of the scratch or bite", "Overall discomfort (malaise) ", "Loss of appetite", "Sore throat", "Weight loss "], "Exams and Tests": "If you have swollen lymph nodes and a scratch or bite from a cat, your health care provider may suspect cat scratch disease.A physical examination may also reveal an enlarged spleen.Occasionally, an infected lymph node may form a tunnel (fistula) through the skin and drain (leak fluid).This disease is often not found because it is hard to diagnose. The Bartonella henselae IFA blood test is an accurate way to detect the infection caused by these bacteria. The results of this test must be considered along with other information from your medical history, lab tests, or biopsy.A lymph node biopsy may also be done to look for other causes of swollen glands.", "Treatment": "Generally, cat scratch disease is not serious. Medical treatment may not be needed. In some cases, treatment with antibiotics such as azithromycin can be helpful. Other antibiotics may be used, including clarithromycin, rifampin, trimethoprim-sulfamethoxazole, or ciprofloxacin.In AIDS patients and other people who have a weakened immune system, cat scratch disease is more serious. Treatment with antibiotics is recommended.", "Prevention": "Avoid contact with cats to prevent the disease. If this is not possible, wash your hands thoroughly after playing with a cat, avoid scratches and bites, and avoid cat saliva to reduce your risk of infection.", "Causes": "Cat scratch disease is caused by Bartonella henselae. The disease is spread through contact with an infected cat (a bite or scratch). It also can be spread through contact with cat saliva on broken skin or mucosal surfaces like those in the nose, mouth, and eyes."}, "Closed suction drain with bulb": {"description": "Ask your provider when you may take a shower while you have this drain. You may be asked to take a sponge bath until the drain is removed."}, "Calcium supplements": {"description": "Always tell your health care provider and pharmacist if you are taking extra calcium. Calcium supplements may change the way your body absorbs some medicines. These include certain types of antibiotics and iron pills. Taking extra calcium over a long period of time raises the risk of kidney stones in some people."}, "Celiac disease - nutritional considerations": {"description": "Carefully following a gluten-free diet helps prevent symptoms of the disease."}, "CSF-VDRL test": {"description": "The CSF-VDRL test is used to help diagnose neurosyphilis. It looks for substances called antibodies, which are sometimes produced by the body in reaction to the syphilis-causing bacteria."}, "Colic and crying - self-care": {"Symptoms": [], "description": "If you have a baby that has colic, you are not alone. About 1 in 5 babies cry enough that people call them colicky. Colic usually starts when a babies are about 3 weeks old. It gets worse when they are between 4 to 6 weeks old. Most of the time, colicky babies start getting better after they are 6 weeks old, and it is completely gone by the time they are 12 weeks old."}, "Choosing the best doctor": {"description": "Use care when reviewing patient satisfaction scores. You are more likely to see telltale trends if a health care provider has been reviewed by 40 people rather than 4. Read the results closely. Poor scores for this office don't necessarily reflect on the health care provider, who may be one of many providers in a busy practice."}, "Communicating with someone with aphasia": {"description": "The most common cause of aphasia is stroke. Recovery may take up to 2 years, though not everyone fully recovers. Aphasia may also be due to the brain losing function, such as with Alzheimer disease. In such cases, aphasia will not get better."}, "Creatinine clearance test": {"description": "Creatinine is a breakdown product of creatine, which is an important part of muscle."}, "Cardiogenic shock": {"description": "Cardiogenic shock is when the heart\u00a0has been damaged so much that it is unable\u00a0to supply enough blood to the organs of the body. ", "Possible Complications": "Brain damage, Kidney damage, Liver damage. ", "Symptoms": ["Chest pain or pressure", "Coma", "Decreased urination", "Fast breathing", "Fast pulse", "Heavy sweating, moist skin ", "Lightheadedness", "Loss of alertness and ability to concentrate", "Restlessness, agitation, confusion", "Shortness of breath", "Skin that feels cool to the touch", "Pale skin color or blotchy skin", "Weak (thready) pulse"], "Exams and Tests": "An exam will show:Low blood pressure (most often less than 90 systolic), Blood pressure that drops more than 10 points when you stand up after lying down (orthostatic hypotension), Weak (thready) pulse . To diagnose cardiogenic shock, a catheter (tube) may be placed in the lung artery (right heart catheterization). Tests may show that blood is backing up into the lungs and the heart is not pumping well.Tests include:Cardiac catheterization, Chest x-ray, Coronary angiography, Echocardiogram, Electrocardiogram, Nuclear scan of the heart . Other studies may be done to find out why the heart is not working properly.Lab tests include:Arterial blood gas, Blood chemistry (chem-7, chem-20, electrolytes), Cardiac enzymes (troponin, CKMB), Complete blood count (CBC), Thyroid stimulating hormone (TSH) . ", "Treatment": "Cardiogenic shock is a medical emergency. You will need to stay in the hospital, most often in the Intensive Care Unit. The goal of treatment is to find and treat the cause of shock to save your life.You may need medicines to increase blood pressure and improve heart function, including:Dobutamine, Dopamine, Epinephrine, Levosimendan, Milrinone, Norepinephrine . These medicines may help in the short-term. They are not often used for a long time.When a heart rhythm disturbance (dysrhythmia) is serious, urgent treatment may be needed to restore a normal heart rhythm. This may include:Electrical \"shock\" therapy (defibrillation or cardioversion), Implanting a temporary pacemaker, Medications given through a vein (IV) . You may also receive:Pain medicine, Oxygen, Fluids, blood, and blood products through a vein (IV) . Other treatments for shock may include:Cardiac catheterization with coronary angioplasty and stenting, Heart monitoring to guide treatment, Heart surgery (coronary artery bypass surgery, heart valve replacement, left ventricular assist device), Intra-aortic balloon counterpulsation (IABP) to help the heart work better, Pacemaker, Ventricular assist device or other mechanical support . ", "Prevention": "You may reduce the risk of developing cardiogenic shock by:Quickly treating its cause (such as heart attack or heart valve problem), Preventing and treating the risk factors for heart disease, such as diabetes, high blood pressure, high cholesterol and triglycerides, or tobacco use. ", "Causes": "The most common causes are serious heart complications. Many of these occur during or after a heart attack (myocardial infarction). These complications include:A large section of heart muscle that no longer moves well or does not move at all, Breaking open (rupture) of the heart muscle due to damage from the heart attack, Dangerous heart rhythms, such as ventricular tachycardia, ventricular fibrillation, or supraventricular tachycardia, Pressure on the heart due to a buildup of fluid around it (pericardial tamponade), Tear or rupture of the muscles or tendons that support the heart valves, especially the mitral valve, Tear or rupture of the wall (septum) between the left and right ventricles (lower heart chambers), Very slow heart rhythm (bradycardia) or problem with the electrical system of the heart (heart block) . Cardiogenic shock occurs when the heart is unable to pump as much blood as the body needs."}, "Chlorinated lime poisoning": {"Symptoms": ["Severe change in the acid level in the blood (pH balance), which leads to damage in all of the body organs", "Loss of vision", "Severe pain in the throat", "Severe pain or burning in the nose, eyes, ears, lips, or tongue", "Blood in the stool", "Burns and possible holes in the\u00a0throat (esophagus)", "Severe abdominal pain", "Vomiting", "Vomiting blood", "Collapse", "Low blood pressure that develops rapidly", "Breathing difficulty (from breathing in the chlorinated lime)", "Throat swelling (which may also cause breathing difficulty)", "Burns", "Holes (necrosis) in the skin or tissues underneath", "Irritation"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Congenital heart defect - corrective surgery": {"description": "Congenital heart defect corrective surgery\u00a0fixes or treats a\u00a0heart defect that a child is born with. A baby born with one or more\u00a0heart defects has congenital heart disease. Surgery is needed if the defect is dangerous to the child\u2019s health or well-being."}, "CO2 blood test": {"description": "In the body, most of the CO2 is in the form of a substance called bicarbonate (HCO3-). Therefore, the CO2 blood test is really a measure of your blood bicarbonate level."}, "Chemical pneumonitis": {"description": "Chemical pneumonitis is inflammation of the lungs or breathing difficulty due to inhaling chemical fumes or breathing in and choking on certain chemicals.", "Possible Complications": "Respiratory failure and death can occur.", "Symptoms": ["Air hunger (feeling that you cannot get enough air)", "Breathing that sounds\u00a0wet or gurgling (abnormal lung sounds)", "Cough", "Difficulty breathing", "Unusual sensation (possibly burning feeling) in the chest ", "Cough (may or may not occur)", "Progressive disability (related to shortness of breath)", "Rapid breathing (tachypnea)", "Shortness of breath with only mild exercise "], "Exams and Tests": "The following tests help determine how severely the lungs are affected:Blood gas, CT scan of chest, Lung function studies, X-ray of the chest, Swallowing studies. ", "Treatment": "Treatment is focused on reversing the cause of inflammation and reducing symptoms. Corticosteroids may be given to reduce inflammation, especially before long-term\u00a0scarring occurs.Antibiotics are usually not helpful or needed. Oxygen therapy may be helpful.In cases of swallowing and stomach problems, eating small meals in the upright position can help. In severe cases, a feeding tube in the stomach is needed.", "Prevention": "Only use household chemicals as directed, and always in well-ventilated areas. Never mix ammonia and bleach.Follow work rules regarding breathing masks and wear the\u00a0right mask. People who work near fire should take care to limit their\u00a0exposure to smoke or gases.Be careful about giving mineral oil to anyone who might choke on it (children or the elderly).Do not\u00a0siphon gas or kerosene.", "Causes": "Many household and industrial chemicals can produce both an acute and a chronic form of inflammation in the lungs.Some of the most common dangerous, inhaled substances include:Chlorine gas (which are breathed in from cleaning materials such as chlorine bleach,\u00a0during industrial accidents, or near swimming pools), Grain and fertilizer dust, Noxious fumes from pesticides, Smoke (from house fires and wildfires). Chronic chemical pneumonitis can occur after only low levels of exposure to the irritant over a long time. This causes inflammation and may lead to stiffness of the lungs. As a result, the lungs start to lose their ability to get oxygen to the body. Untreated, this condition\u00a0can cause\u00a0respiratory failure and death.Chronic aspiration of acid from the stomach and exposure to chemical warfare can also lead to chemical pneumonitis."}, "Chicken soup and sickness": {"description": "Although researchers have not been able to prove that chicken soup helps cure the common cold or other illnesses, you may want to take advantage of these apparent healing properties."}, "Cluster headache": {"description": "Cluster headaches may be confused with other common types of headaches such as migraines, sinus headache, and tension headache.", "Symptoms": ["Burning, sharp, or steady", "Felt on one side of the face from neck to temple, even involving the eye", "At its worst within 5 to 10 minutes, with strongest pain lasting 30 minutes to 2 hours ", "Swelling under or around the eye (may affect both eyes)", "Excessive tearing", "Red eye", "Runny nose or stuffy nose on the same side as the head pain", "Red, flushed face"], "Exams and Tests": "Your health care provider can diagnose this type of headache by performing a physical exam and asking about your symptoms and medical history.If a physical exam is done during an attack, the exam will usually reveal Horner syndrome (one-sided eyelid drooping or a small pupil). These symptoms will not be present at other times. No other nervous system (neurologic) changes will be seen.Tests, such as an MRI of the head, may be needed to rule out other causes\u00a0of the headaches.", "Causes": "Scientists do not know exactly what causes cluster headaches. They seem to be related to the body's sudden release of histamine (chemical in the body released during an allergy response) or serotonin (chemical made by nerve cells). A problem in a small area at the base of the brain called the hypothalamus may be involved.More men than women are affected. The headache can occur at any age, but are most common in adolescence and middle age. They tend to run in families.Cluster headaches may be triggered by:Alcohol and cigarette smoking, High altitudes (trekking, air travel), Bright light (including sunlight), Exertion (physical activity), Heat (hot weather, hot baths), Foods high in nitrites (such as bacon and preserved meats), Certain medicines, Cocaine. ", "Prevention": "If you smoke, now is a good time to stop. Alcohol use and any foods that trigger a cluster headache may need to be avoided. Medicines may prevent cluster headaches in some cases.", "Treatment": "Treatment for cluster headaches involves:Medicines to treat the pain when it happens, Medicines to prevent the headaches. TREATING CLUSTER HEADACHES WHEN THEY OCCURYour doctor may recommend the following treatments for when the headaches occurs:Triptans, such as sumatriptan (Imitrex), Anti-inflammatory (steroid) medicines such as prednisone -- starting with a high dose, then slowly decreasing it over 2 to 3 weeks, Breathing in 100% (pure) oxygen, Injections of dihydroergotamine (DHE), which can stop cluster attacks within 5 minutes (Warning: this drug can be dangerous if taken with sumatriptan) . You may need more than one of these treatments to control your headache. Your doctor may have you try several medicines before deciding which works best for you.Pain medicines and narcotics do not usually relieve cluster headache pain, because they take too long to work.PREVENTING CLUSTER HEADACHESAvoid smoking, alcohol use, certain foods, and other things that trigger your headaches. A headache diary can help you identify your headache triggers. When you get a headache, write down the following: Day and time the pain began , What you ate and drank over the past 24 hours , How much you slept , What you were doing and where you were right before the pain started , How long the headache lasted and what made it stop. Review your diary with your doctor to identify triggers or a pattern to your headaches. This can help you and your doctor create a treatment plan. Knowing your triggers can help you avoid them. The headaches may go away on their own. Or you may need treatment to prevent them. The following medicines may also be used to treat or prevent headache symptoms:Allergy medicines, Antidepressants, Blood pressure medicines, Seizure medicine. In rare cases, a device that delivers tiny electrical signals to a certain nerve near the brain may be placed. This device is called a neurostimulator. Your doctor can tell you if this treatment is right for you."}, "Constipation - what to ask your doctor": {"description": "Below are some questions you may want to ask your doctor or nurse to help you take care of your constipation."}, "Corneal transplant": {"description": "The cornea is the clear outer lens on the front of the eye. A corneal transplant is surgery to replace the cornea with tissue from a donor. It is one of the most common transplants done."}, "Cholesterol - drug treatment": {"description": "Statins are thought to be the best drugs to use for people who need medicines to lower their cholesterol."}, "Cerebral angiography": {"description": "Cerebral angiography is a procedure that uses a special dye (contrast material) and x-rays to see how blood flows through the brain."}, "Chromosome": {"description": "Chromosomes also contain proteins that help DNA exist in the proper form. "}, "Congenital heart disease": {"description": "Congenital heart disease\u00a0is a problem with the heart's structure and function that is present at birth.", "Symptoms": [], "Exams and Tests": "Most congenital heart defects are found during a pregnancy ultrasound. When a defect is found, a pediatric heart doctor, surgeon, and other specialists can be there when the baby is delivered. Having medical care ready at the delivery\u00a0can mean the difference between life and death for some babies.Which tests are done on the baby depend on the defect, and the symptoms. ", "Causes": "Congenital heart disease (CHD) can describe a number of different problems affecting the heart. It is the most common type of birth defect. Congenital heart disease causes more deaths in the first year of life than any other birth defects. Congenital heart disease is often divided into two types: cyanotic (blue\u00a0skin color\u00a0caused by a\u00a0lack of oxygen) and non-cyanotic. The following lists cover the most common congenital heart diseases:Cyanotic:Ebstein's anomaly, Hypoplastic left heart, Pulmonary atresia, Tetralogy of Fallot, Total anomalous pulmonary venous return, Transposition of the great vessels, Tricuspid atresia, Truncus arteriosus\u00a0\u00a0 . Non-cyanotic:Aortic stenosis, Atrial septal defect (ASD), Atrioventricular canal (endocardial cushion defect), Coarctation of the aorta, Patent ductus arteriosus (PDA), Pulmonic stenosis, Ventricular septal defect (VSD)\u00a0\u00a0 . These problems may occur alone or together. Most children with congenital heart disease do not have other types of birth defects. However, heart defects can be\u00a0part of genetic and chromosome syndromes. Some of these syndromes may be passed down through families. Examples include: DiGeorge syndrome, Down syndrome, Marfan syndrome, Noonan syndrome, Trisomy 13, Turner syndrome. Often, no cause for the heart disease\u00a0can be found. Congenital heart diseases continue to be investigated and researched. Drugs such as retinoic acid for acne, chemicals, alcohol, and infections (such as rubella) during pregnancy can contribute to some congenital heart problems.Poorly controlled blood sugar in women who have diabetes during pregnancy has also been linked to a high rate of congenital heart defects.", "Prevention": "Women who are\u00a0pregnant should get good prenatal care:Avoid alcohol and\u00a0illegal drugs during pregnancy. , Tell your doctor that you are pregnant before\u00a0taking any new medicines., Have a\u00a0blood test early in\u00a0your pregnancy to see if you are immune to rubella. If you are not immune,\u00a0avoid any possible exposure to rubella and get vaccinated right after delivery., Pregnant women who have diabetes should try to get good control over their blood sugar levels.. Certain genes may play a role in congenital heart disease. Many family members may be affected. Talk to your health care provider about genetic screening if you have a family history of congenital heart disease.", "Treatment": "Which treatment is used, and how well the baby responds to it,\u00a0depends on the condition. Many defects need to be followed carefully. Some will heal over time, while others will need to be treated.Some congenital heart diseases can be treated with medication alone. Others need to be treated with one or more heart surgeries."}, "Corticosteroids overdose": {"Symptoms": ["Altered mental status with agitation (psychosis)", "Burning or itching skin", "Convulsions", "Deafness", "Depression", "Dry skin", "High blood pressure", "Increased infection risk", "Muscle weakness", "Nervousness", "Sleepiness", "Stopping of menstrual cycle", "Swelling in lower legs, ankles, or feet", "Weak bones (osteoporosis) and bone fractures", "Weakness", "Worsening of health conditions such as ulcers, diabetes "], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Concussion - adults - discharge": {"description": "Getting better from a concussion takes days to weeks or even months. You may be irritable, have trouble concentrating, or be unable to remember things. You may also have headaches, dizziness,\u00a0or blurry vision. These problems will likely recover slowly. You may want to get help from family or friends for making important decisions."}, "Chronic inflammatory polyneuropathy": {"description": "Chronic inflammatory polyneuropathy involves nerve swelling and irritation (inflammation) that leads to a loss of strength or sensation.", "Possible Complications": "Pain, Permanent decrease or loss of sensation in areas of the body, Permanent weakness or paralysis in areas of the body, Repeated or unnoticed injury to an area of the body, Side effects of medications used to treat the disorder. ", "Symptoms": ["Difficulty walking due to weakness or trouble feeling your feet", "Difficulty using the arms and hands or legs and feet due to weakness", "Sensation changes, such as\u00a0numbness or decreased sensation, pain, burning, tingling, or other abnormal sensations (usually affects the\u00a0feet first, then the arms and hands)", "Weakness, usually in the arms and hands or legs and feet ", "Abnormal movement", "Breathing difficulty", "Fatigue", "Hoarseness or changing voice", "Loss of function or feeling in the muscles", "Muscle atrophy", "Muscle contractions", "Speech impairment", "Swallowing difficulty", "Uncoordinated movement"], "Exams and Tests": "The doctor will examine you and ask questions about your medical history. The physical exam shows:Loss of muscle mass, No reflexes, Muscle weakness or paralysis, Sensation problems on both sides of the body. Tests may include:Electromyography (EMG), Nerve conduction tests, Nerve biopsy, Spinal tap, Blood tests may be done to look for specific proteins that are causing the immune attack on the nerves. Which other tests are done depends on the suspected cause of the condition. Tests may include x-rays, imaging scans, and blood tests.", "Treatment": "The goal of treatment is to reverse the attack on the nerves. In some cases, nerves can heal and their function can be restored. In other cases, nerves are badly damaged and cannot heal, so treatment is aimed at preventing the disease from getting worse.Which treatment is given depends on how severe the symptoms are, among other things. The most aggressive treatment is usually only given if you have difficulty walking or if symptoms interfere with your ability to care for yourself or perform work functions.Treatments may include:Corticosteroids to help reduce inflammation and relieve symptoms, Other medications that suppress the immune system (for some severe cases), Plasmapheresis or plasma exchange to remove antibodies from the blood, Intravenous immune globulin (IVIg), which involves adding large numbers of antibodies to the blood plasma to reduce the effect of the antibodies that are causing the problem. ", "Causes": "Chronic inflammatory polyneuropathy is one cause of damage to nerves outside the brain or spinal cord (peripheral neuropathy). Polyneuropathy means several nerves are involved. It usually affects both sides of the body equally. Chronic inflammatory demyelinating polyneuropathy (CIDP) is the most common chronic neuropathy caused by an abnormal immune response. CIDP occurs when the immune system attacks the myelin cover of the nerves.The cause of chronic inflammatory polyneuropathy is an abnormal immune response. The specific triggers vary. In many cases, the cause cannot be identified.It may occur with other conditions, such as:Autoimmune disorders, Chronic hepatitis, Diabetes, HIV, Inflammatory bowel disease, Systemic lupus erythematosus, Lymphoma, Paraneoplastic syndrome, Thyrotoxicosis, Side effects of medicines to treat cancer or HIV. "}, "Campho-Phenique overdose": {"Symptoms": ["Irregular breathing", "Little or no urine output", "Burning in the mouth or throat", "Collapse", "Low blood pressure", "Rapid pulse", "Agitation", "Coma", "Dizziness", "Hallucinations", "Muscle rigidity or muscle spasms", "Seizures", "Stupor", "Twitching facial muscles", "Bluish-colored lips and fingernails", "Skin redness (from applying too much to the skin)", "Sweating (extreme)", "Yellow skin", "Abdominal pain", "Diarrhea", "Excessive thirst", "Nausea and vomiting"], "description": "This is for information only, and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222.", "Prevention": "Keep all medicines in child-proof bottles and out of the reach of children."}, "C-reactive protein": {"description": "This article discusses the blood test done to measure the amount of CRP in your blood."}, "Cyst": {"description": "A cyst is a closed pocket or pouch of tissue. It can be filled with air, fluid, pus, or other material."}, "Calcium carbonate overdose": {"Symptoms": ["Abdominal pain", "Bone pain", "Coma", "Confusion", "Constipation", "Depression", "Diarrhea", "Headache", "Irregular heartbeat", "Muscle twitching", "Nausea", "Vomiting"], "description": "See also: Calcium carbonate with magnesium overdose", "Prevention": "Keep all medications in child-proof bottles and out of the reach of children."}, "Cystinuria": {"description": "See also: Nephrolithiasis", "Possible Complications": "Bladder injury from stone, Kidney injury from stone, Kidney infection, Ureteral obstruction, Urinary tract infection. ", "Symptoms": ["Blood in the urine", "Flank pain or pain in the side or back. Pain is usually on one side; it is rarely felt on both sides. Pain is often severe. It may get worse over days. You may also feel pain in the pelvis, groin, genitals, or between the upper abdomen and back."], "Exams and Tests": "The disorder is usually diagnosed after an episode of kidney stones. Testing the stones shows that they are made of cystine.Tests that may be done to detect stones and diagnose this condition include:24-hour urine collection, Abdominal CT scan, MRI, or ultrasound, Intravenous pyelogram (IVP), Urinalysis. ", "Treatment": "The goal of treatment is to relieve symptoms and prevent more stones. A person with severe symptoms may need to be admitted to a hospital.Treatment involves drinking plenty of fluids, especially water, to produce large amounts of urine. You should drink at least 6 - 8 glasses per day.In some cases, fluids may need to be given through a vein (by IV).Medications may be prescribed to help dissolve the cystine crystals. Eating less salt can also decrease cystine release and stone formation.You may need pain relievers to control pain in the kidney or bladder area when you pass stones. Smaller stones usually pass through the urine on their own. Larger stones may need extra treatments. Some large stones may need to be removed with surgery:Extracorporeal shock wave lithotripsy (ESWL) -- Sound waves are passed through the body and are focused on the stones to break them into small, passable fragments.\u00a0ESWL may not work well for\u00a0cystine stones because they\u00a0are very hard as compared with\u00a0other types of stones., Percutaneous nephrostolithotomy or nephrolithotomy-- A small tube is placed through the flank directly into the kidney.\u00a0 A telescope is then passed through the tube to fragment the stone under direct vision. \u00a0, Ureteroscopy, for stones in the lower urinary tract.. ", "Prevention": "There are medications that can be taken so cystine does not form a stone. Ask your health care provider about these medications and their side effects. Any person with a known history of stones in the urinary tract should drink plenty of fluids to regularly produce a high amount of urine. This allows stones and crystals to leave the body before they become large enough to cause symptoms.", "Causes": "To have the symptoms of cystinuria, you must inherit the faulty gene from both parents. Your children will also inherit a copy of the faulty gene from you.Cystinuria is caused by too much of an amino acid called cystine in the urine. After entering the kidneys, most cystine normally dissolves and goes back into the bloodstream. But people with cystinuria have a genetic defect that interferes with this process. As a result, cystine builds up in the urine and forms crystals or stones, which may get stuck in the kidneys, ureters, or bladder.About one in every 10,000 people have cystinuria. Cystine stones are most common in young adults under age 40. Less than 3% of urinary tract stones are cystine stones."}, "Cloth dye poisoning": {"Symptoms": ["Breathing difficulty (from breathing in the dye)", "Throat swelling (may also cause breathing difficulty)", "Severe change in acid level of blood (pH balance), which leads to damage in all of the body organs", "Loss of vision", "Severe pain in the throat", "Severe pain or burning in the nose, eyes, ears, lips, or tongue", "Blood in the stool", "Burns and possible holes (perforations) in the esophagus", "Severe abdominal pain", "Vomiting", "Vomiting blood", "Collapse", "Low blood pressure that develops rapidly", "Burns", "Holes (necrosis) in the skin or tissues underneath", "Irritation"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Colds and flus - antibiotics": {"description": "Antibiotics do NOT cure colds and flus."}, "Cystometric study": {"description": "Cystometric study measures the amount of fluid in the bladder when you first feel the need to urinate, when you are able to sense fullness, and when your bladder is completely full."}, "Cradle cap": {"Symptoms": ["Thick, crusty, yellow or brown scales on your child's scalp", "Scales may also be found on the eyelids, ear, around the nose", "Older infant scratching affected areas, which may lead to infection (redness, bleeding, or crusting)"], "Exams and Tests": "The doctor or nurse can often diagnose cradle cap by looking at your baby's scalp.", "description": "Cradle cap is seborrheic dermatitis that affects the scalp of infants.", "Causes": "\r\n \r\nThe exact cause of cradle cap is not known. Doctors think the condition is due to oil glands in the baby's scalp producing too much oil.Cradle cap is not spread from person to person (contagious). It is also not caused by poor hygiene. It is not an allergy, and it is not dangerous.Cradle cap is harmless and often lasts a few months. In some children, the condition can last until age 2 or 3.", "Treatment": "\r\nAntibiotics will be prescribed if your baby\u2019s scalp has an infection.Depending on how severe the condition is, other medicines may be prescribed. These may include medicated creams or shampoos.Most cases of cradle cap can be managed at home. Here are some tips:Massage your baby's scalp gently with your fingers or a soft brush to loosen the scales and improve scalp circulation., Give your child daily, gentle shampoos with a mild shampoo as long as there are scales. After scales have disappeared, shampoos can be reduced to twice weekly. Be sure to rinse off all shampoo., Brush your child's hair with a clean, soft brush after each shampoo and several times during the day. Wash the brush with soap and water each day to remove any scales and scalp oil., If scales do not easily loosen and wash off, apply mineral oil to the baby's scalp and wrap warm, wet cloths around the head for up to an hour before shampooing. Then, shampoo. Remember that your baby loses heat through the scalp. If you use warm, wet cloths with the mineral oil, check often to be sure that the cloths have not become cold. Cold, wet cloths can reduce your baby's temperature.. If the scales continue to be a problem or your child seems uncomfortable or scratches the scalp all the time, call your child\u2019s health care provider."}, "Cataracts - what to ask your doctor ": {"description": "Below are some questions you may want to ask your doctor or nurse to help you take care of your eye after surgery."}, "Counting carbohydrates": {"description": "Your dietitian will teach you a technique called \"carb counting.\""}, "Citric acid urine test": {"description": "Citric acid urine test measures the level of citric acid in urine."}, "Caladium plant poisoning": {"Symptoms": ["Burning in mouth or throat", "Damage to cornea of the eye", "Diarrhea", "Eye pain", "Hoarse voice", "Nausea or vomiting", "Swelling and blistering in the mouth or tongue"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222.", "Prevention": "Do not touch or eat any plant with which you are not familiar. Wash your hands after working in the garden or walking in the woods."}, "Chronic fatigue syndrome": {"description": "Chronic fatigue syndrome refers to severe, continued tiredness (fatigue). It is not relieved by rest and is not directly caused by other medical conditions.", "Possible Complications": "Depression, Inability to participate in work and social activities, which can lead to isolation, Side effects\u00a0from medication or treatments. ", "Symptoms": ["New", "Lasts at least 6 months", "Not relieved by bed rest", "Severe enough to keep you from participating in certain activities ", "Feeling extremely tired for more than 24 hours after exercise that would normally be considered easy", "Feeling unrefreshed after sleeping for a proper amount of time", "Forgetfulness", "Concentration problems", "Confusion", "Joint pain, but no swelling or redness", "Headaches that differ from those you have had in the past", "Irritability", "Mild fever (101 degrees F or less)", "Muscle aches (myalgias)", "Muscle weakness, all over or multiple locations, not explained by any known disorder", "Sore throat", "Sore lymph nodes in the neck or under the arms "], "Exams and Tests": "The Centers for Disease Control (CDC) describes CFS as a distinct disorder with specific symptoms and physical signs. Diagnosis is based on ruling out other possible causes.Your health care provider will try to rule out other possible causes of fatigue, including:Drug dependence, Immune or autoimmune disorders, Infections, Muscle or nerve diseases (such as multiple sclerosis), Endocrine diseases (such as hypothyroidism), Other illnesses (such as heart, kidney, or liver diseases), Psychiatric or psychological illnesses, particularly depression, Tumors . A diagnosis of CFS must include:Absence of other causes of chronic fatigue, At least four CFS-specific symptoms, Extreme, long-term fatigue . There are no specific tests to confirm the diagnosis of CFS. However, there have been reports of CFS patients having abnormal results on the following tests:Brain MRI, White blood cell count . ", "Treatment": "There is currently no cure for CFS. The goal of treatment is to relieve symptoms. Many people with CFS have depression and other psychological disorders that may improve with treatment.Treatment includes a combination of the following:Cognitive-behavioral therapy (CBT) and graded exercise for certain patients, Healthy diet, Sleep management techniques, Medicines to reduce pain, discomfort, and fever, Medicines to treat anxiety (anti-anxiety drugs), Medicines to treat depression (antidepressant drugs) . Some drugs can cause reactions or side effects that are worse than the original symptoms of the disease.People with CFS are encouraged to maintain active social lives. Mild physical exercise may also be helpful. Your health care team will help you figure out how much activity you can do, and how to slowly increase your activity. Tips include:Avoiding doing too much on days when you feel tired, Balancing your time between activity, rest, and sleep, Breaking big tasks into smaller, more manageable ones, Spreading out more challenging tasks throughout the week . Relaxation and stress-reduction techniques can help manage chronic pain and fatigue. They are not used as the primary treatment for CFS. Relaxation techniques include:Biofeedback, Deep breathing exercises, Hypnosis, Massage therapy, Meditation, Muscle relaxation techniques, Yoga. ", "Causes": "The exact cause of chronic fatigue syndrome (CFS) is unknown. Some theories suggest CFS may be due to:Epstein-Barr virus or human herpes virus-6 (HHV-6); however, no specific virus has been identified as the cause, Inflammation in the nervous system, because of a faulty immune system response . The following may also play a role in the development of CFS:Age, Previous illnesses, Stress, Genetics, Environmental factors . CFS most commonly occurs in women ages 30 to 50."}, "Cyanotic heart disease": {"description": "Cyanotic heart disease refers to a group of many different heart defects that are\u00a0present at birth (congenital) that\u00a0result in a low blood oxygen level.", "Possible Complications": "Complications of cyanotic heart disease include:Abnormal heart rhythms and sudden death, Chronic high blood pressure in the blood vessels of the lung, Heart failure, Infection in the heart, Stroke. ", "Symptoms": ["Anxiety", "Breathing too quickly (hyperventilation)", "Sudden increase in bluish color to the skin", "Feeding problems or reduced appetite, leading to poor growth", "Grayish skin", "Puffy eyes or face", "Tiredness all the time"], "Exams and Tests": "Physical examination confirms cyanosis.\u00a0Older children\u00a0may have clubbed fingers.The doctor will listen to the heart and lungs with a stethoscope. Abnormal heart sounds, a heart murmur, and lung crackles may be heard.Tests will vary depending on the cause, but may include:Chest x-ray, Checking oxygen level in the blood using an\u00a0arterial blood gas test or by checking it through the skin with a pulse oximeter, Complete blood count (CBC), ECG (echocardiogram), Looking at the heart structure and blood vessels using echocardiogram or MRI of the heart, Passing a thin flexible tube (catheter) into the right or left side of the heart, usually from the groin (cardiac catheterization), Transcutaneous oxygen monitor (pulse oximeter), Echo-Doppler, Testing the heart's electrical system. ", "Treatment": "Some infants may need to stay in the hospital after birth so they can receive oxygen or be put on a breathing machine. They may receive medicines to:Get rid of extra fluids, Help the heart pump harder, Keep certain blood vessels open, Treat abnormal heartbeats or rhythms. The treatment of choice for most congenital heart diseases is surgery to repair the defect. There are many types of surgery, depending on the kind of birth defect. Surgery may be needed soon after birth, or it may be delayed for months or even years.Your child may need to take water pills (diuretics) and other heart medicines before or after surgery. Be sure to follow the correct dosage. Regular follow-up with the\u00a0doctor is important.Many children who have had heart surgery must take antibiotics before, and sometimes after having any dental work or other medical procedures. Make sure you have clear instructions from your child's heart doctor. Ask your child's doctor before getting any immunizations. Most children can follow the recommended guidelines for childhood vaccinations.", "Prevention": "Women who are pregnant should get good prenatal care.Avoid using alcohol and drugs during pregnancy. , Tell your doctor that you are pregnant before taking any prescribed medications., Get a blood test early in the pregnancy to see if you are immune to rubella. If you are not immune, you must avoid any exposure to rubella and should get immunized right after delivery., Pregnant women with diabetes should try to get good control over their blood sugar levels. . Some inherited factors may play a role in congenital heart disease. Many family members may be affected. If you are planning to get pregnant, talk to your health care provider about screening for genetic diseases. ", "Causes": "Normally, blood returns from the body and flows through the heart and lungs. Blood that is low in oxygen (blue blood) returns from the body to the right side of the heart., The right side of the heart then pumps the blood to the lungs, where it picks up more oxygen and becomes red., The oxygen-rich blood returns from the lungs to the left side of the heart. From there, it is pumped to the rest of the body. . Heart defects that children are born with\u00a0can change the way blood flows through the heart and lungs and\u00a0cause non-oxygenated blood to be pumped out to the body without going through the lungs to pick up oxygen. As a result:The blood that is pumped out to the body is lower in oxygen., Less oxygen delivered to the body can make the skin look blue\u00a0(cyanosis) . Many of these heart defects involve the heart valves. Heart valves are found between the heart and the large blood vessels that bring blood to and from the heart. These valves open up enough for blood to flow through. Then they close, keeping blood from flowing backward. Heart valve defects that can cause cyanosis include:Tricuspid valve (the valve between the two chambers on the right side of the heart) may be absent or unable to open wide enough., Pulmonary valve (the valve between the heart and the lungs) may be absent or unable to open wide enough., Aortic valve (the valve between the heart and the blood vessel to the rest of the body) is unable to open wide enough.. Other heart defects that may cause cyanosis include:Coarctation or complete interruption of the aorta\r\n , Ebstein anomaly, Hypoplastic left heart syndrome, Tetralogy of Fallot, Total anomalous pulmonary venous return, Transposition of the great arteries\r\n \u00a0\r\n , Truncus arteriosus. Cyanotic heart diseases may be caused by:Chemical exposure, Genetic and chromosomal syndromes, such as Down syndrome, trisomy 13, Turner syndrome, Marfan syndrome, and\u00a0Noonan syndrome, Infections (such as rubella) during pregnancy, Poorly controlled blood sugar levels in women who have diabetes during pregnancy, Medications prescribed by your doctor or bought on your own and used during pregnancy, Street drugs used during pregnancy . "}, "Closed reduction of a fractured bone": {"description": "Fracture reduction - closed"}, "CSF glucose test": {"description": "A CSF glucose test measures the amount of sugar (glucose) in the cerebrospinal fluid (CSF). CSF is a clear fluid that flows in the space surrounding the spinal cord and brain."}, "Children and grief": {"description": "Children react differently than adults when dealing with the death of a loved one. To console your own child, learn the normal responses to grief that children have and the signs when your child is not coping well with grief."}, "Culture - colonic tissue ": {"description": "A colonic tissue culture is a lab test to check for the cause of disease in a sample of tissue from the large intestine. The cause\u00a0may be bacteria, fungi, or viruses. "}, "Central serous choroidopathy": {"description": "Central serous choroidopathy is a disease that causes fluid to build up under the retina, the back part of the inner eye that sends sight information to the brain. The fluid leaks from the blood vessel layer under the retina. This area is called the choroid.", "Possible Complications": "A small number of people will have complications from laser treatment that impair their central vision. That is why most people recover without treatment.", "Symptoms": ["Dim and blurred blind spot in the center of vision", "Distortion of straight lines with the affected eye", "Objects appearing smaller or farther away with the affected eye "], "Exams and Tests": "Your health care provider can usually diagnose central serous choroidopathy by dilating the eye and performing an eye exam. Fluorescein angiography confirms the diagnosis.This condition may also be diagnosed with a noninvasive test called ocular coherence tomography (OCT).", "Treatment": "Most cases clear up without treatment in 1 or 2 months. Laser treatment or photodynamic therapy to seal the leak may help restore vision in people with more severe leakage and vision loss, or in those who have had the disease for a long time.People who are using steroid drugs (for example, to treat autoimmune diseases) should stop using these drugs, if possible. DO NOT stop taking these medicines without first talking to your provider.", "Prevention": "There is no known prevention. Although there is a clear association with stress, there is no evidence that reducing stress has any benefit in preventing or treating central serous choroidopathy.", "Causes": "The cause of this condition is unknown.Men are affected more often than women, and the condition is most common at around age 45, but anyone can be affected.Stress appears to be a risk factor. Early studies found that people with aggressive, \"type A\" personalities who are under a lot of stress may be more likely to develop central serous retinopathy. The condition can also occur as a complication of steroid drug use."}, "Chronic obstructive pulmonary disease - adults - discharge": {"description": "COPD - adults - discharge"}, "Chromium in diet": {"description": "Chromium is an essential mineral that is not made by the body and must be obtained from the diet."}, "Calcium and bones": {"description": "High-calcium foods include:"}, "Caring for muscle spasticity or spasms ": {"description": "Muscle spasticity, or spasms, causes your muscles to become stiff or rigid. It can also cause exaggerated, deep tendon reflexes, like a knee-jerk reaction when your reflexes are checked."}, "Chiropractor profession": {"description": "Most states require that chiropractors complete a certain number of continuing education hours every year to keep their license."}, "Camphor overdose": {"Symptoms": ["Abdominal pain", "Burning of the mouth or the throat", "Convulsions", "Excessive thirst", "Excitation", "Muscle spasms", "Nausea and vomiting", "Rapid pulse", "Restlessness or agitation", "Rigid muscles", "Skin irritation", "Slow breathing", "Twitching facial muscles", "Unusual behavior", "Unconsciousness"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or 1-800-222-1222 for a local poison control center."}, "CT scan": {"description": "Related tests include:"}, "Carotid artery stenosis - self-care": {"description": "Whether or not your doctor recommended surgery to unblock narrowed arteries, medicines and lifestyle changes can:"}, "Chafing": {"description": "Chafing is skin irritation that occurs where skin rubs against skin, clothing, or other material."}, "Cedar leaf oil poisoning": {"Symptoms": ["Breathing difficulty", "Throat swelling (may also cause breathing difficulty) ", "Loss of vision", "Severe pain in the throat", "Severe pain or burning in the nose, eyes, ears, lips, or tongue ", "Blood in the stool", "Burns of the food pipe (esophagus)", "Severe abdominal pain", "Vomiting", "Vomiting blood", "Collapse", "Low blood pressure that develops rapidly ", "Coma (decreased level of consciousness and lack of responsiveness)", "Seizures", "Stupor ", "Burn", "Irritation "], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Cleaning to prevent the spread of germs": {"description": "Disinfection procedures"}, "Caterpillars": {"Symptoms": ["Pain", "Redness", "Tearing", "Drooling", "Mouth and throat irritation", "Vomiting, if caterpillar or caterpillar hairs are eaten", "Headache", "Cough", "Rhinitis", "Shortness of breath", "Wheezing", "Blisters", "Hives", "Itching", "Rash", "Redness", "Pain", "Severe allergic reaction (anaphylaxis -- rare)", "Swelling"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222.", "Prevention": "Wear protective clothing whenever possible when traveling through terrain which is known to harbor caterpillars. Do not stick your hands or feet in their nests or in their preferred habitats, namely, under logs or underbrush, or other damp, moist areas."}, "Ciliary body": {"description": "The ciliary body also contains the ciliary muscle, which changes the shape of the lens when your eyes focus on something. This process is called accommodation."}, "Campylobacter infection": {"description": "Campylobacter enteritis is an infection of the small intestine with Campylobacter jejuni bacteria.", "Symptoms": ["Cramping abdominal pain", "Fever", "Nausea and vomiting", "Watery diarrhea, sometimes bloody"], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider will perform a physical exam. These tests may be done:Complete blood count with differential, Stool sample testing for white blood cells, Stool culture for Campylobacter jejuni. ", "Causes": "Campylobacter enteritis is a common cause of intestinal infection. These bacteria are also one of the many causes of traveler's diarrhea or food poisoning.People most often get infected by eating or drinking food or water that contains the bacteria. The most commonly contaminated foods are raw poultry, fresh produce,\u00a0and unpasteurized milk. A person can also be infected by close contact with infected people or animals. ", "Prevention": "Learning how to prevent food poisoning can reduce the risk of this infection.", "Treatment": "The infection almost always goes away on its own, and usually does not need to be treated with antibiotics. Severe symptoms may improve with antibiotics.The goal is to make you feel better and avoid dehydration. Dehydration means your body does not have as much water and fluids as it should.These things may help you feel better if you have diarrhea:Drink 8 to 10 glasses of clear fluids every day. Water is best., Drink at least 1 cup of liquid every time you have a loose bowel movement., Eat small meals throughout the day instead of three big meals., Eat some salty foods, such as pretzels, soup, and sports drinks., Eat some high-potassium foods, such as bananas, potatoes without the skin, and watered-down fruit juices.. "}, "Cerebral amyloid angiopathy": {"description": "Cerebral amyloid angiopathy is a neurological condition in which proteins called amyloid build up on the walls of the arteries in the brain. The condition increases the risk of hemorrhagic stroke and dementia.", "Possible Complications": "Dementia, Hydrocephalus (rarely), Seizures, Repeated episodes of bleeding in the brain. ", "Symptoms": ["Drowsiness", "Headache (usually in a specific part of the head)", "Neurologic changes that may start suddenly, including confusion, delirium,\u00a0double vision, decreased vision, sensation changes,\u00a0speech difficulties,\u00a0weakness, or paralysis", "Seizures", "Stupor or coma (rarely)", "Vomiting ", "Episodes of confusion", "Headaches that come and go", "Loss of mental function (dementia)", "Sensation changes (unusual sensations) that come and go", "Seizures "], "Exams and Tests": "Cerebral amyloid angiopathy is difficult to diagnose with certainty without a sample of brain tissue. This is usually done after death or when a biopsy of the blood vessels of the brain is done.A physical exam can be relatively normal if you have a small bleed, but you may show some brain function changes. It is important for the doctor to ask detailed questions about your medical history. Your symptoms and the results of your physical exam and any imaging tests may cause your doctor to suspect this problem.A CT scan or MRI of the head may show:Bleeding in the brain, Signs of prior bleeding in the brain. Magnetic resonance angiography (MRA) of the brain can help with the diagnosis of large bleeds and may be used to rule out arteriovenous malformation or aneurysm as the cause of the bleed.Another type of MRI scan can help show tiny areas where blood has escaped from blood vessels into brain tissue.", "Treatment": "There is no known effective treatment. The goal of treatment is to relieve symptoms. In some cases, rehabilitation is needed for weakness or clumsiness. This can include physical, occupational, or speech therapy.Occasionally, some patients may benefit from medications that help improve memory, such as those used to treat Alzheimer's disease.Seizures, sometimes called \"amyloid spells,\" may be treated with anticonvulsants such as phenytoin (Dilantin) and carbamazepine (Tegretol).", "Causes": "The cause of cerebral amyloid angiopathy is unknown. Sometimes, it may be passed down through families. Persons with this condition have deposits of amyloid protein in the walls of the brain arteries. The protein is usually not deposited anywhere else in the body.The major risk factor is increasing age. It is more often seen in those older than 60."}, "Chronic cholecystitis": {"description": "The gallbladder is a sac located under the liver. It stores bile that is made in the liver. Bile helps the intestines digest fats.", "Possible Complications": "Cancer of the gallbladder (rarely), Jaundice, Pancreatitis, Worsening of the condition. ", "Symptoms": [], "Exams and Tests": "Your health care provider may order the following blood tests:Amylase and lipase -- to diagnose diseases of the pancreas, Complete blood count (CBC), Liver function tests -- to evaluate how well the liver is working. Tests that reveal gallstones or inflammation in the gallbladder include:Abdominal CT scan, Abdominal ultrasound, Gallbladder scan (HIDA scan), Oral cholecystogram. ", "Treatment": "Surgery is the most common treatment. Surgery to remove the gallbladder is called cholecystectomy.Laparoscopic cholecystectomy is most often done. This surgery uses smaller surgical cuts, which result in a faster recovery. Patients are often sent home from the hospital on the same day as surgery, or the next morning., Open cholecystectomy requires a larger cut in the upper-right part of the abdomen.. In patients who are too ill to have surgery because of other diseases or conditions, the gallstones may be dissolved with medication taken by mouth. However, this may take 2 years or longer to work. The stones may return after treatment.", "Prevention": "The condition is not always preventable. Eating less fatty foods may relieve symptoms in people. However, the benefit of a low-fat diet has not been proven.", "Causes": "Most of the time, chronic cholecystitis is caused by repeated attacks of acute (sudden) cholecystitis. Most of these attacks are caused by gallstones in the gallbladder. These attacks cause the walls of the gallbladder to thicken. The gallbladder begins to shrink. Over time, the gallbladder is less able to concentrate, store, and release bile.The disease occurs more often in women than in men. It is more common after age 40."}, "Cough": {"description": "Coughs can be either acute or chronic:", "Causes": "Common causes of coughing are:Allergies that involve the nose or sinuses, Asthma and COPD (emphysema or chronic bronchitis) , The common cold\u00a0and flu, Lung infections such as pneumonia or acute bronchitis , Sinusitis with postnasal drip. Other causes include:ACE inhibitors (medication used to treat highblood pressure, heart failure, or kidney diseases), Cigarette smoking or exposure to secondhand smoke\r\n  , Gastroesophageal reflux disease (GERD)\r\n  , Lung cancer, Lung disease such as bronchiectasis\u00a0or interstitial lung disease. "}, "Chest tomogram": {"description": "A chest tomogram is a picture of the chest area created by moving the x-ray machine in one direction while moving the recording film the other way. This method blurs structures in front of and behind the area of the chest being studied. This allows for a more detailed view of a specific level within the chest cavity."}, "Celiac disease - sprue": {"description": "Celiac disease is a condition that creates inflammation in the small intestine, and damage in the lining. This prevents important components of food from being absorbed. The damage to the lining of the intestine comes from a reaction to eating gluten, which is found in wheat, rye, barley,\u00a0and possibly oats, and in food made from these ingredients.", "Possible Complications": "You must carefully continue to follow the gluten-free diet. When untreated, the disease can cause life-threatening complications.Delaying diagnosis or not following the diet puts you at risk for related conditions such as:Autoimmune disorders, Bone disease (osteoporosis, kyphoscoliosis, fractures), Certain types of intestinal cancer, Low blood count (anemia), Infertility or repeated miscarriage, Liver disease. ", "Symptoms": ["Abdominal pain, bloating, gas, or indigestion", "Constipation", "Decreased appetite (may also be increased or unchanged)", "Diarrhea, either constant or off and on", "Lactose intolerance (common when the person is diagnosed, usually goes away after treatment)", "Nausea and vomiting", "Stools that are foul smelling, oily, or and stick to the toilet when flushed", "Unexplained weight loss (although people can be overweight or of normal weight) ", "Easy bruising", "Depression or anxiety", "Fatigue", "Growth delay in children", "Hair loss", "Itchy skin with a rash (dermatitis herpetiformis)", "Missed menstrual periods", "Mouth ulcers", "Muscle cramps and joint pain", "Nosebleeds", "Seizures", "Tingling or numbness in the hands or feet", "Unexplained short height ", "Defects in the tooth enamel and changes in tooth color", "Delayed puberty", "Diarrhea, constipation, fatty or foul-smelling stools, nausea, or vomiting", "Irritable and fussy behavior", "Poor weight gain", "Slowed growth and shorter than normal height for their age"], "Exams and Tests": "Bone density, Cholesterol (may be low), Complete blood count (CBC - test for anemia), Comprehensive metabolic panel, Folate level (serum), Iron level (serum), Prothrombin time, Vitamin B12 level (serum), Vitamin D level . Blood tests can detect antibodies, called antitissue transglutaminase antibodies (tTGA) or anti-endomysial antibodies (EMA) which may help detect the condition. The health care provider will order these antibody tests if celiac disease is suspected.If the tests are positive, upper endoscopy is often performed to sample a piece of tissue (biopsy) from the first part of the small intestine (duodenum). The biopsy may show a flattening of the villi in the parts of the intestine below the duodenum.Genetic testing of the blood can also be done to help determine who may be at risk for celiac disease.A follow-up biopsy or blood test may be ordered several months after the diagnosis and treatment. These tests assess how well treatment is working. Normal results mean that you have responded to treatment. This confirms the diagnosis. However, this does not mean that the disease has been cured.", "Treatment": "Celiac disease cannot be cured. Your symptoms will go away and the villi in the lining of the intestines will heal if you follow a lifelong gluten-free diet. Do not eat foods and beverages or take medicines that contain wheat, barley, rye, and possibly oats.You must read food and drug labels carefully to look ingredients that may include these grains. It may be hard to stick to a gluten-free diet because wheat and barley grains are common in the American diet. Over time, most people are able to adapt and get better. You should NOT begin the gluten-free diet before you are diagnosed. Starting the diet will affect testing for the disease.Your health care provider may prescribe vitamin and mineral supplements to correct nutritional deficiencies. Sometimes, short-term use of corticosteroids (such as prednisone) may be needed if sprue does not respond to treatment. In most cases, following a well-balanced, gluten-free diet is the only treatment you need to stay well.When you are diagnosed, get help from a registered dietitian who specializes in celiac disease and the gluten-free diet. A support group may also help you cope with the disease and diet.", "Prevention": "Because the exact cause is unknown, there is no known way to prevent the development of celiac disease. However, being aware of the risk factors (such as having a family member with the disorder) may increase your chances of early diagnosis, treatment, and a long, healthy life.", "Causes": "The exact cause of celiac disease is unknown. The lining of the intestines have small projections contains areas called villi. These structures help absorb nutrients. When people with celiac disease eat foods or use products that contain gluten, their immune system reacts by damaging the villi. As a result, the villi are unable absorb nutrients properly. Therefore, a person becomes malnourished, no matter how much food he or she eats.The disease can develop at any point in life, from infancy to late adulthood.People who have a family member with celiac disease are at greater risk for developing the disease. The disorder is most common in Caucasians and persons of European ancestry. Women are affected more often than men.People with celiac disease are more likely to have:Autoimmune disorders such as rheumatoid arthritis, systemic lupus erythematosus, and Sjogren syndrome, Addison's disease, Down syndrome, Intestinal cancer, Intestinal lymphoma, Lactose intolerance, Thyroid disease, Type 1 diabetes. "}, "Chronic motor tic disorder": {"description": "Chronic motor tic disorder is a condition that involves quick, uncontrollable movements or vocal outbursts (but not both).", "Possible Complications": "There are usually no complications.", "Symptoms": ["Excessive blinking", "Grimaces of the face", "Quick movements of the arms, legs, or other areas", "Sounds (grunts, throat clearing, contractions of the abdomen or diaphragm) ", "Excitement", "Fatigue", "Heat", "Stress"], "Exams and Tests": "The doctor can usually diagnose a tic during a physical examination. Tests are generally not needed.To be diagnosed with the disorder:You must have had the tics nearly every day for more than a year, You have not had a tic-free period longer than 3 months. ", "Treatment": "Treatment depends on how\u00a0severe the tics are and how the condition affects you. Medicines and talk therapy (psychotherapy) are used when the tics greatly\u00a0affect daily activities, such as school and job performance.Medicines can help control or reduce tics. But they have side effects, such as movement and\u00a0thinking\u00a0problems.", "Causes": "Chronic motor tic disorder\u00a0is more common than Tourette syndrome. Chronic tics may be forms of Tourette syndrome. Tics usually start at age 5 or 6 and get worse until age 12. They often improve during adulthood."}, "Child abuse - sexual": {"description": "Child sexual abuse is the deliberate exposure of minor children to sexual activity. This means a child is forced or talked into sex or sexual activities by another person. Such abuse includes:", "Possible Complications": "Anxiety disorders, Depression, Eating disorders, Post-traumatic stress disorder (PTSD), Sleep disorders, Unsafe sexual activities. ", "Symptoms": ["Bowel disorders, such as soiling oneself (encopresis)", "Eating disorders, such as anorexia nervosa", "Genital or rectal symptoms, such as pain during a bowel movement or urination, or vaginal itch or discharge", "Repeated headaches", "Sleep problems", "Stomach aches (vague complaints)", "Display disruptive behaviors such as using alcohol and street drugs or engaging in high-risk sexual behaviors", "Do poorly in school", "Have excessive fears", "Withdraw from normal activities"], "Exams and Tests": "If you suspect a child has been sexually abused, the child should be examined as soon as possible by a trained health care professional. Most pediatricians, many family medicine doctors, and most emergency room (ER) doctors have been trained to examine cases involving sexual abuse.Do not delay a doctor's exam for any reason. Many signs of injury related to sexual abuse are temporary. The exam should be done within 72 hours of the event or discovery.A complete physical exam must always be performed, so that the examiner can look for any signs of physical and sexual abuse. The two forms of abuse may exist together.Affected areas may include the mouth, throat, penis, anus, and vagina, including the hymen. The hymen is a thin piece of tissue covering the opening of the vagina. It can be affected by abuse.Your doctor may also order blood tests to check for sexually transmitted diseases, such as syphilis and HIV, and pregnancy in females. These tests can help determine treatment.Photographs of injuries may help establish what happened. It is extremely important to write down symptoms due to any form of child abuse.An exam will automatically be scheduled when suspected child sexual abuse is reported to police or child protection agencies. A second exam with an expert abuse examiner should be scheduled after the first exam. A doctor or nurse specialist can be found through child protective services programs anywhere in the United States.", "Treatment": "Treatment for the physical signs of sexual abuse is the same as for any types of cuts, bruises, or scrapes. The patient may need medicines to prevent or treat sexually transmitted diseases. Older females may receive medicines to prevent pregnancy.All children who have been sexually abused or traumatized in any way should receive mental health counseling.Any suspicion of child sexual abuse must be reported to child protective services and the police. Medical professionals, teachers, and child care professionals are required by law to make a report.Once a case is reported, child protection agencies and the police must investigate. If the report is considered true, the child must be protected from further abuse. The child may be placed with a non-abusing parent, another relative, or a foster home.", "Prevention": "Prevention involves teaching children never to keep secrets and the difference between \"good\" and \"bad\" touches. Parents need to begin this work at home. Most schools now have programs to teach young school-aged children about sexual abuse and its prevention.Teenagers also need to be taught how to avoid rape and date rape.Constant supervision and vigilance by adults is essential to preventing all forms of child abuse.", "Causes": "Society was reluctant to deal with child sexual abuse a few decades ago. Today, it is considered a serious issue.It is difficult to determine how often child sexual abuse occurs, because it is more secret than physical abuse. Children are often scared to tell anyone about the abuse. Many cases of abuse are not reported.Abusers are usually men. They tend to know the person they are abusing. The abuser violates the trust of the younger person, which makes the sexual abuse even more devastating.Child sexual abuse occurs in all social and economic classes of people. It has the same type of risk factors as physical child abuse, including:Alcohol and drug abuse, Family troubles, Poverty. Abusers sometimes have a history of physical or sexual abuse themselves.A small group of repeated abusers have the psychiatric disorder, pedophilia. Their preferred sexual contact is with children."}, "Chalazion": {"description": "A chalazion is a small bump in the eyelid caused by a blockage of a tiny oil gland.", "Possible Complications": "Rarely, a chalazion will heal by itself but may leave a scar on the eyelid. This problem is more common after chalazion surgery, but is still rare. You may lose some eyelashes or you may have a small notch in the edge of the eyelid. The most common complication is a return of the problem.", "Symptoms": [], "Exams and Tests": "An exam of the eyelid confirms the diagnosis.Rarely, skin cancer\u00a0of the eyelid may look like a chalazion. If this is suspected, you may need a biopsy.", "Treatment": "\r\nA chalazion will often disappear without treatment in a month or so.\r\n The first treatment is to place warm compresses over the eyelid for 10-15 minutes at least four times a day. Use water that is no hotter than you can leave your hand in comfortably. This may soften the hardened oils blocking the duct, and promote drainage and healing.\r\n \r\n \r\n \r\n\r\n\r\n \r\n , Do not push or squeeze the chalazion.. If the chalazion continues to get bigger, it may need to be removed with surgery. This is most often done from the inside of the eyelid to avoid a scar on the skin.Steroid injection is another treatment option.\r\n \r\n", "Prevention": "\r\nTo prevent chalazia or styes, it may help to gently scrub the edge of the lid at the eyelash line nightly. Use eye cleansing\r\npads or diluted baby shampoo.\r\nApply antibiotic ointment prescribed by your health care provider after scrubbing the eyelids.\r\n", "Causes": "\r\nA chalazion is caused by a blocked duct in one of the Meibomian glands. These glands are located in the eyelid directly behind the eyelashes and produce a thin, oily fluid that lubricates the eye. \r\n"}, "Creeping eruption": {"description": "Creeping eruption is a human infection with dog or cat hookworm larvae (immature worms).", "Possible Complications": "Creeping eruption may lead to these complications:Bacterial skin infections caused by scratching, Spread of the infection through the bloodstream to the lungs or small intestine (rare) . ", "Symptoms": ["Blisters", "Itching, may be more severe at night", "Raised, snakelike tracks in the skin that may spread over time, usually about 1 cm (less than one half inch) per day, usually on the feet and legs (severe infections may cause several tracks). "], "Exams and Tests": "Your health care provider can often diagnose this condition by looking at your skin. In rare cases, a skin biopsy is done to rule out other conditions. In very rare cases, a blood test is done to see if you have increased eosinophils\u00a0(a type of white blood cell).", "Treatment": "Anti-parasitic medicines may be used to treat the infection. ", "Prevention": "Public sanitation and deworming of dogs and cats have decreased hookworm infestation in the United States.Hookworm larvae often enter the body through bare feet, so wearing shoes in areas where hookworm infestations are known to occur helps prevent infection.", "Causes": "Hookworm eggs are found in the stool of infected dogs and cats. When the eggs hatch, the larvae can infest soil and vegetation.When you come into contact with this infested soil, the larvae can burrow into your skin. They cause an intense inflammatory response that leads to a rash and severe itching.Creeping eruption is more common in countries with warm climates. In the United States, the Southeast has the highest rates of infection. The main risk factor for this disease is contact with damp, sandy soil that has been contaminated with infected cat or dog stool. More children than adults are infected."}, "Culture - joint fluid": {"description": "Joint fluid culture is a laboratory test to detect infection-causing organisms in a sample of fluid surrounding a joint."}, "Cerebral spinal fluid (CSF) collection": {"description": "CSF acts as a cushion, protecting the brain and spine from injury. The fluid is normally clear. Ithas the same consistency as water. The test is also used to measure pressure in the spinal fluid."}, "Choledocholithiasis": {"description": "Choledocholithiasis is the presence of at least one gallstone in the common bile duct. The stone may be made up of bile pigments or calcium and cholesterol salts.", "Possible Complications": "Biliary cirrhosis, Cholangitis, Pancreatitis. ", "Symptoms": ["Pain in the right upper or middle upper abdomen for at least 30 minutes. The pain may be constant or cramping. It can feel sharp or dull. ", "Fever", "Yellowing of skin and whites of the eyes (jaundice) ", "Loss of appetite", "Nausea and vomiting", "Clay-colored stools"], "Exams and Tests": "Tests that show the location of stones in the bile duct include the following:Abdominal CT scan, Abdominal ultrasound, Endoscopic retrograde cholangiography (ERCP), Endoscopic ultrasound, Magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography (MRCP), Percutaneous transhepatic cholangiogram (PTCA). Your doctor may order the following blood tests:Bilirubin, Complete blood count (CBC), Liver function tests, Pancreatic enzymes. ", "Treatment": "The goal of treatment is to relieve the blockage.Treatment may involve:Surgery to remove the gallbladder and stones, ERCP and a procedure called a sphincterotomy, which makes a surgical cut into the muscle in the common bile duct to allow stones to pass or be removed. ", "Causes": "About 1 in 7 people with gallstones will develop stones in the common bile duct. This is the small tube that carries bile from the gallbladder to the intestine.Risk factors include a history of gallstones. However, choledocholithiasis can occur in people who have had their gallbladder removed."}, "Collateral ligament (CL) injury - aftercare": {"description": "A collateral ligament injury occurs when the ligaments are stretched or torn. A partial tear occurs when only part of the ligament is torn. A complete tear occurs when the entire ligament is torn into two pieces."}, "Chronic": {"description": "Chronic is the opposite of acute."}, "Caffeine in the diet": {"description": "Caffeine is a substance that is found in certain plants. It can also be man-made and added to foods. It is a central nervous system stimulant and a diuretic (substance that helps rid your body of fluids)."}, "Compression fractures of the back": {"description": "Compression fractures of the back are broken vertebrae. Vertebrae are the bones of the spine.", "Possible Complications": "Complications may include:Failure of the bones to fuse after surgery, Humpback, Spinal cord or nerve root compression . ", "Symptoms": ["The pain is most commonly felt in the middle or lower spine. It can also be felt on the sides or in the front of the spine.", "The pain is sharp and \" knife-like.\" Pain can be disabling, and take weeks to months to go away.", "Back pain that starts slowly, which gets worse with walking, but is not felt when resting", "Loss of height, as much as 6 inches over time", "Stooped-over posture, or kyphosis, also called a dowager\u2019s hump ", "Numbness", "Tingling", "Weakness", "Difficulty walking", "Loss of control of the bowel or bladder "], "Exams and Tests": "Your doctor will perform a physical exam. This may show:A humpback, or kyphosis, Tenderness over the affected spinal bone or bones. A spine x-ray shows at least one compressed vertebra that is shorter than the other vertebrae.Other tests that may be done:A bone density test to evaluate for osteoporosis, A CT or MRI scan if there is concern that the fracture was caused by a tumor or severe trauma (such as a fall or car accident). ", "Treatment": "Most compression fractures are seen in older people with osteoporosis. These fractures often do not cause injury to the spinal cord. The condition is usually treated with medicines and calcium supplements to prevent further fractures. Pain may be treated with: Pain medicine, Bed rest . Other treatments may include: Back braces, but these may further weaken the bones and increase the risk of more fractures, Physical therapy to improve movement and strength around the spine, A medicine called calcitonin to help relieve bone pain . Surgery may be done if you have severe and disabling pain for more than 2 months that does not get better with other treatments. Surgery can include: Balloon kyphoplasty, Vertebroplasty\u00a0, Spinal fusion. Other surgery may be done to remove bone if the fracture is due to a tumor. After surgery you may need: A brace for 6 to 10 weeks if the fracture was due to an injury, More surgery to join spine bones together or to relieve pressure on a nerve . ", "Prevention": "Treating and preventing osteoporosis is the most effective way to prevent these fractures.", "Causes": "Osteoporosis is the most common cause of this type of fracture. Osteoporosis is a disease in which bones become fragile. Usually, the bone loses calcium and other minerals.Trauma to the back, Tumors that started in the bone or spread to the bone from elsewhere, Tumors that start in the spine, such as multiple myeloma . Having many fractures of the vertabrae can lead to kyphosis. This is a hump-like curvature of the spine."}, "Child safety seats": {"description": "Special vests can be worn by older children who have outgrown forward-facing safety seats. The vests can be used instead of booster seats. The vests are used with the vehicle\u2019s lap and seat belts. As with car seats, children should be sitting in the back seat when using the vest."}, "CPR - child (1 to 8 years old)": {"Symptoms": ["No breathing", "No pulse", "Unconsciousness"], "Prevention": "Most children need CPR because of a preventable accident. The following tips may help prevent some accidents in children:Teach your children the basic principles of family safety., Teach your child to swim., Teach your child to watch for cars and ride bikes safely., Make sure you follow the guidelines for using children's car seats., Teach your child firearm safety. If you have guns in your home, keep them locked in an isolated cabinet., Teach your child the meaning of \"don't touch.\" . Never underestimate what a child can do. Assume the child can move and pick up things more than you think. Think about what the child may get into next, and be ready. Climbing and squirming are to be expected. Always use safety straps on high chairs and strollers.Choose age-appropriate toys. Do not give small children toys that are heavy or fragile. Inspect toys for small or loose parts, sharp edges, points, loose batteries, and other hazards. Keep toxic chemicals and cleaning solutions safely stored in childproof cabinets.Create a safe environment and supervise children carefully, particularly around water and near furniture. Electrical outlets, stove tops, and medicine cabinets can be dangerous for small children.", "description": "Permanent brain damage or death can occur within minutes if a child's blood flow stops. Therefore, you must continue CPR until the child's heartbeat and breathing return, or trained medical help arrives.", "Causes": "There are many things that cause a child's heartbeat and breathing to stop. Some reasons you may need to do CPR on a child include:Choking, Drowning, Electrical shock, Excessive bleeding, Head trauma or serious injury, Lung disease, Poisoning, Suffocation. "}, "Cosmetic breast surgery - discharge": {"description": "You may spend 1\u00a0to 2 days in the hospital, depending on\u00a0the type of\u00a0surgery you had."}, "Cribs and crib safety": {"description": "If you have an older crib that was made before the new safety standards were put into place:"}, "Crohn\u2019s disease - discharge": {"description": "Surgeries you may have had include repair of a fistula, small bowel resection, or ileostomy."}, "Contact dermatitis": {"description": "Contact dermatitis is a condition in which the skin becomes red, sore, or inflamed after direct contact with a substance. ", "Possible Complications": "Bacterial skin infections may occur.", "Symptoms": ["Have red bumps that may form moist, weeping blisters", "Feel warm and tender", "Ooze, drain, or crust ", "Become scaly, raw, or thickened"], "Exams and Tests": "Your health care provider will make the diagnosis based on how the skin looks and asking questions about substances you may have come in contact with.Allergy testing with skin patches (called patch testing) may determine what is causing the reaction. Patch testing is used for certain patients who have long-term or repeated contact dermatitis. It requires three office visits and must be done by a health care provider with the skill to interpret the results correctly. On the first visit, small patches of possible allergens are applied to the skin. These patches are removed 48 hours later to see if a reaction has occurred. , A third visit, about 2 days later, is done to look for any delayed reaction. , If you have already tested a material on a small area of your skin and noticed a reaction, you should bring the material with you.. Other tests may be used to rule out other possible causes, including skin lesion biopsy or culture of the skin lesion.", "Treatment": "Your doctor will recommend treatment based on what is causing the problem. In some cases, the best treatment is to do nothing to the area.Often, treatment includes washing the area with a lot of water to get rid of any traces of the irritant that are still on the skin. You should avoid further exposure to the substance.Emollients or moisturizers help keep the skin moist, and also help skin repair itself. They protect the skin from becoming inflamed again. They are a key part of preventing and treating contact dermatitis.Topical corticosteroids are medicines used to treat eczema.Topical means you place it on the skin. You will be prescribed a cream or ointment. Topical corticosteroids may also be called topical steroids or topical cortisones., Do not use more medicine or use it more often than your doctor advises you to use it.. Your doctor may also prescribe other creams or ointments, such as tacrolimus or pimecrolimus, to use on the skin.In severe cases, you may need to take corticosteroid pills. Your doctor will start you on a high dose and your dose will be slowly reduced over about 12 days. You may also receive a corticosteroid shot.Wet dressings and soothing anti-itch (antipruritic) or drying lotions may be recommended to reduce other symptoms.", "Causes": "There are two types of contact dermatitis.Irritant dermatitis: This\u00a0is the most common type. It can be\u00a0by contact with acids, alkaline materials such as soaps and detergents, fabric softeners, solvents, or other chemicals. The reaction usually looks like a burn.Other materials that may irritate your skin include:Cement, Hair dyes, Long-term exposure to wet diapers, Pesticides or weed killers, Rubber gloves, Shampoos . Allergic contact dermatitis: This form of the condition occurs when your skin comes in contact with a substance that causes you to have an allergic reaction. Common allergens include:Adhesives, including those used for false eyelashes or toupees, Antibiotics, such as neomycin rubbed on the surface of the skin, Balsam of Peru (used in many personal products and cosmetics, as well as in many foods and drinks), Fabrics and clothing, Fragrances in perfumes, cosmetics, soaps, and moisturizers, Nail polish, hair dyes, and permanent wave solutions, Nickel or other metals (found in jewelry, watch straps, metal zips, bra hooks, buttons, pocketknives, lipstick holders, and powder compacts), Poison ivy, poison oak, poison sumac, and other plants, Rubber or latex gloves or shoes . You may not have a reaction to a substance when you are first exposed to it. However, you may become more sensitive and develop a reaction if you use it regularly. Some products cause a reaction only when the skin is also exposed to sunlight (photosensitivity). These include:Shaving lotions, Sunscreens, Sulfa ointments, Some perfumes, Coal tar products, Oil from the skin of a lime. A few airborne allergens, such as ragweed or insecticide spray, can also cause contact dermatitis."}, "Chapped lips": {"description": "See your health care provider if you have sores that won't heal on your lips."}, "Chapped hands": {"description": "To soothe chapped and sore hands:"}, "Caulking compound poisoning": {"Symptoms": ["Loss of vision", "Pain in the throat", "Pain or burning in the nose, eyes, ears, lips, or tongue", "Abdominal pain", "Blood in the stool", "Burns of the food pipe (esophagus)", "Nausea", "Vomiting", "Vomiting blood", "Collapse", "Low blood pressure that develops rapidly", "Breathing difficulty (from breathing in the substance)", "Throat swelling (may also cause breathing difficulty)", "Concentration problems", "Headache", "Light-headedness", "Burn", "Irritation"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Chronic obstructive pulmonary disease": {"description": "Most people with COPD have a combination of both conditions.", "Possible Complications": "With COPD, you may have other health problems such as:Irregular heartbeat (arrhythmia), Need for breathing machine and oxygen therapy, Right-sided heart failure or cor pulmonale (heart swelling and heart failure due to chronic lung disease), Pneumonia, Pneumothorax, Severe weight loss and malnutrition, Thinning of the bones (osteoporosis), Debilitation. ", "Symptoms": ["Cough, with or without mucus", "Fatigue", "Many respiratory infections", "Shortness of breath (dyspnea) that gets worse with mild activity", "Trouble catching one's breath", "Wheezing "], "Exams and Tests": "The best test for COPD is a lung function test called spirometry. This involves blowing out as hard as possible into a small machine that tests lung capacity. The results can be checked right away. Using a stethoscope to listen to the lungs can also be helpful. But sometimes the lungs sound normal even when a person has COPD.Imaging tests\u00a0of the lungs, such as x-rays and CT scans, can be helpful. But sometimes the lungs look normal even when a person has COPD and a chest x-ray has been taken.Some patients may need to have a\u00a0blood test called arterial blood gas\u00a0to measure the amounts of oxygen and carbon dioxide in the blood.", "Treatment": "There is no cure for COPD. But there are many things you can do to relieve symptoms and keep the disease from getting worse.If you smoke, now is the time to quit. \u00a0This is the best way to slow\u00a0lung damage.Medicines used to treat COPD include:Inhalers (bronchodilators) to help open the airways, Inhaled or oral steroids to reduce lung inflammation, Anti-inflammatory drugs to reduce swelling in the airways. In severe cases or during flare-ups, you may need to receive:Steroids by mouth or through a vein (intravenously), Bronchodilators through a nebulizer, Oxygen therapy, Assistance during breathing from a machine (through a mask, BiPAP, or endotracheal tube). Your doctor may prescribe antibiotics during symptom flare-ups, because infections can make COPD worse.You may need oxygen therapy at home if you have a low level of oxygen in your blood.Pulmonary rehabilitation does not cure COPD. But it can teach you to breathe in a different way so you can stay active. LIVING WITH COPDYou can do things every day to keep COPD from getting worse, protect your lungs, and stay healthy.Walk to build up strength:Ask the doctor or therapist how far to walk., Slowly increase how far you walk., Try not to talk when you walk if you get short of breath., Use pursed lip breathing when you breathe out, to empty your lungs before the next breath.. Things you can do to make it easier for yourself around the home include:Avoid very cold air, Make sure no one smokes in your home, Reduce air pollution by getting rid of fireplace smoke and other irritants . Eat healthy\u00a0foods, including\u00a0fish, poultry, or lean meat, as well as fruits and vegetables. If it is hard to keep your weight up, talk to a doctor or dietitian about eating foods with more calories.Surgery may be used to treat COPD, but only a few patients benefit from these surgical treatments:Surgery to remove parts of the diseased lung, which\u00a0can help\u00a0less-diseased parts\u00a0work better in some patients with emphysema, Lung transplant for very\u00a0severe cases . ", "Prevention": "Not smoking prevents most COPD. Ask your health care provider about quit-smoking programs. Medicines are also available to help you stop smoking.", "Causes": "Smoking is the main cause of COPD. The more a person smokes, the more likely that person will develop COPD. But some people\u00a0 smoke for years and never get COPD.In rare cases, nonsmokers who lack a protein called alpha-1 antitrypsin can develop emphysema.Other risk factors for COPD are:Exposure to certain gases or fumes in the workplace, Exposure to heavy amounts of secondhand smoke and pollution, Frequent use of cooking fire without proper ventilation . "}, "Chancroid": {"description": "Chancroid is a bacterial infection that is spread through sexual contact.", "Possible Complications": "Complications include urethral fistulas and scars on the foreskin of the penis in uncircumcised males. Patients with chancroid should also be checked for other sexually transmitted infections, including syphilis, HIV, and genital herpes.In persons with HIV, chancroid\u00a0may take much longer to heal.", "Symptoms": ["Ranges in size from 1/8 inch to 2 inches in diameter", "Is painful", "Is soft", "Has sharply defined borders", "Has a base that is covered with a gray or yellowish-gray material", "Has a base that bleeds easily if it is banged or scraped ", "Foreskin", "Groove behind the head of the penis", "Shaft of the penis", "Head of the penis", "Opening of the penis", "Scrotum"], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider diagnoses chancroid by looking at the ulcer(s) and checking for swollen lymph nodes. There\u00a0is no blood test for chancroid.", "Treatment": "The infection is treated with antibiotics. Large lymph node swellings need to be drained, either with a needle or local surgery.", "Prevention": "Chancroid is spread by sexual contact with an infected person. Avoiding all forms of sexual activity is the only absolute way to prevent a sexually transmitted disease.However, safe sex behaviors may reduce your risk. The proper use of condoms, either the male or female type, greatly decreases the risk of catching a sexually transmitted disease. You need to wear the condom from the beginning to the end of each sexual activity.", "Causes": "Chancroid is caused by a bacteria called Haemophilus ducreyi.The infection is found in many parts of the world, such as Africa and southwest Asia. Very few people are diagnosed in the United States each year with this infection. Most people in the U.S. who are diagnosed with chancroid have traveled outside the country to areas where the infection is more common."}, "Catheter-related UTI": {"description": "When you have an indwelling urinary catheter, you are more likely to develop a urinary tract infection (UTI) in your bladder or kidneys. ", "Symptoms": ["Abnormal urine color (cloudy urine)", "Blood in the urine (hematuria)", "Foul or strong urine odor", "Frequent and strong urge to urinate", "Pressure, pain, or spasms in your back or the lower part of your belly", "Leakage of urine around the catheter ", "Chills", "Fatigue", "Fever", "Flank pain", "Mental changes or confusion (these may be the only signs of a UTI in an elderly person)", "Vomiting"], "Exams and Tests": "Urine tests will check for infection:Urinalysis may show white blood cells (WBCs) or red blood cells (RBCs)., Urine culture can help determine the type of bacteria in the urine and the best antibiotic to use. . Your doctor may recommend an ultrasound or CT exam of your urinary system.", "Causes": "Many types of bacteria or fungi can cause a catheter-related UTI. This type of UTI is harder to treat with common antibiotics.Common reasons to have an indwelling catheter are:Urine leakage (incontinence), Not being able to empty your bladder, Surgery on your bladder, prostate, or vagina . During a hospital stay, you may have an indwelling catheter:Right after any type of surgery, If you are very ill and cannot control your urine . ", "Prevention": "If you have an indwelling catheter, you must do these things to help prevent infection:Clean around the catheter opening every day., Clean the catheter with soap and water every day., Clean your rectal area thoroughly after every bowel movement., Keep your drainage bag lower than your bladder. This prevents the urine in the bag from going back into your bladder., Empty the drainage bag at least once every 8 yours, or whenever it is full., Have your indwelling catheter changed at least once a month., Wash your hands before and after you touch your urine. . Your health care provider might tell you to drink more fluids every day. This is not healthy for everyone, so talk with your doctor before you do this.", "Treatment": "People who use this type of catheter will often have an abnormal test and culture\u00a0of urine from the bag.\u00a0But even if the test is abnormal,\u00a0you may not have a UTI. This fact makes it harder for your health care provider to choose whether to treat you.If you also have symptoms of a UTI, your health care provider will likely treat you with antibiotics., If you do not have symptoms, your health care provider must consider other factors when deciding whether to treat you. . Because there is a risk that your infection may spread to your kidneys, antibiotics are almost always used to treat a UTI.Most of the time, you can take antibiotics by mouth. It is very important to take all of them, even if you feel better before you finish them., If your infection is more severe, you may need to receive antibiotics through an intravenous line, or IV., You may also receive medicine to lessen bladder spasms. . You will need more fluids to help flush bacteria out of your bladder.If you are treating yourself at home, this may mean drinking 2 - 3 quarts of fluid a day (ask your doctor if this much fluid is\u00a0safe for you.), Avoid fluids that irritate your bladder, such as alcohol, citrus juices, and drinks that\u00a0contain caffeine. . After you have finished your treatment, you will have another urine test to make sure the bacteria are gone.Your catheter will need to be changed when you have a UTI. If you have many UTIs, your doctor may remove the indwelling catheter. The doctor may also: Ask you to insert a urine catheter, Suggest other urine collection devices, Suggest surgery so you do not need a catheter . Your health care provider may prescribe a low-dose antibiotic for you to take every day. This can help prevent bacteria from growing in your catheter."}, "CPK isoenzymes test": {"description": "The CPK isoenzymes test measures the different forms of creatine phosphokinase (CPK) in the blood. CPK is an enzyme found mainly in the heart, brain, and skeletal muscle."}, "Complement": {"description": "There are nine major complement proteins. They are labeled C1 through C9."}, "Colon cancer": {"description": "Other types of cancer can affect the colon. These include lymphoma, carcinoid tumors, melanoma, and sarcomas. These are rare. In this article, colon cancer refers to colon carcinoma only.", "Possible Complications": "Complications may include:Blockage of the colon, causing bowel obstruction, Cancer returning in the colon, Cancer spreading to other organs or tissues (metastasis), Development of a second primary colorectal cancer . ", "Symptoms": ["Abdominal pain and tenderness in the lower abdomen\r\n  ", "Blood in the stool", "Diarrhea, constipation, or other change in bowel habits", "Narrow stools", "Weight loss with no known reason "], "Exams and Tests": "Through screening tests, colon cancer can be detected before symptoms develop. This is when the cancer is most curable.Your doctor will perform a physical exam and press on your belly area. The physical exam rarely shows any problems, although the doctor may feel a lump (mass) in the abdomen. A rectal exam may reveal a mass in people with rectal cancer, but not colon cancer.A fecal occult blood test (FOBT) may detect small amounts of blood in the stool. This may suggest colon cancer. A sigmoidoscopy, or more likely, a colonoscopy, will be done to evaluate the cause of blood in your stool. Only a full colonoscopy can see the entire colon. This is the best screening test for colon cancer.Blood tests may be done for those diagnosed with colorectal cancer, including:Complete blood count (CBC) to check for anemia, Liver function tests. If you are diagnosed with colorectal cancer, more tests will be done to see if the cancer has spread. This is called staging. CT or MRI scans of the abdomen, pelvic area, chest, or brain may be used to stage the cancer. Sometimes, PET scans are also used.Stages of colon cancer are:Stage 0: Very early cancer on the innermost layer of the intestine, Stage I: Cancer is in the inner layers of the colon, Stage II: Cancer has spread through the muscle wall of the colon, Stage III: Cancer has spread to the lymph nodes, Stage IV: Cancer has spread to other organs outside the colon . Blood tests to detect tumor markers, such as carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) may help the doctor follow you during and after treatment.", "Treatment": "Treatment depends on many things, including the stage of the cancer. Treatments may include:Surgery to remove the tumor, Chemotherapy to kill cancer cells, Radiation therapy to destroy cancerous tissue . SurgeryStage 0 colon cancer may be treated by removing the tumor. This is done using colonoscopy. For stages I, II, and III cancer, more extensive surgery is needed to remove the part of the colon that is cancerous. This surgery is called colon resection(colectomy).ChemotherapyAlmost all people with stage III colon cancer receive chemotherapy after surgery for 6 to 8 months. This is called adjuvant chemotherapy. Even though the tumor was removed, chemotherapy is given to treat any cancer cells that may be left.Chemotherapy is also used to improve symptoms and prolong survival in people with stage IV colon cancer.You may receive just one type of medicine or a combination of medicines. RadiationRadiation therapy is sometimes used for colon cancer. It is usually used in combination with chemotherapy for people with stage III rectal cancer.For people with stage IV disease that has spread to the liver, treatment directed at the liver can be used. This may include:Burning the cancer (ablation), Delivering chemotherapy or radiation directly into the liver, Freezing the cancer (cryotherapy), Surgery . ", "Prevention": "Colon cancer can almost always be caught by colonoscopy in its earliest and most curable stages. Almost all men and women age 50 and older should have a colon cancer screening. People at higher risk may need earlier screening.Colon cancer screening can often find polyps before they become cancerous. Removing these polyps may prevent colon cancer.Changing your diet and lifestyle is important. Medical research suggests that low-fat and high-fiber diets may reduce your risk of colon cancer.Some studies have reported that NSAIDs (aspirin, ibuprofen, naproxen, and celecoxib) may help reduce the risk of colorectal cancer. But these medicines can increase your risk of bleeding and heart problems. Your provider can tell you more about the risks and benefits of the medicines and other ways that help prevent colorectal cancer. ", "Causes": "In the United States, colorectal cancer is one of the leading causes of deaths due to cancer. Early diagnosis can often lead to a complete cure.Almost all colon cancers start in the lining of the colon and rectum. When doctors talk about colorectal cancer, this is usually what they are talking about.There is no single cause of colon cancer. Nearly all colon cancers begin as noncancerous (benign) polyps, which slowly develop into cancer.You have a high risk of colon cancer if you:Are older than 60, Are African American or of eastern European descent, Eat a lot of red or processed meats, Have colorectal polyps, Have inflammatory bowel disease (Crohn disease or ulcerative colitis), Have a family history of colon cancer, Have a personal history of breast cancer . Some inherited diseases also increase the risk of developing colon cancer. One of the most common is called familial adenomatous polyposis (FAP).What you eat may play a role in getting colon cancer. Colon cancer may be linked to a high-fat, low-fiber diet and to a high intake of red meat. Some studies have found that the risk does not drop if you switch to a high-fiber diet, so this link is not yet clear.Smoking cigarettes and drinking alcohol are other risk factors for colorectal cancer."}, "Cold wave lotion poisoning": {"Symptoms": ["Mouth irritation", "Burning and redness of the eyes", "Possibly serious damage to the cornea of the eyes", "Weakness due to low blood sugar", "Shortness of breath", "Drowsiness", "Seizures (convulsions)", "Bluish-colored lips and fingers", "Rash (reddening or blistering of the skin)", "Cramping", "Diarrhea", "Stomach pain", "Vomiting"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Choosing the right health care provider for pregnancy and childbirth": {"description": "Think about these things as you decide what kind of health care provider you want to see during your pregnancy and the birth of your baby:"}, "Candida infection of the skin": {"description": "Cutaneous candidiasis is an infection of the skin with a candida fungus.", "Possible Complications": "These complications may occur:Infection of the nails may cause the nails to become oddly shaped and may cause an infection around the nail., Candida skin infections may return., Widespread candidiasis may occur in people with weakened immune systems. . ", "Symptoms": ["Red, growing skin rash", "Rash on the skin folds, genitals, middle of the body, buttocks, under the breasts, and other areas of skin", "Infection of the hair follicles that may look like pimples "], "Exams and Tests": "Your health care provider can usually diagnose this condition by looking at your skin. Your provider may gently scrape off a sample of skin for testing. Older children and adults with a yeast skin infection should be tested for diabetes. High sugar levels, seen in people with diabetes, act as food for the yeast fungus, and help it grow. ", "Treatment": "Good general health and hygiene are very important for treating candida infections of the skin. Keeping the skin dry and exposed to air is helpful. Drying powders may help prevent fungal infections. Losing weight may help eliminate the problem if you are overweight.Proper blood sugar control may also be helpful to those with diabetes.Antifungal skin creams or ointments may be used to treat a yeast infection of the skin, mouth, or vagina. You may need to take antifungal medicine by mouth for severe candida infections in the mouth, throat, or vagina.", "Causes": "The body normally hosts a variety of germs, including bacteria and fungi. Some of these are useful to the body, some produce no harm or benefit, and some can cause harmful infections.Some fungal infections are caused by fungi that live on the hair, nails, and outer skin layers. They include yeast-like fungi such as Candida.In cutaneous candidiasis, the skin is infected with Candida fungi. This type of infection is fairly common. It can involve almost any skin on the body, but most often it occurs in warm, moist, creased areas such as the armpits and groin. The fungus that most often causes cutaneous candidiasis is Candida albicans.Candida is the most common cause of diaper rash in infants. The fungi take advantage of the warm, moist conditions inside the diaper. Candida infection is particularly common in people with diabetes and in those who are obese. Antibiotics, steroid therapy, and chemotherapy increase the risk of cutaneous candidiasis. Candida can also cause infections of the nails, edges of the nails, and corners of the mouth.Oral thrush, a form of Candida infection of the moist lining of the mouth, usually occurs when people take antibiotics. It may also be a sign of an HIV infection or other weakened immune system disorders when it occurs in adults. Individuals with Candida infections are not usually contagious, though in some settings people with weakened immune systems may catch the infection.Candida is also the most frequent cause of vaginal yeast infections. These infections are common and often occur with antibiotic use. People with seriously weakened immune systems and cutaneous candidiasis may go on to develop more serious Candida infections inside their body."}, "Colonoscopy": {"description": "The colonoscope has a small camera attached to a flexible tube that can reach the length of the colon."}, "Cow's milk - infants": {"description": "Whether you use breast milk or formula, your baby may have colic and be fussy. These are common problems in all babies. Most of the time, cow's milk formulas don't cause these symptoms, so it won't help if you switch to a different formula."}, "Caloric stimulation": {"description": "Caloric stimulation is a test that uses differences in temperature to diagnose damage to the acoustic nerve. This is the nerve that is involved in hearing and balance. The test also checks for damage to the brain stem."}, "Cooking without salt": {"description": "To get down to a healthy level, learn how to trim the excess salt from your diet."}, "Common peroneal nerve dysfunction": {"description": "Common peroneal nerve dysfunction is damage to the peroneal nerve leading to loss of movement or sensation in the foot and leg.", "Possible Complications": "Decreased ability to walk\r\n, Permanent decrease in sensation in the legs or feet\r\n, Permanent weakness or paralysis in the legs or feet\r\n, Side effects of medication. ", "Symptoms": ["Decreased sensation, numbness, or tingling in the top of the foot or the outer part of the upper or lower leg", "Foot that drops (unable to hold the foot up)", "\"Slapping\" gait (walking pattern in which each step makes a slapping noise)", "Toes drag while walking", "Walking problems", "Weakness of the ankles or feet"], "Exams and Tests": "Examination of the legs may show: Loss of muscle control in the lower legs and feet, Atrophy of the foot or foreleg muscles, Difficulty lifting up the foot and toes and making toe-out movements. Tests of nerve activity include:Electromyography (EMG, a test of electrical activity in muscles), Nerve conduction tests, MRI, Nerve ultrasound\u00a0\r\n . What other tests are done depend on the suspected cause of nerve dysfunction, and the person's symptoms and how they developed. Tests may include blood tests, x-rays and scans.", "Treatment": "Treatment aims to improve mobility and independence. Any illness or other cause of the neuropathy should be treated. Padding the knee may prevent further injury by crossing the legs and remind you to not cross your legs.Corticosteroids injected into the area may reduce swelling and pressure on the nerve in some cases.You may need surgery if:The disorder does not go away, You have problems with movement, There is evidence that the nerve axon is damaged. Surgery to relieve pressure on the nerve may reduce symptoms if the disorder is caused by pressure on the nerve. Surgery to remove tumors on the nerve may also help.CONTROLLING SYMPTOMSYou may need over-the-counter or prescription pain relievers to control pain. Other medications may be used to reduce pain include gabapentin, carbamazepine, or tricyclic antidepressants such as amitriptyline. Whenever possible, avoid or limit the use of medication to reduce the risk of side effects.If your pain is severe, a pain specialist can help you explore all options for pain relief.Physical therapy exercises may help you maintain muscle strength.Orthopedic devices may improve your ability to walk and prevent contractures. These may include braces, splints, orthopedic shoes, or other equipment.Vocational counseling, occupational therapy, or similar programs may help you maximize your mobility and independence.", "Prevention": "Avoid putting long-term pressure on the back or side of the knee. Treat injuries to the leg or knee right away.If a cast, splint, dressing, or other pressure on the lower leg causes a tight feeling or numbness, call your health care provider.", "Causes": "The peroneal nerve is a branch of the sciatic nerve, which supplies movement and sensation to the lower leg, foot and toes. Common peroneal nerve dysfunction is a type of peripheral neuropathy (damage to nerves outside the brain or spinal cord). This condition can affect people of any age.Dysfunction of a single nerve, such as the common peroneal nerve, is called a mononeuropathy. Mononeuropathy means the nerve damage occurred in one area. However, certain body-wide conditions may also cause single nerve injuries.Damage to the nerve destroys the myelin sheath that covers the axon (branch of the nerve cell). Or it may destroy the whole nerve cell. There is a loss of feeling, muscle control, muscle tone, and eventual loss of muscle mass because the nerves aren't stimulating the muscles.Common causes of damage to the peroneal nerve include the following:Trauma or injury to the knee, Fracture of the fibula (a bone of the lower leg), Use of a tight plaster cast (or other long-term constriction) of the lower leg, Crossing the legs regularly, Regularly wearing high boots, Pressure to the knee from positions during deep sleep or coma, Injury during knee surgery or from being placed in an awkward position during anesthesia. Common peroneal nerve injury is more common in people:Who are very thin (for example, from anorexia nervosa), Who have conditions such as diabetic neuropathy or polyarteritis nodosa, Who are exposed to certain toxins that can damage the common peroneal nerve. Charcot-Marie-Tooth disease is an inherited disorder that affects all of the nerves. Peroneal nerve dysfunction occurs early in this disorder."}, "Central venous catheter - flushing ": {"description": "It is okay to take showers and baths 7 to10 days after your catheter was put in place. When you do, make sure the dressings are secure and your catheter site is staying dry. Do not let the catheter site go under water if you are soaking in the bathtub."}, "Comedones": {"description": "Comedones are small, flesh-colored, white, or dark bumps that give skin a rough texture. The bumps are caused by acne. They are found at the opening of a sebaceous follicle (pore). \r\n"}, "Concomitant": {"description": "Concomitant means occurring during the same time period. It usually refers to secondary symptoms that occur with a main symptom."}, "Cervical MRI scan": {"description": "Single MRI images are called slices. The images can be stored on a computer or printed on film. One exam produces many images."}, "Colorectal polyps": {"description": "A colorectal polyp is a growth on the lining of the colon or rectum.", "Symptoms": ["Blood in the stools", "Diarrhea (rare)", "Fatigue caused by losing blood over time "], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider will perform a physical exam. A large polyp may be felt during a rectal exam.Most polyps are found with the following tests:Barium enema, Colonoscopy, Sigmoidoscopy, Stool test for hidden (occult) blood, Virtual colonoscopy. ", "Causes": "Polyps of the colon and rectum are usually benign. This means they are not cancerous and do not spread. You may have one or many polyps. They become more common with age.Common polyp types include:Adenomatous polyps - which may develop into colon cancer over time., Hyperplastic polyp - which usually do not develop into colon cancer. , Serrated polyps - less common but may develop into colon cancer over time. Polyps bigger than 1 centimeter have a higher cancer risk than polyps\u00a0smaller than\u00a01 centimeter. Risk factors include:Age, Family history of colon cancer or polyps, A type of polyp called villous adenoma . Polyps may also be linked to some inherited disorders, including:Familial adenomatous polyposis (FAP), Gardner syndrome (a type of FAP), Juvenile polyposis (disease that causes many benign growths in the intestine), Lynch syndrome (HNPCC; disease that raises the chance of many types of cancer, including in the intestine)\\, Peutz-Jeghers syndrome (disease that causes intestinal polyps). ", "Prevention": "To reduce your risk of developing polyps:Eat foods low in fat and eat more fruits, vegetables, and fiber., Do not smoke or drink alcohol in excess., Maintain a normal body weight., Get regular exercise.. Your healthcare provider can order a colonoscopy or other screening tests: These tests help prevent colon cancer by finding and removing polyps before they become cancer. This may reduce the chance of developing colon cancer, or at least help catch it in its most treatable stage. , Most people should begin these tests at age 50. Those with a family history of colon cancer or colon polyps may need to be screened at an earlier age or more often.. Taking aspirin or similar medicines may help reduce the risk of new polyps. Be aware that these medicines can have serious side effects if taken for a long time. Side effects include bleeding in the stomach or colon and heart disease. Talk with your doctor before taking these medicines.", "Treatment": "Colorectal polyps should be removed because some can develop into cancer. In most cases, the polyps may be removed during a colonoscopy.For people with adenomatous polyps, new polyps can appear in the future. You should have a repeat colonoscopy usually 1 to 10 years later, depending on:Your age and general health, Number of polyps you had , Size and type of the polyps. In rare cases, when polyps are very likely to turn into cancer, the doctor will recommend a colectomy. This is surgery to remove part of the colon that has the polyps."}, "Colostomy": {"description": "Colostomy is a surgical procedure that brings one end of the large intestine out through an opening (stoma) made in\u00a0the abdominal wall. Stools moving through the intestine drain through the stoma into a bag attached to the abdomen."}, "Corns and calluses": {"description": "Corns and calluses are thick layers of skin. They are caused by repeated pressure or friction at the spot where the corn or callus develops. ", "Possible Complications": "Complications of corns and calluses are rare. People with diabetes are prone to ulcers and infections and should regularly examine their feet to identify any problems right away. Such foot injuries need medical attention.", "Symptoms": ["Skin is thick and hardened.", "Skin may be flaky and dry.", "Hardened, thick skin areas are found on hands, feet, or other areas that may be rubbed or pressed.", "The affected areas can be painful and may bleed."], "Exams and Tests": "Your health care provider will make the diagnosis after looking at your skin. In most cases, tests are not needed.", "Treatment": "Preventing friction is often the only treatment needed.To treat corns:If poor fitting shoes are causing the corn, changing to shoes that fit better will get rid of the problem most of the time., Protect the corn with a doughnut-shaped corn pad while it is healing. You can buy these at most drug stores.. To treat calluses:Calluses often occur due to excess pressure placed on the skin because of another problem such as bunions or hammertoes. Proper treatment of any underlying condition should prevent the calluses from returning., Wear gloves to protect your hands during activities that cause friction (such as gardening and weight lifting) can help prevent calluses.. If an infection or ulcer occurs in an area of a callus or corn,\u00a0the tissue may need to be removed by a health care provider. You may need to take antibiotics.", "Causes": "Corns and calluses are caused by pressure or friction on skin. A corn is thickened skin on the top or side of a toe. Most of the time it is caused by bad fitting shoes. A callus is thickened skin on your hands or the soles of your feet.The thickening of the skin is a protective reaction. For example, farmers and rowers get calluses on their\u00a0hands that prevent blisters from forming. People with bunions often develop a callus over the bunion because it rubs against the shoe.Corns and calluses are not serious problems."}, "Cryptosporidium enteritis": {"description": "Cryptosporidium enteritis is an infection of the small intestine that causes diarrhea.\u00a0The parasite Cryptosporidium causes this infection.", "Possible Complications": "Inflammation of a bile duct, Inflammation of the gallbladder, Inflammation of the liver (hepatitis), Malabsorption (not enough nutrients being absorbed from the intestinal tract), Pancreatitis, Wasting syndrome (loss of body mass that causes extreme thinness and weakness). ", "Symptoms": ["Abdominal cramping", "Diarrhea, which is usually watery, large-volume, and occurs many times a day", "\r\n  General sick feeling (malaise)\r\n  ", "Malnutrition and weight loss (in severe cases)", "Nausea"], "Exams and Tests": "Antibody test to see if Cryptosporidium is in the stool, Intestinal biopsy (rare), Stool exam with special techniques (called AFB staining), Stool exam using a microscope to look for the parasites and their ova (eggs). ", "Treatment": "There are several treatments for cryptosporidium enteritis.Drugs such as nitazoxanide have been used in children and adults. Other drugs that are sometimes used include:Atovaquone, Paromomycin. These drugs often help only for a little while. It is common for the infection to return.The best approach is to improve immune function in people who have a weakened immune system. In people with AIDS, this can be done by using highly active antiviral therapy. It can lead to a complete remission of cryptosporidium enteritis.", "Prevention": "Proper sanitation and hygiene, including handwashing, are important measures for preventing this illness.Certain water filters can also reduce risk by filtering out the Cryptosporidium eggs. However, the pores of the filter must be smaller than 1 micron to be effective. If you have a weakened immune system, ask your doctor if you need to boil your water.", "Causes": "Cryptosporidium has recently been recognized as a cause of diarrhea worldwide in all age groups. It has a greater effect on\u00a0people with a weakened immune system, including:People who take medications to suppress their immune system, People with HIV or AIDS, Transplant recipients. In these groups, this infection is not just bothersome, it also can lead to severe and life-threatening loss of muscle and body mass (wasting) and malnutrition.The major risk factor is\u00a0drinking water that is contaminated with feces.\u00a0People at higher risk include:Animal handlers, Men who have sex with men, People who are in close contact with infected people, Young children. Some outbreaks have been very large. Outbreaks\u00a0have been\u00a0linked to:Drinking from contaminated public water supplies, Drinking unpasteurized cider, Swimming in contaminated pools and lakes. "}, "CA-125 blood test": {"description": "The CA-125 blood test measures the level of the protein CA-125 in the blood. "}, "Coloboma of the iris": {"description": "Coloboma of the iris is a hole or defect of the iris of the eye. Most colobomas are present since birth (congenital).", "Causes": "Coloboma can occur due to:Eye surgery, Inherited conditions, Trauma to the eye. Most cases of coloboma have no known cause and are not related to other abnormalities. A small number of people with coloboma have other inherited developmental problems."}, "Cleaning supplies and equipment": {"description": "Follow your workplace policies on how to clean supplies and equipment."}, "Cysticercosis": {"description": "Cysticercosis is an infection by a parasite called Taenia solium (T. solium), a pork tapeworm that creates cysts in different areas in the body.", "Possible Complications": "Blindness, decreased vision, Heart failure or abnormal heart rhythm, Hydrocephalus (fluid buildup in part of the brain, often with increased pressure), Seizures . ", "Symptoms": ["Brain\u00a0-- seizures or symptoms similar to those of a brain tumor", "Eyes -- decreased vision or blindness", "Heart\u00a0-- abnormal heart rhythms or heart failure (rare)", "Spine\u00a0-- weakness or changes in walking due to damage to nerves in the spine"], "Exams and Tests": "Tests that may be done include:Blood tests to detect antibodies to the parasite, Biopsy of the affected area, CT scan, MRI scan, or x-rays to detect the lesion, Spinal tap (lumbar puncture), Test in which an ophthalmologist looks inside the fundus of the eye. ", "Treatment": "Treatment may involve:Medicines to kill the parasites, such as albendazole or praziquantel, Powerful anti-inflammatories (steroids) to reduce swelling . If the cyst is in the eye or brain, steroids should be started a few days before other medicines to avoid problems caused by swelling during antiparasitic treatment. Not all patients benefit from antiparasitic treatment.Sometimes surgery may be needed to remove the infected area.", "Prevention": "Avoid unwashed foods, do not eat uncooked foods while traveling, and always wash fruits and vegetables well. ", "Causes": "Cysticercosis is caused by swallowing eggs from T. solium, which are found in contaminated food. Autoinfection is when a person is already infected with adult T. solium, then swallows eggs following improper hand washing after a bowel movement.Risk factors include eating pork, fruits, and vegetables contaminated with T. solium as a result of undercooking or improper food preparation. The disease can also be spread by contact with infected feces.The disease is rare in the United States, but is common in many developing countries."}, "Corneal transplant - discharge ": {"description": "Numbing medicine was injected into the area around your eye so you did not feel any pain during surgery. You may have taken a sedative to help you relax."}, "Contracture deformity": {"description": "Contractures mostly occur in the skin, the tissues underneath, and the muscles, tendons, ligaments, and joint areas. They affect range of motion and function in a certain body part. There is usually also pain. ", "Causes": "Contracture can be caused by any of the following:Brain and nervous system disorders, such as cerebral palsy or stroke, Inherited disorders (such as muscular dystrophy), Nerve damage, Reduced use (for example, from lack of mobility), Scarring after traumatic injury or burns . "}, "COPD and other health problems": {"description": "Having COPD is a lot to manage. But try to stay positive. You can protect your health by understanding why you are at risk for certain conditions and learning how to prevent them."}, "Choroid": {"description": "The choroid is the layer of blood vessels and connective tissue between the sclera (white of the eye) and retina. It is part of the uvea and supplies nutrients to the inner parts of the eye. Inflammation of the choroid is called choroiditis."}, "Chin augmentation": {"description": "A chin augmentation is a surgical procedure to reshape or enhance the size of the chin. It may be done either by inserting an implant or by moving or reshaping bones."}, "Congenital antithrombin III deficiency": {"description": "Congenital antithrombin III deficiency is a genetic disorder that causes the blood to clot more than normal.", "Possible Complications": "Blood clots can cause death. Blood clots in the lungs are very dangerous.", "Symptoms": ["Coughing up blood", "Fainting", "Shortness of breath and pain when taking deep breaths", "Swelling of one leg"], "Exams and Tests": "A physical exam may show:Abnormal lung sounds, Fast breathing, Fast heart rate, Swollen foot or leg. The doctor will check for low blood level of antithrombin III. There are different methods for checking this level.", "Treatment": "A blood clot is treated with blood thinning medications (also called anticoagulants). How long you need to take these medications depends on how serious the blood clot was and other factors. Discuss this with your health care provider.", "Prevention": "There is no way to prevent it. Once a person is diagnosed with antithrombin III deficiency, all close family members should be screened.", "Causes": "Antithrombin III is a protein in the blood that naturally blocks abnormal blood clots from forming. It helps the body keep a healthy between bleeding and clotting. Congenital antithrombin III deficiency is an inherited disease. It occurs when a person receives one abnormal copy of the antithrombin III gene from a parent with the disease.The abnormal gene leads to low levels of antithrombin III. These low levels of antithrombin III can cause abnormal blood clots (thrombi) that can block blood flow and damage organs. People with this condition will often have a blood clot at a young age. They are also likely to have family members who have had a blood clotting problem. \u00a0Blood clots may occur in people who do not have the common risk factors for clotting. "}, "Charley horse ": {"description": "A charley horse is the common name for a muscle spasm. Muscle spasms can occur in any muscle in the body, but often happen in the leg. When a muscle is in spasm, it contracts without your control and does not relax.", "Symptoms": [], "Exams and Tests": "To diagnose a spasm, your health care provider will look for tight or hard muscles that are very tender to the touch. There are no imaging studies or blood tests\u00a0for this condition. If the spasm is caused by nerve irritation, such as in the back, an MRI may be helpful to find the cause of the problem.", "Causes": "Muscle spasms often occur when a muscle is overused or injured. Things that might bring on a muscle spasm include:Exercising when you have not had enough fluids (you're dehydrated). , Having low levels of minerals such as potassium or calcium.. Some spasms occur because the nerve that connects to a muscle is irritated.\u00a0One example is a herniated disk\u00a0irritates the\u00a0spinal nerves and causes pain and spasm in the back muscles. Spasms in the calf often occur while kicking during swimming. They can also happen\u00a0at night\u00a0when you are\u00a0in bed. Upper leg spasms are more common with running or jumping activities. Spasm in the neck (cervical spine) can be a sign of stress.", "Prevention": "Stretch to improve your flexibility., Change your workouts so that you are exercising within your ability., Drink plenty of fluids while exercising and increase your potassium intake. Orange juice and bananas are great sources of potassium. . ", "Treatment": "Stop your activity and try stretching and massaging the affected muscle at the first sign of a spasm.\u00a0Heat will relax the muscle at first. Ice may be helpful after the first spasm and when the pain has improved. If the muscle is still sore after heat and ice, you can use\u00a0nonsteroidal anti-inflammatory medicines\u00a0to help with pain. In more severe cases, your health care provider can prescribe antispasm medications.After you get treated, your health care provider should look for the cause of the spasm so that it doesn't recur. If an irritated nerve is involved, you might need physical therapy or even surgery.Drinking water or sports drinks when exercising can help ease cramps due to dehydration.\u00a0If drinking water alone is not enough, salt tablets or sports drinks may help replace minerals in your body. "}, "Chromium - blood test": {"description": "Chromium is a mineral that affects insulin, carbohydrate, fat, and protein levels in the body. This article discusses the test to check the amount of chromium in your blood."}, "Chronic thyroiditis (Hashimoto disease)": {"description": "Chronic thyroiditis is swelling (inflammation) of the thyroid gland that often results in reduced thyroid function (hypothyroidism).", "Possible Complications": "This condition can occur with other autoimmune disorders. In rare cases, thyroid cancer or thyroid lymphoma may develop.", "Symptoms": ["Constipation", "Difficulty concentrating or thinking", "Dry skin", "Enlarged neck or presence of goiter", "Fatigue", "Hair loss", "Heavy and irregular periods", "Intolerance to cold", "Mild weight gain", "Small or shrunken thyroid gland (late in the disease) "], "Exams and Tests": "Laboratory tests to determine thyroid function include:Free T4 test, Serum TSH, T3, Thyroid autoantibodies. Imaging studies are generally not needed to diagnose Hashimoto thyroiditis.This disease may also change the results of the following tests:Complete blood count, Serum prolactin, Serum sodium, Total cholesterol . ", "Treatment": "A lack of thyroid hormone may develop. You may receive thyroid hormone replacement therapy (levothyroxine) if your body is not producing enough of the hormone. Or, you may receive it if you have signs of mild thyroid failure (such as elevated TSH). This condition is also known as subclinical hypothyroidism.If there is no evidence of thyroid hormone deficiency, you may just need to be seen regularly by a health care provider.", "Prevention": "There is no known way to prevent this disorder. Being aware of risk factors may allow earlier diagnosis and treatment.", "Causes": "Chronic thyroiditis or Hashimoto disease is a common thyroid gland disorder. It can occur at any age, but is most often seen in middle-aged women. It is caused by a reaction of the immune system against the thyroid gland.The disease begins slowly. It may take months or even years for the condition to be detected. Chronic thyroiditis is most common in women and in people with a family history of thyroid disease. In rare cases, Hashimoto disease may be related to other hormone problems caused by the immune system.\u00a0This condition\u00a0can occur with adrenal insufficiency and type 1 diabetes. In these cases, the condition is called type 2 polyglandular autoimmune syndrome (PGA II).Less commonly, Hashimoto disease occurs as part of a condition called type 1 polyglandular autoimmune syndrome (PGA I), along with:Adrenal insufficiency (poor function of the adrenal glands) , Fungal infections of the mouth and nails, Hypoparathyroidism (underactive parathyroid gland) . "}, "Chemotherapy - what to ask your doctor": {"description": "You are having chemotherapy,\u00a0medicines used to kill cancer cells. You may receive chemotherapy by mouth, by injection under the skin, through an intravenous (IV) line. Your doctor or nurse may need to follow you closely while you are having chemotherapy. You will also need to learn how to care for yourself during this time."}, "Conjunctiva": {"description": "Inflammation of the conjunctiva is called conjunctivitis, which makes the white of the eye appear red."}, "Coarctation of the aorta": {"description": "Coarctation of the aorta is a narrowing of part of the aorta (the major artery leading out of the heart). It is a type of birth defect. ", "Possible Complications": "Complications that may occur before, during, or soon after surgery include:Aortic aneurysm, Aortic dissection, Aortic rupture, Bleeding in the brain, Early\u00a0development of coronary artery disease (CAD), Endocarditis (infection in the heart), Heart failure, Hoarseness, Kidney\u00a0problems, Paralysis of the lower half of the body (a rare complication of surgery to repair coarctation), Severe high blood pressure, Stroke. Long-term complications include:Continued or repeated narrowing of the aorta, Endocarditis\u00a0, High blood pressure . ", "Symptoms": ["Chest pain", "Cold feet or legs", "Dizziness or fainting", "Decreased ability to exercise", "Failure to thrive", "Leg cramps with exercise", "Nosebleed", "Poor growth", "Pounding headache", "Shortness of breath\u00a0"], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider will perform a physical exam and take\u00a0the blood pressure and pulse in\u00a0the arms and legs.The pulse in the groin (femoral) area or feet will be weaker than the pulse in the arms or\u00a0neck (carotid). Sometimes, the femoral pulse may not be felt at all., The blood pressure in\u00a0the legs is usually weaker than in the arms. Blood pressure is usually higher in the arms after infancy. . The doctor will use a stethoscope to listen to\u00a0the heart and check for murmurs. People with aortic coarctation often have a harsh-sounding murmur that can be heard from the back. Other types of murmurs may also be present.Coarctation is often discovered during a newborn's first examination or well-baby exam. Taking the pulse in an infant is an important part of the examination, because there may not be any other symptoms until the child is older.Tests to diagnose this condition may include:Cardiac catheterization and aortography, Chest x-ray, Echocardiography is the most common test to diagnose this condition, and it may also be used to monitor the patient after surgery , Heart CT may be needed in older children, MRI or MR angiography of the chest may be needed in older children\u00a0\u00a0. Both Doppler ultrasound and cardiac catheterization can be used to see if there are any differences in blood pressure in different areas of the aorta.", "Treatment": "Most newborns with symptoms will have surgery either right after birth or soon afterward. First they will receive medications to stabilize them.Children who are diagnosed when they are older will also need surgery. Usually, the symptoms are not as severe, and more time\u00a0can be taken to plan for surgery.During surgery, the narrowed part of the aorta will be removed or opened. If the problem area is small, the two free ends of the aorta may be re-connected. This is called an end-to-end\u00a0anastomosis. If a large part of the aorta is removed, a graft (using either\u00a0man-made\u00a0or a cadaveric material) or one of the patient's own arteries may be used to fill the gap. A tube graft connecting two parts of the aorta may also be used.Sometimes, doctors will try to stretch open the narrowed part of the aorta by using a\u00a0balloon that is widened\u00a0inside the blood vessel. This type of procedure is called a\u00a0balloon angioplasty.\u00a0It may be done instead of surgery, but it has a higher rate of failure.Older children usually need medicines to treat high blood pressure after surgery. Some will need lifelong treatment for this problem.", "Prevention": "There is no known way to prevent this disorder. However, being aware of your risk may lead to early\u00a0diagnosis and treatment.", "Causes": "The exact cause of coarctation of the aorta is unknown. It results from abnormalities in development of the aorta prior to birth. The aorta carries blood from the heart to the vessels that supply the body with blood. If part of the aorta is narrowed, it is hard for blood to pass through the artery.Aortic coarctation is more common in persons with certain genetic disorders, such as Turner syndrome. Aortic coarctation is one of the more common heart conditions that are present at birth (congenital heart defects). It is usually diagnosed in children or adults under age 40.This condition may be associated with cerebral aneurysms, which can increase the risk for stroke.Coarctation of the aorta may be seen with other congenital heart defects, such as:Bicuspid aortic valve, Defects in which only one ventricle is present, Ventricular septal defect . "}, "Cholesterol - what to ask your doctor ": {"description": "Below are some questions you may want to ask your doctor or nurse to help you take care of your cholesterol."}, "Cholesterol testing and results": {"description": "The ideal values for all cholesterol results depend on whether you have heart disease, diabetes, or other risk factors. Your provider can tell you what your goal should be. "}, "Cardiac amyloidosis": {"description": "Cardiac amyloidosis is a disorder caused by deposits of an abnormal protein (amyloid) in the heart tissue. These deposits make it hard for the heart to work properly.", "Possible Complications": "Atrial fibrillation or ventricular arrhythmias, Congestive heart failure, Fluid buildup in the abdomen (ascites), Increased sensitivity to digoxin , Low blood pressure and dizziness from excessive urination (due to medication) , Sick sinus syndrome, Symptomatic cardiac conduction system disease (arrhythmias related to abnormal conduction of impulses through the heart muscle). ", "Symptoms": ["Excessive urination at night", "Fatigue, reduced exercise ability", "Palpitations (sensation of feeling heart beat)", "Shortness of breath with activity", "Swelling of the abdomen, legs, ankles, or other part of the body", "Trouble breathing while lying down"], "Exams and Tests": "The signs of cardiac amyloidosis can be related to a number of different conditions. This can make the problem hard to diagnose.Signs may include:Abnormal sounds in the lung (lung crackles) or a heart murmur, Blood pressure that is low or drops when you stand up, Enlarged neck veins, Swollen liver . The following tests may be done:Chest or abdomen CT scan (considered the \"gold standard\" to help diagnose this condition), Coronary angiography, Echocardiogram, Magnetic resonance imaging (MRI), Nuclear heart scans (MUGA, RNV) . An ECG may show problems with the heart beat or heart signals.A cardiac biopsy is used to confirm the diagnosis. A biopsy of another area, such as the abdomen, kidney, or bone marrow, is often done as well.", "Treatment": "Your doctor may tell you to make changes to your diet, including limiting salt and fluids. You may need to take water pills (diuretics) to help your body get rid of excess fluid. The doctor may tell you to weigh yourself every day. A weight gain of 3 or more pounds over 1 - 2 days can mean there is too much fluid in the body.Medicines including digoxin, calcium channel blockers, and beta blockers may be used in people with atrial fibrillation. However, the drugs must be used with caution, and the dosage must be carefully monitored. People with cardiac amyloidosis may be extra sensitive to side effects of these drugs.Other treatments may include:Chemotherapy, Implantable cardioverter-defibrillator (AICD), Pacemaker, if there are problems with heart signals, Prednisone, an anti-inflammatory medicine. A heart transplant may be considered for people with some types of amyloidosis who have very poor heart function. People with hereditary amyloidosis may need a liver transplant.", "Causes": "Amyloidosis is a group of diseases in which clumps of proteins called amyloids build up in body tissues. Over time, these proteins replace normal tissue, leading to failure of the involved organ. There are many forms of amyloidosis.Cardiac amyloidosis (\"stiff heart syndrome\") occurs when amyloid deposits take the place of normal heart muscle. It is the most typical type of restrictive cardiomyopathy. Cardiac amyloidosis may affect the way electrical signals move through the heart (conduction system). This can lead to abnormal heart beats (arrhythmias) and faulty heart signals (heart block).Cardiac amyloidosis is more common in men than in women. The disease is rare in people under age 40."}, "Cancer - resources": {"description": "The following organizations are good resources for information on cancer:"}, "Cystitis - noninfectious": {"description": "Noninfectious cystitis is irritation of the bladder that is not caused by a urinary tract infection.", "Possible Complications": "Ulceration of bladder wall, Urethral stricture, Diminished bladder capacity, Anemia. ", "Symptoms": ["Pressure in the lower pelvis", "Painful urination", "Frequent need to urinate", "Urgent need to urinate", "Problems holding urine", "Need to urinate at night", "Abnormal urine color, cloudy urine", "Blood in the urine", "Foul or strong urine odor ", "Pain during sexual intercourse", "Penile pain", "Flank pain", "Fatigue"], "Exams and Tests": "A urinalysis may reveal red blood cells (RBCs) and some white blood cells (WBCs). Urine may be examined under a microscope to look for cancerous cells.A urine culture (clean catch) is done to look for a bacterial infection.A cystoscopy (use of lighted instrument to look inside the bladder) may be done if you have:Symptoms related to radiation therapy or chemotherapy, Symptoms that do not get better with treatment, Blood in the urine. ", "Treatment": "The goal of treatment is to manage your symptoms. This may include:Medicines to help your bladder contract and empty. These are called anticholinergic drugs. Possible side effects include slowed heart rate, low blood pressure, increased thirst, and constipation., Muscle relaxers to reduce the strong urge to urinate or need to urinate frequently., A medicine called pyridium to help relieve bladder pain, Analgesic medicines to help reduce pain, Anti-inflammatory medicines or the drug, Elmiron to help with symptoms, Surgery is rarely done. It may be performed if a person has symptoms that do not go away with other treatments, trouble passing urine, or blood in the urine. . Other things\u00a0that may help\u00a0include:Avoiding foods and fluids that irritate the bladder. These include spicy foods and\u00a0alcohol, citrus juices, and caffeine, and foods that contain them., Performing bladder training exercises to help you schedule times to try to urinate and to delay urination at all other times. One method is to force yourself to delay urinating despite the urge to urinate in between these times. As you become better at waiting this long, slowly increase the time intervals by 15 minutes. Try to reach a goal of are urinating every 3 to 4 hours., Pelvic muscle strengthening exercises called Kegel exercises to help relieve symptoms of urgency. . ", "Prevention": "Avoid products that may irritate the bladder such as:Bubble baths , Feminine hygiene sprays , Tampons (especially scented products), Spermicidal jellies. If you need to use such products, try to find those that do not cause irritation for you.", "Causes": "The exact cause of noninfectious cystitis is often unknown. It is common in women of childbearing age.The problem has been linked to:Use of bubble baths and feminine hygiene sprays, Use of spermicidal jellies, Radiation therapy to the pelvis area, Certain types of chemotherapy medications, History of severe or repeated bladder infections . Certain foods, such as tomatoes, artificial sweeteners, caffeine, chocolate, and alcohol, can cause bladder symptoms.A related condition is interstitial cystitis."}, "Croup": {"description": "Croup is breathing difficulty\u00a0and a \"barking\" cough. Croup is due to\u00a0swelling around the vocal cords. It\u00a0is common in infants and children.", "Symptoms": [], "Exams and Tests": "Children with croup are most often diagnosed based on the parent's description of the symptoms and a physical exam. Sometimes a doctor will listen to a child cough over the phone to identify croup. In a few cases, x-rays or other tests may be needed. A physical exam may show chest retractions with breathing. When listening to the child\u2019s chest through a stethoscope, the health care provider may hear: Difficulty breathing in and out, Wheezing, Decreased breath sounds . An exam of the throat may reveal a red epiglottis. A neck x-ray may reveal a foreign object or narrowing of the trachea.", "Causes": "Croup is most often caused by viruses, such as parainfluenza RSV, measles, adenovirus, and influenza. It tends to appear in children between 3 months and 5 years old, but it can happen at any age. Some children are more likely to get croup and may get it several times. It is most common between October and March, but can occur at any time of the year.More severe cases of croup may be caused by bacteria. This condition is called bacterial tracheitis. Croup may also be caused by:Allergies, Breathing in something that irritates your airway, Acid reflux . ", "Prevention": "Wash your hands frequently and avoid close contact with\u00a0people who have a respiratory infection.Many cases of croup can be prevented with immunizations. The diphtheria, Haemophilus influenzae (Hib), and measles vaccines protect children from some of the most dangerous forms of croup.", "Treatment": "Most cases of croup can be safely managed at home. However, you should call your health care provider for advice, even in the middle of the night.Steps you can take at home include:Expose your child to cool or moist air,\u00a0such as in a steamy bathroom or outside in the cool night air. This may offer some breathing relief., Set up a cool air vaporizer in the child's bedroom and use it for a few nights., Make your child more comfortable by giving\u00a0acetaminophen. This medicine also lowers a fever so the child will not have to breathe as hard., Avoid cough medicines unless you discuss them with your doctor first. . Your health care provider may prescribe medicines, such as:Steroid medicines taken by mouth\u00a0or\u00a0through an inhaler, Antibiotic medicine (for some, but not most cases) . Your child may need to be treated in the emergency room or to stay in the hospital if he or she: Has breathing problems that do not go away or get worse, Becomes too tired because of problems breathing, Has bluish skin color, Is not drinking enough fluids\u00a0 . Medicines and treatments used at the hospital may include: Breathing medicines given with a nebulizer machine, Steroid medicines given through a vein (IV), An oxygen tent placed over a crib, Fluids given through a vein for dehydration, Antibiotics given through a vein . Rarely, a breathing tube through the nose or mouth will be needed to help your child breathe."}, "Complex regional pain syndrome": {"description": "Complex regional pain syndrome (CRPS) is a chronic pain condition that can affect any area of the body, but often affects an arm or a leg.", "Possible Complications": "Cognitive impairment, Depression, Loss of muscle size or strength in the affected limb, Spread of the disease to another part of the body, Worsening of the affected limb. Complications can also occur with some of the nerve and surgical treatments.", "Symptoms": ["Is intense and burning, and is much stronger than would be expected for the type of injury that occurred.", "Gets worse, rather than better over time.", "Begins at the point of injury, but may spread to the whole limb, or to the arm or leg on the opposite side of the body. ", "Changes in skin temperature, switching between warm or cold", "Faster growth of nails and hair", "Muscle spasms and joint pain", "Severe burning, aching pain that worsens with the slightest touch or breeze", "Skin that slowly becomes blotchy, purple, pale, or red; thin and shiny; swollen; more sweaty ", "Continued changes in the skin", "Nails that are cracked and break more easily", "Pain that is becoming worse", "Slower hair growth", "Stiff joints and weak muscles ", "Limited movement in limb because of tightened muscles and tendons (contracture)", "Muscle wasting", "Pain in the entire limb "], "Exams and Tests": "Diagnosing CRPS can be difficult, but early diagnosis is very important.The doctor will take a medical history and do a physical examination. Other tests may include:A test to show temperature changes and lack of blood supply in the affected limb (thermography), Bone scans, Nerve conduction studies, X-rays. ", "Treatment": "There is no cure for CRPS, but the disease can be slowed. The main focus is on relieving the symptoms and helping people with this syndrome live as normal a life as possible.Physical and occupational therapy should be started as early as possible. Starting an exercise program and learning to keep joints and muscles moving may prevent the disease from getting worse. It can also help you do everyday activities.Medications may be used, including pain medicines, steroids, certain blood pressure medicines, bone loss medications and antidepressants.Some type of talk therapy, such as cognitive behavioral therapy or psychotherapy, can help teach the skills needed to live with chronic pain.Surgical or invasive techniques that may be tried:Injected medicine that numbs the affected nerves or pain fibers around the spinal column (nerve block), Internal pain pump that directly delivers medications to the spinal cord (intrathecal drug pump), Spinal cord stimulator, which involves placing electrodes (electrical leads) next to the spinal cord. A low-level electrical current is used to create a pleasant or tingling sensation in the painful area is the best way to reduce pain in some patients., Surgery that cuts the nerves to destroy the pain (surgical sympathectomy), although it is unclear how many patients this helps. It may also make some patients' symptoms worse. . ", "Prevention": "There is no known prevention at this time. Early treatment is the key to slowing the progression of the disease.", "Causes": "Doctors are not sure what causes CRPS. In some cases, the sympathetic nervous system plays an important role in the pain. Another theory is that CRPS is caused by a triggering of the immune response, which leads to the inflammatory symptoms of redness, warmth, and swelling in the affected area.CRPS has two forms:CRPS 1 is a chronic nerve disorder that occurs most often in the arms or legs after a minor injury., CRPS 2 is caused by an injury to the nerve. . CRPS is thought to result from damage to the nervous system. This includes the nerves that control the blood vessels and sweat glands.The damaged nerves are no longer able to properly control blood flow, feeling (sensation), and temperature to the affected area. This leads to medical problems in the:Blood vessels, Bones, Muscles, Nerves, Skin . Possible causes of CRPS:Injury directly to a nerve, Injury or infection in an arm or leg . In rare cases, sudden illnesses such as a heart attack or stroke can cause CRPS. The condition can sometimes appear without obvious injury to the affected limb.This condition is more common in people ages 40 to 60, but younger people can get it, too."}, "Carpal tunnel release  ": {"description": "Carpal tunnel release is surgery to treat carpal tunnel syndrome. Carpal tunnel syndrome is pain and weakness in the hand that is caused by pressure on the median nerve in the wrist."}, "Chronic obstructive pulmonary disease - quick-relief drugs": {"description": "COPD - quick-relief drugs"}, "Cervical polyps": {"description": "Cervical polyps are fingerlike growths on the lower part of the uterus that connects with the vagina (cervix).", "Possible Complications": "There may be bleeding and slight cramping for a few days after removal of a polyp. Some cervical cancers may first appear as a polyp. Certain uterine polyps\u00a0may be associated with uterine cancer.\u00a0\r\n \r\n", "Symptoms": ["Very heavy menstrual periods", "Vaginal bleeding after douching or intercourse", "Abnormal vaginal bleeding after menopause or between periods", "White or yellow mucus (leukorrhea)"], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider will see smooth, red or purple fingerlike growths on the cervix during a pelvic exam. A cervical biopsy will be performed. Most of the time, the biopsy will show cells that are consistent with a benign polyp. Rarely there may be abnormal, precancerous, or cancer cells in a polyp.", "Treatment": "The health care provider can remove polyps during a simple, outpatient procedure. Smaller polyps may be removed with gentle twisting., Electrocautery may be needed to remove larger polyps.. The removed polyp tissue should be sent to a lab for further tests.", "Prevention": "See your health care provider to treat infections as soon as possible.", "Causes": "The exact cause of cervical polyps is not known. They may occur with:An abnormal response to increased levels of the female hormone estrogen, Chronic inflammation, Clogged blood vessels in the cervix. Cervical polyps are common. They are often in women over age 20 who have had children. Polyps are rare in young women who have not started having their period (menstruation).Most women have only one polyp, but some women have two or three."}, "Chloride in diet": {"description": "Chloride is found in many chemicals and other substances in the body. It is an important part of the salt found in many foods and used in cooking."}, "Crying in childhood": {"description": "Temper tantrums are unpleasant and disruptive behaviors or emotional outbursts. They often occur in response to unmet needs or desires. Tantrums are more likely to occur in younger children or in children who cannot express their needs or control their emotions when they are frustrated."}, "Cell phones and cancer": {"description": "Although health problems related to long-term cell phone use are thought to be unlikely, you can take steps to limit your potential risk:"}, "Chlorpromazine overdose": {"Symptoms": ["No breathing", "Rapid breathing", "Bladder and kidneys:", "Urinary hesitancy", "Inability to urinate", "Blurred vision", "Difficulty swallowing", "Drooling", "Dry mouth", "Stuffy nose", "Ulcers on the gums, tongue, or in the throat", "Yellow eyes", "High or severely low blood pressure", "Rapid, irregular heartbeat", "Muscle spasms", "Stiff muscles in neck or back", "Coma", "Confusion", "Convulsions", "Drowsiness", "Fainting", "Fever", "Hallucinations (rare)", "Irritability", "Low body temperature", "Tremor", "Uncoordinated movement", "Weakness", "Change in female menstrual pattern", "Bluish skin color", "Rash", "Constipation", "Loss of appetite", "Nausea"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222.", "Prevention": "Keep all medications in child-proof bottles and out of the reach of children."}, "CSF oligoclonal banding": {"description": "Oligoclonal bands are proteins called immunoglobulins. The presence of these proteins indicates inflammation of the central nervous system. Oligoclonal bands may be a sign of multiple sclerosis."}, "Catecholamines - urine": {"description": "Catecholamines can also be measured with a blood test. "}, "Calcium blood test": {"description": "Calcium can also be measured in the urine."}, "Cirrhosis": {"description": "Cirrhosis is scarring of the liver and poor liver function. It is the last stage of chronic liver disease.", "Possible Complications": "Complications may include:Bleeding disorders (coagulopathy), Buildup of fluid in the abdomen (ascites) and infection of the fluid (bacterial peritonitis), Enlarged veins in the esophagus, stomach, or intestines that bleed easily (esophageal varices), Increased pressure in the blood vessels of the liver (portal hypertension), Kidney failure (hepatorenal syndrome), Liver cancer (hepatocellular carcinoma), Mental confusion, change in the level of consciousness, or coma (hepatic encephalopathy) . ", "Symptoms": ["Fatigue and loss of energy\r\n  ", "Poor appetite and weight loss\r\n  ", "Nausea or belly pain\r\n  ", "Small, red spider-like blood vessels on the skin\r\n  ", "Fluid buildup of the legs (edema) and in the abdomen (ascites)\r\n  ", "Yellow color in the skin, mucus membranes, or eyes (jaundice)\r\n  ", "Redness on the palms of the hands\r\n  ", "In men, impotence, shrinking of the testicles, and breast swelling\r\n  ", "Easy bruising and abnormal bleeding\r\n  ", "Confusion or problems thinking\r\n  ", "Pale or clay-colored stools\r\n"], "Exams and Tests": "Your doctor will do a physical exam to look for:An enlarged liver or spleen, Excess breast tissue, Swollen abdomen, as a result of too much fluid, Reddened palms, Red spider-like blood vessels on the skin, Small testicles, Widened veins in the abdomen wall, Yellow eyes or skin (jaundice) . You may have the following tests to measure liver function:Complete blood count, Prothrombin time, Liver function tests, Blood albumin level . Other tests to check for liver damage include:Computed tomography (CT) of the abdomen, Magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) of the abdomen, Endoscopy to check for abnormal veins in the esophagus or stomach, Ultrasound of the abdomen. You might need a liver biopsy to confirm the diagnosis.", "Treatment": "LIFESTYLE CHANGESSome things you can do to help take care of your liver disease are: Drink less alcohol., Eat a healthy diet that is low in salt, Get vaccinated for diseases such as influenza, hepatitis A and hepatitis B, and pneumococcal pneumonia, Talk to your doctor about all medicines you take, including herbs and supplements and over-the-counter medicines . MEDICINES FROM YOUR DOCTOR\"Water pills\" (diuretics) to get rid of fluid build-up, Vitamin K or blood products to prevent excess bleeding, Medicines for mental confusion, Antibiotics for infections . OTHER TREATMENTSEndoscopic treatments for enlarged veins in the throat (bleeding varicies), Removal of fluid from the abdomen (paracentesis), Placement of a transjugular intrahepatic portosystemic shunt (TIPS) to repair blood flow in the liver . When cirrhosis progresses to end-stage liver disease, a liver transplant may be needed. ", "Prevention": "DO NOT drink alcohol heavily. Talk to your health care provider if you are worried about your drinking. Take steps to prevent getting or passing hepatitis B or C. ", "Causes": "Cirrhosis is the end result of chronic liver damage caused by chronic liver disease. Common causes of chronic liver disease in the United States are:Hepatitis B or C infection, Alcohol abuse. Less common causes of cirrhosis include:Autoimmune hepatitis, Bile duct disorders, Some medicines, Hereditary diseases, Other liver diseases, such as nonalcoholic fatty liver disease (NAFLD) and nonalcoholic steatohepatitis (NASH) . "}, "Chickenpox": {"description": "Chickenpox is a viral infection in which a person develops extremely itchy blisters all over the body. It used to be one of the classic childhood diseases. However, it has become much less common since the introduction of the chickenpox vaccine. ", "Possible Complications": "Rarely, serious infections such as encephalitis have occurred. Other complications may include:Reye's syndrome, Myocarditis, Pneumonia, Transient arthritis. Cerebellar ataxia may appear during the recovery phase or later. This involves a very unsteady walk.Women who get chickenpox during pregnancy can pass the infection to the developing baby. Newborns are at risk for severe infection.", "Symptoms": ["Fever", "Headache", "Stomach ache", "The blisters are usually first seen on the face, middle of the body, or scalp.", "After a day or two, the blisters become cloudy and then scab. Meanwhile, new blisters form in groups. They often appear in the mouth, in the vagina, and on the eyelids.", "Children with skin problems, such as eczema, may get thousands of blisters."], "Exams and Tests": "Your health care provider can usually diagnose chickenpox by looking at the rash and asking questions about the person's medical history. Small blisters on the scalp usually confirm the diagnosis.Laboratory tests can help confirm the diagnosis, if needed.", "Treatment": "Treatment involves keeping the person as comfortable as possible. Here are things to try:Avoid scratching or rubbing the itchy areas. Keep fingernails short to avoid damaging the skin from scratching., Wear cool, light, loose bedclothes. Avoid wearing rough clothing, particularly wool, over an itchy area., Take lukewarm baths using little soap and rinse thoroughly. Try a skin-soothing oatmeal or cornstarch bath., Apply a soothing moisturizer after bathing to soften and cool the skin., Avoid prolonged exposure to excessive heat and humidity., Try over-the-counter oral antihistamines such as diphenhydramine (Benadryl), but be aware of possible side effects such as drowsiness., Try over-the-counter hydrocortisone cream on itchy areas.. Medications that fight the chickenpox virus are available but not given to everyone. To work well, the medicine usually must be started within the first 24 hours of the rash.Antiviral medication is not usually prescribed to otherwise healthy children who do not have severe symptoms. Adults and teens, who are at risk for more severe symptoms, may benefit from antiviral medication if it is given early., Antiviral medication may be very important in those who have skin conditions (such as eczema or recent sunburn), lung conditions (such as asthma), or who have recently taken steroids., Some doctors also give antiviral medicines to people in the same household who also develop chickenpox, because they will usually develop more severe symptoms.. Do NOT\u00a0give\u00a0aspirin\u00a0or\u00a0ibuprofen to someone who may have chickenpox. Use of aspirin has been associated with a serious condition called Reyes syndrome. Ibuprofen has been associated with more severe secondary infections. Acetaminophen (Tylenol) may be used.A child with chickenpox should not return to school or play with other children until all chickenpox sores have crusted over or dried out. Adults should follow this same rule when considering when to return to work or be around others.", "Prevention": "Because chickenpox is airborne and very contagious before the rash even appears, it is difficult to avoid.A vaccine to prevent chickenpox is part of a child's routine immunization schedule. For information, see: Chickenpox vaccineThe vaccine usually prevents the chickenpox disease completely or makes the illness very mild.Talk to your doctor if you think your child might be at high risk for complications and might have been exposed. Immediate preventive measures may be important. Giving the vaccine early after exposure may still reduce the severity of the disease.", "Causes": "Chickenpox is caused by the varicella-zoster virus, a member of the herpesvirus family. The same virus also causes herpes zoster (shingles) in adults.Chickenpox can be spread very easily to others. You may get chickenpox from touching the fluids from a chickenpox blister, or if someone with the disease coughs or sneezes near you. Even those with mild illness may be contagious. A person with chickenpox becomes contagious 1 to 2 days before their blisters appear. They remain contagious until all the blisters have crusted over.Most cases of chickenpox occur in children younger than 10. The disease is usually mild, although serious complications sometimes occur. Adults and older children usually get sicker than younger children.Children whose mothers have had chickenpox or have received the chickenpox vaccine are not very likely to catch it before they are 1 year old. If they do catch chickenpox, they often have mild cases. This is because antibodies from their mothers' blood help protect them. Children under 1 year old whose mothers have not had chickenpox or the vaccine can get severe chickenpox.Severe chickenpox symptoms are more common in children whose immune system does not work well because of an illness or medicines such as chemotherapy and steroids."}, "Coronary heart disease": {"Symptoms": ["It may feel heavy or like someone is squeezing your heart. You may feel it under your breast bone (sternum). You may also feel it in your neck, arms, stomach, or upper back.", "The pain most often occurs with activity or emotion. It goes away with rest or a medicine called nitroglycerin.", "Other symptoms include shortness of breath and fatigue with activity (exertion). ", "Fatigue", "Shortness of breath", "General weakness "], "Exams and Tests": "Your health care provider will examine you. You will often need more than one test before getting a diagnosis. Tests may include:Coronary angiography -- an invasive test that evaluates the heart arteries under x-ray, Echocardiogram stress test, Electrocardiogram (ECG), Electron-beam computed tomography (EBCT) to look for calcium in the lining of the arteries -- the more calcium, the higher your chance for CHD, Exercise stress test, Heart CT scan, Nuclear stress test. ", "description": "Coronary heart disease (CHD) is a narrowing of the small blood vessels that supply blood and oxygen to the heart. CHD is also called coronary artery disease.", "Causes": "Coronary heart disease (CHD) is the leading cause of death in the United States for men and women.Coronary heart disease is caused by the buildup of plaque in the arteries to your heart. This may also be called hardening of the arteries.Fatty material and other substances form a plaque buildup on the walls of your coronary arteries. The coronary arteries bring blood and oxygen to your heart., This buildup causes the arteries to get narrow., As a result, blood flow to the heart can slow down or stop. . A risk factor for heart disease is something that increases your chance of getting it. You cannot change some risk factors for heart disease, but you can change others. ", "Treatment": "You may be asked to take one or more medicines to treat blood pressure, diabetes, or high cholesterol levels. Follow your doctor's directions closely to help prevent coronary artery disease from getting worse.Goals for treating these conditions in people who have coronary artery disease:The most commonly used blood pressure target for people with heart disease is below 130 to 140/80 mmHg., If you have diabetes, your HbA1c levels will be monitored and brought down to the level your doctor recommends., Your LDL cholesterol level will be lowered with statin drugs. . Treatment depends on your symptoms and how severe the disease is. You should know about:Other medicines used to treat angina, What to do when you have chest pain, Being active when you have heart disease, Eating a heart-healthy diet. Never stop taking your medicines without first talking to your health care provider. Stopping heart medicines suddenly can make your angina worse or cause a heart attack.You may be referred to a cardiac rehabilitation program to help improve your heart's fitness.Procedures and surgeries used to treat CHD include:Angioplasty and stent placement, called percutaneous coronary interventions (PCIs), Coronary artery bypass surgery, Minimally invasive heart surgery. "}, "Congenital afibrinogenemia": {"description": "Congenital afibrinogenemia is a rare, inherited blood disorder in which the blood does not clot normally. It occurs when there is a \u00a0protein called fibrinogen is totally lacking. This protein is needed for the blood to clot.", "Possible Complications": "Bleeding from the umbilical cord, Bleeding from the mucus membranes, Bleeding in the brain (intracranial bleeding), Clotting with treatment, Development of antibodies (inhibitors) to fibrinogen with treatment, Gastrointestinal bleeding, Miscarriage. ", "Symptoms": ["Bruising", "Bleeding from the umbilical cord just after birth", "Bleeding in joints", "Excessive bleeding after injury or surgery", "Nosebleeds"], "Exams and Tests": "If your health care provider suspects this problem, you will have lab tests to confirm the type and severity of the disorder.This disorder usually shows up in children, often at birth.Tests include:Bleeding time, Fibrinogen levels, Partial thromboplastin time (PTT), Prothrombin time (PT), Reptilase time, Thrombin time. You will have abnormal results on all of these tests if you have the disorder.", "Treatment": "The following treatments can be used for bleeding episodes or to prepare for surgery:Cryoprecipitate (a blood product containing concentrated fibrinogen and other clotting factors) through a vein (transfusion), Fibrinogen (RiaSTAP), Plasma (the liquid portion of the blood containing clotting factors). People with this condition should get the hepatitis B vaccine. Having many transfusions raises your risk for getting hepatitis.", "Prevention": "There is no known prevention. You may want to seek genetic counseling if you or your partner has this condition and you are considering having children. ", "Causes": "This rare disease is caused by an abnormal gene that causes a severe lack of fiborgen. The gene must be passed down from both parents. Milder forms can occur in people who inherit only one abnormal gene from their parents. Congenital afibrinogenemia can occur in males or females. The main risk factor is a family history of bleeding disorders."}, "Cervical spine CT scan": {"description": "A computed tomography (CT) scan of the cervical spine makes cross-sectional pictures of the neck. It uses x-rays to create the images."}, "Creatinine blood test": {"description": "Creatinine can also be measured with a urine test.\r\n"}, "Central venous catheters - ports": {"description": "Central venous catheter - subcutaneous; Port-a-Cath; InfusaPort; PasPort; Subclavian port; Medi - port; Central venous line - port"}, "Codeine overdose": {"Symptoms": ["Bluish-colored fingernails and lips", "Breathing problems -- slow and labored breathing, shallow breathing, no breathing", "Cold, clammy skin", "Coma (decreased level of consciousness and lack of responsiveness)", "Confusion", "Dizziness", "Drowsiness", "Fatigue", "Lightheadedness", "Loss of consciousness", "Low blood pressure", "Muscle twitches", "Pinpoint pupils", "Spasms of the stomach and intestines", "Weakness", "Weak pulse "], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Clopidogrel (Plavix)": {"description": "This medicine is taken as a pill. Your doctor may change your dose from time to time."}, "Conscious sedation for surgical procedures": {"description": "Conscious sedation lets you recover quickly and return to your everyday activities soon after your procedure."}, "Chest pain": {"description": "Chest pain is discomfort or pain that you feel anywhere along the front of your body between your neck and upper abdomen.", "Causes": "Heart or blood vessel problems that can cause chest pain:Angina or a heart attack: The most common symptom is chest pain that may feel like tightness, heavy pressure, squeezing, or crushing pain. The pain may spread to the arm, shoulder, jaw, or back., A tear in the wall of the aorta, the large blood vessel that takes blood from the heart to the rest of the body (aortic dissection) causes sudden, severe pain in the chest and upper back., Swelling (inflammation) in the sac that surrounds the heart (pericarditis) causes pain in the center part of the chest.. Lung problems that can cause chest pain:A blood clot in the lung (pulmonary embolism), Collapse of the lung (pneumothorax), Pneumonia causes a sharp chest pain that often gets worse when you take a deep breath or cough., Swelling of the lining around the lung (pleurisy) can cause chest pain that usually feels sharp, and often gets worse when you take a deep breath or cough.. Other causes of chest pain:Panic attack, which often occurs with fast breathing, Inflammation where the ribs join the breast bone or sternum (costochondritis), Shingles, which causes sharp, tingling pain on one side that stretches from the chest to the back, and may cause a rash, Strain of the muscles and tendons between the ribs. Chest pain can also be due to the following digestive system problems:Spasms or narrowing of the esophagus (the tube that carries food from the mouth to the stomach), Gallstones cause pain that gets worse after a meal (most often a fatty meal)., Heartburn or gastroesophageal reflux (GERD), Stomach ulcer or gastritis: Burning pain occurs if your stomach is empty and feels better when you eat food. In children, most chest pain is not caused by the heart."}, "Caffeine overdose": {"Symptoms": ["Breathing trouble", "Changes in alertness", "Confusion", "Convulsions", "Diarrhea", "Dizziness", "Fever", "Hallucinations", "Increased thirst", "Increased urination", "Irregular heartbeat", "Muscle twitching", "Rapid heartbeat", "Sleeping trouble", "Vomiting ", "Muscles that are very tense, then very relaxed", "Nausea", "Rapid, deep breathing", "Rapid heartbeat", "Shock", "Tremors", "Vomiting"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Congenital protein C or S deficiency": {"description": "Congenital protein C or S deficiency is a lack of proteins C or S in the fluid part of the blood. The proteins are natural substances that help prevent blood clots.", "Possible Complications": "Childhood stroke, More than one pregnancy loss (recurrent miscarriage), Recurrent clots in the veins, Pulmonary embolism. In rare cases, using warfarin to thin the blood and prevent clots can cause brief increased clotting and severe skin wounds. Patients are at risk if they are not treated with the blood-thinning drug heparin before taking warfarin.", "Symptoms": ["Pain or tenderness in the affected area", "Redness or swelling in the affected area"], "Exams and Tests": "Laboratory tests will be done to check for proteins C and S. ", "Treatment": "Blood-thinning drugs (heparin and warfarin) are used to treat and prevent blood clots.", "Prevention": "If your health care provider diagnoses you with this disorder, you should be careful to prevent clots from forming. This can occur when the blood moves slowly in the veins, such as from prolonged bed rest during an illness, surgery, hospital stay, or prolonged reduced activity such as long airplane or car trips.", "Causes": "Congenital protein C or S deficiency is an inherited disorder, which means it is passed down through families. Congenital means it is present at birth.The disorder causes abnormal blood clotting.About 1 out of every 300 people has one normal gene and one faulty gene for protein C deficiency.Protein S deficiency occurs in about 1 in 20,000 people."}, "College students and the flu": {"description": "This article will give you information about the flu and college students. This is not a substitute for medical advice from your health care provider."}, "Common cold - how to treat at home": {"description": "Common symptoms of a cold include: "}, "Cancer - penis": {"description": "Cancer of the penis is cancer that starts in the penis, an organ that makes up part of the male reproductive system. ", "Possible Complications": "Cancer of the penis frequently spreads to other parts of the body (metastasizes) early in the course of the disease.", "Symptoms": ["\r\n  Sores on the penis\r\n  ", "Penis pain and bleeding from the penis (may occur with advanced disease)"], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider will perform a physical exam, which may reveal a non-tender lesion that looks like a pimple or wart. This growth is typically near the end of the penis.A biopsy of the growth is needed to determine if it is cancer.", "Treatment": "Treatment depends on the size and location of the tumor and how much it has spread.In general, cancer treatment includes:Chemotherapy -- uses medicines to kill cancer cells, Radiation -- uses high-powered x-rays to kill cancer cells, Surgery - cuts out and removes the cancer. If the tumor is small or near the tip of the penis, surgery may be done to remove only the cancerous part of the penis. Depending on the exact location, this is called a glansectomy or partial penectomy. Laser surgery may be used to treat some tumors.For more severe tumors, total removal of the penis (total penectomy) is often necessary. A new opening will be created in the groin area to allow urine to exit the body. This procedure is called a urethrostomy.Chemotherapy may be used along with surgery.\u00a0Cisplatin, ifosfamide, and paclitaxel are usually used for treating cancer of the penis.\u00a0Radiation therapy is often recommended in combination with surgery. A type of radiation therapy called external beam therapy is often used. This method delivers radiation to the penis from outside the body. External beam radiation therapy is usually performed 5 days a week for 6 - 8 weeks.", "Prevention": "Circumcision may decrease the risk. Men who are not circumcised should be taught at an early age the importance of cleaning beneath the foreskin as part of their personal hygiene.Safer sexual practices, such as abstinence, limiting the number of sexual partners, and using condoms to prevent HPV infection, may decrease the risk of developing cancer of the penis.", "Causes": "The exact cause is unknown. Smegma, a cheese-like, foul-smelling substance found under the foreskin of the penis may increase the risk of penis cancer.Uncircumcised men who do not keep the area under the foreskin clean and men with a history of genital warts or human papillomavirus (HPV) are at higher risk for this rare disorder."}, "CMV - gastroenteritis/colitis": {"description": "Related conditions include:", "Possible Complications": "The drugs used to fight the virus may cause side effects. The type of side effect depends on the specific drug used. For example, the drug ganciclovir may lower your white blood cell count. Another drug, foscarnet, may lead to kidney problems.", "Symptoms": ["Abdominal pain", " \r\n Difficulty swallowing or pain with swallowing", "Nausea", "Vomiting", "Abdominal pain", "Bloody stools", "Diarrhea", "Fever", "Weight loss"], "Exams and Tests": "Tests that may be done include:Barium enema, Colonoscopy, Esophagogastroduodenoscopy (EGD)\r\n  , Stool culture to rule out other causes of infection, Upper GI and small bowel series. Laboratory tests will be done on a sample of tissue taken from your stomach or intestine. The tests, such as a gastric or intestinal tissue culture or biopsy, determine if the virus is in the tissue.A CMV serology test is done to look for antibodies to the CMV virus in your blood.Another blood test that looks for the presence and number of virus particles in the blood can also be done.", "Treatment": "Treatment is meant to control the infection and relieve symptoms.Medicines to fight the virus (antiviral medications) are prescribed. The medicines may be given through a vein (IV), and sometimes by mouth, for several weeks. The most commonly used medicines are ganciclovir and valganciclovir.In some cases, long-term therapy may be needed. A medication called CMV hyperimmune globulin may be used when other drugs don't work.Other medications may include:Drugs to prevent or reduce diarrhea, Painkillers (analgesics). Nutritional supplements or nutrition given through a vein\u00a0(IV) may be used to treat muscle loss due to the disease.", "Prevention": "There is a\u00a0high risk of CMV infection in people who receive an organ transplant from a CMV-positive donor. Taking the antiviral drugs ganciclovir (Cytovene) and valganciclovir (Valcyte) by mouth before the transplant can lower your chance of getting\u00a0a new infection or reactivating an old infection.People with AIDS who are effectively treated with highly active antiretroviral therapy are much less likely to get a CMV infection.", "Causes": "Cytomegalovirus (CMV) is a herpes-type virus. It is related to the virus that causes chickenpox. Infection with CMV is very common. It is spread by saliva, urine, respiratory droplets, sexual contact, and blood transfusions. Most people are exposed at some point, but most of the time the virus produces mild or no symptoms in healthy people.Serious CMV infections can occur in people with weakened immune systems due to:Chemotherapy treatment for cancer, Immune-suppressing medicines following an organ transplant, Inflammatory bowel disease (ulcerative colitis or Crohn\u2019s disease) . Rarely, serious CMV infection involving the GI tract has occurred in people with a healthy immune system. The following increase your risk for CMV gastroenteritis/colitis:AIDS, Bone marrow or organ transplant, Chemotherapy, Medications that suppress the immune system . "}, "Centipede": {"Symptoms": ["Pain in the area of bite", "Swelling in the area of bite", "Redness in the area of bite", "Lymph node swelling (rare)", "Numbness at the site of the bite (rare)", "Difficulty breathing", "Rapid heart rate", "Throat swelling"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Congenital syphilis": {"description": "Congenital syphilis is a severe, disabling, and often life-threatening infection seen in infants. A pregnant mother who has syphilis can spread the disease through the placenta to the unborn infant.", "Possible Complications": "Blindness, Deafness, Deformity of the face, Nervous system\u00a0problems . ", "Symptoms": ["Failure to gain weight or failure to thrive", "Fever", "Irritability", "No bridge to nose (saddle nose)", "Rash of the mouth, genitals, and anus ", "Rash -- starting as small blisters on the palms and soles, and later changing to\u00a0copper-colored, flat or bumpy rash on the face, palms, and soles", "Watery\u00a0fluid released\u00a0from the nose ", "Abnormal notched and peg-shaped teeth, called Hutchinson teeth", "Bone pain", "Blindness", "Clouding of the cornea", "Decreased hearing or deafness", "Gray, mucus-like patches on the anus and outer vagina", "Joint swelling", "Refusal to move a painful arm or leg", "Saber shins (bone problem of the lower leg)", "Scarring of the skin around the mouth, genitals, and anus "], "Exams and Tests": "If the disorder is suspected at the time of birth, the placenta will be examined for signs of syphilis. A physical examination of the infant may show signs of liver and spleen swelling and bone inflammation.A routine blood test for syphilis is done during pregnancy. The mother may receive the following blood tests:Fluorescent treponemal antibody absorbed test (FTA-ABS), Rapid plasma reagin (RPR), Venereal disease research laboratory test (VDRL) . An infant or child may have the following tests:Bone x-ray, Dark-field examination to detect syphilis bacteria under a microscope , Eye examination, Lumbar puncture . ", "Treatment": "Penicillin is used to treat all forms of syphilis.", "Prevention": "Safer sexual practices may help prevent syphilis. If you suspect you have a sexually transmitted disease such as syphilis, seek medical attention immediately to avoid complications like infecting your baby during pregnancy or birth.Prenatal care is very important. A routine blood test for syphilis is done during pregnancy. This identifies infected mothers and allows them to be treated to reduce the risks to the infant and themselves. Infants born to infected mothers who received proper penicillin treatment during pregnancy are at minimal risk for congenital syphilis.", "Causes": "Congenital syphilis is caused by the bacterium Treponema pallidum, which is passed from mother to child during fetal development or at birth. Nearly half of all children infected with syphilis while they are in the womb die shortly before or after birth.Despite the fact that this disease can be cured with antibiotics if caught early, rising rates of syphilis among pregnant women in the United States have increased the number of infants born with congenital syphilis."}, "Corneal ulcers and infections": {"description": "The cornea is the clear tissue at the front of the eye. A corneal ulcer is an open sore in the outer layer of the cornea. It is often caused by infection.", "Possible Complications": "Untreated corneal ulcers and infections may lead to:Loss of the eye (rare), Severe vision loss, Scars on the cornea. ", "Symptoms": ["Blurry or hazy vision", "Eye that appears red or bloodshot", "Itching and discharge", "Sensitivity to light (photophobia)", "Very painful and watery eyes", "White patch on the cornea "], "Exams and Tests": "Your health care provider will do the following tests:Exam of scrapings from the ulcer, Fluorescein stain of the cornea, Keratometry (measuring the curve of the cornea), Pupillary reflex response, Refraction test, Slit-lamp examination, Tests for dry eye, Visual acuity. Blood tests to check for inflammatory disorders may also be needed.", "Treatment": "Treatment for corneal ulcers and infections depends on the cause. Treatment should be started as soon as possible to prevent scarring of the cornea.If the exact cause is not known, you may be given antibiotic drops that work against many kinds of bacteria.Once the exact cause is known, you may be given drops that treat bacteria, herpes, other viruses, or a fungus. Severe ulcers sometimes require a corneal transplant.Corticosteroid eye drops may be used to reduce swelling and inflammation in certain conditions.Your health care provider may also recommend that you:Avoid eye makeup, Do not\u00a0wear contact lenses at all, or do not\u00a0wear them at night, Take pain medications, Wear an eye patch to keep out light and help with symptoms, Wear protective glasses . ", "Prevention": "Things you can do to prevent the condition include:Wash your hands well when handling your contact lenses., Avoid wearing contact lenses overnight., Get prompt treatment for an eye infection to prevent ulcers from forming. . ", "Causes": "Corneal ulcers are most commonly caused by an infection with bacteria, viruses, fungi, or a parasite.Acanthamoeba keratitis occurs in contact lens users. It is more likely to happen in people who make their own homemade cleaning solutions., Fungal keratitis can occur after a corneal injury involving plant material. It may also occur in people with a suppressed immune system., Herpes simplex keratitis is a serious viral infection. It may cause repeated attacks that are triggered by stress, exposure to sunlight, or any condition that lowers the immune response. . Corneal ulcers or infections may also be caused by:Eyelids that do not close all the way, such as with Bell's palsy, Foreign bodies in the eye, Scratches (abrasions) on the eye surface, Severely dry eyes, Severe allergic eye disease, Various inflammatory disorders . Wearing contact lenses, especially soft contacts that are left in overnight, may cause a corneal ulcer.Watch this video about:Corneal injury"}, "Cryoglobulinemia": {"description": "Cryoglobulinemia is the presence of abnormal proteins in the blood. These proteins thicken in cold temperatures.", "Possible Complications": "Complications include:Bleeding in the digestive tract (rare), Heart disease (rare), Infections of ulcers, Kidney failure, Liver failure, Skin death, Death. ", "Symptoms": ["Breathing problems", "Fatigue", "Glomerulonephritis", "Joint pain", "Muscle pain", "Purpura", "Raynaud's phenomenon", "Skin death", "Skin ulcers"], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider will do a physical exam.\u00a0You will be checked for signs of liver and spleen swelling.Tests for cryoglobulinemia include:Complete blood count (CBC), Complement assay -- numbers will be low, Cryoglobulin test -- may show presence of cryoglobulins (It is a good idea to check to make sure the lab has experience drawing and storing blood for this test.) , Liver function tests -- may be high if hepatitis C is present, Rheumatoid factor -- positive in types II and III, Skin biopsy -- may show inflammation in blood vessels, vasculitis, Protein electrophoresis - blood -- may show an abnormal antibody protein, Urinalysis -- may show blood in the urine if the kidneys are affected . Other tests may include:Angiogram, Chest x-ray, ESR, Hepatitis C test, Nerve conduction tests, if the person has weakness in the arms or legs. ", "Treatment": "Mixed cryoglobulinemia (Types II and III)Mild or moderate forms of cryoglobulinemia can often be treated by taking steps to deal with the underlying cause.Mild cases can be treated by avoiding cold temperatures., Standard hepatitis treatments work for most people who have hepatitis C and mild or moderate disease. The condition can come back when treatment stops.. Severe cryoglobulinemia involves vital organs or large areas of skin. It is treated with corticosteroids and other medicines that suppress the immune system. Rituximab is an effective drug and has fewer risks than other medicines., Cyclophosphamide is used in life-threatening conditions where rituximab is not working or available. This medicine was used often in the past. , A treatment called plasmaphereis is also used. In this his procedure, blood plasma is taken out of blood circulation and abnormal cryoglobulin antibody proteins are removed. The plasma is replaced by fluid, protein, or donated plasma.. Type I cryoglobulinemia:This disorder is due to a cancer of the blood or immune system such as multiple myeloma. Treatment is directed against the abnormal cancer cells that produce the cryoglobulin.", "Prevention": "There is no known prevention for the condition. Staying away from cold temperatures may prevent some symptoms., Testing and treatment for hepatitis C infection may reduce your risk. . ", "Causes": "Cryoglobulins are antibodies. It is not yet known why they become solid or gel-like at low temperatures. When this occurs, these antibodies can cause inflammation and block blood vessels. This may lead to problems ranging from skin rashes to kidney failure.Cryoglobulinemia is part of a group of diseases that cause damage and inflammation of the blood vessels throughout the body (vasculitis). There are three main types of cryoglobulinemia. They are grouped based on the type of antibody that is produced:Type I, Type II, Type III . Types II and III are also referred to as mixed cryoglobulinemia.Type I cryoglobulinemia is most often related to cancer of the blood or immune systems.Types II and III are most often found in people who have a chronic (long-lasting) inflammatory condition, such as an autoimmune disease or hepatitis C. Most people with this form of the disease have a chronic hepatitis C infection.Other conditions that may be related to cryoglobulinemia include:Leukemia, Multiple myeloma, Mycoplasma pneumonia, Primary macroglobulinemia, Rheumatoid arthritis, Systemic lupus erythematosus. "}, "Cardiac ablation procedures ": {"description": "During the procedure, small wires called electrodes are placed inside your heart to measure your heart's electrical activity. These electrodes may also be used to destroy the bad areas of your heart."}, "Contac overdose": {"Symptoms": ["Blurred vision", "Cannot urinate or completely empty the bladder\r\n ", "Convulsions", "Depression", "Delirium", "Disorientation", "Drowsiness", "Enlarged pupils", "Fever", "Hallucinations", "Inability to\u00a0urinate or completely empty the bladder", "Increased blood pressure", "Irregular heartbeat", "Muscle pain and spasms", "Nausea and vomiting", "Nervousness", "Rapid heartbeat \u00a0", "Tremor", "Unsteadiness", "Yellow eyes "], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Chlorophyll": {"Symptoms": ["Diarrhea", "Loose bowel movements (stools)", "Stomach cramps"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222.", "Prevention": "Do not touch or eat any plant with which you are not familiar. Do not take food supplements or vitamins without reading the label. Wash your hands after working in the garden or walking in the woods."}, "Chlamydia infections in women": {"Symptoms": ["Burning when they urinate", "Pain in the lower part of the belly, possibly with fever", "Painful intercourse", "Vaginal discharge or bleeding after intercourse "], "description": "Chlamydia is a sexually transmitted infection (STI). This means chlamydia is passed from one person to another during sexual contact. ", "Causes": "Chlamydia is caused by the bacteria Chlamydia trachomatis. Both males and females may have chlamydia without having any symptoms. As a result, you may become infected or pass the infection to your partner without knowing it.You are more likely to become infected with chlamydia if you have:Sex without using a condom, Had multiple sexual partners, Been infected with chlamydia before . ", "Treatment": "Chlamydia can be treated with antibiotics. Some of these are safe to take if you are pregnant. Common side effects include nausea, upset stomach, and diarrhea.Both you and your partner need to take the antibiotics and finish all of them, even if you feel better and still have some left. All of your sexual partners must take the antibiotics, even if they do not have symptoms. This will prevent you from passing the infection back and forth.Because gonorrhea often occurs with chlamydia, treatment for gonorrhea is often given at the same time."}, "Collapsed lung (Pneumothorax)": {"description": "The medical name of this condition is pneumothorax.", "Possible Complications": "Another collapsed lung in the future, Shock. ", "Symptoms": ["Sharp chest pain, made worse by a deep breath or a cough", "Shortness of breath", "Nasal flaring\u00a0\r\n ", "Bluish color of the skin due to\u00a0lack of oxygen", "Chest tightness", "Easy fatigue", "Rapid heart rate"], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider will listen to your breathing with a stethoscope. If you have a collapsed lung, there are decreased or no breath sounds on the affected side. You may also have low blood pressure.Tests that may be ordered include:Arterial blood gases, Chest x-ray\u00a0. ", "Treatment": "A small pneumothorax may go away on its own. You may only need oxygen treatment and rest. The health care provider may use a needle to pull the extra air out from around the lung so it can expand more fully. You may be allowed to go home if you live near the hospital.If you have a large pneumothorax, a chest tube will be placed between the ribs into the space around the lungs to help drain the air and allow the lung to re-expand. The chest tube can be left in place for several days. You may need to stay in the hospital. If a small chest tube or flutter valve is used, you may be able to go home. You will need to return to the hospital to have the tube or valve removed.Some patients with a collapsed lung need extra oxygen.Lung surgery may be needed to treat\u00a0collapsed lung or to prevent future episodes. The area where the leak occurred may be repaired. Sometimes, a special chemical is placed into the area of the collapsed lung. This chemical causes a scar to form. This procedure is called pleurodesis.", "Prevention": "There is no known way to prevent a collapsed lung. You can decrease your risk by not smoking.", "Causes": "Collapsed lung can be caused by an injury to the lung. Injuries can include gunshot or knife wound to the chest, rib fracture, or certain medical procedures.In some cases, a collapsed lung is caused by air blisters (blebs) that break open, sending air into the space around the lung.This can result from air pressure changes such as when scuba diving or traveling to a high altitude.Tall, thin people and smokers are more likely to have a collapsed lung.Lung diseases can also increase the chance of getting a collapsed lung. These include:Asthma, COPD, Cystic fibrosis, Tuberculosis, Whooping cough. In some cases, a collapsed lung occurs without any cause. This is called a spontaneous pneumothroax or collapsed lung.\r\n"}, "Cushing syndrome due to adrenal tumor": {"description": "Other forms of Cushing syndrome include: ", "Possible Complications": "Cancerous adrenal tumors can spread to the liver or lungs.", "Symptoms": ["Round, red, full face (moon face)", "Slow growth rate in children", "Weight gain with fat accumulation on the trunk, but fat loss from the arms, legs, and buttocks (central obesity)", "Skin infections", "Purple marks (1/2 inch or more wide), called striae, on the skin of the abdomen, thighs, and breasts", "Thin skin with easy bruising ", "Backache, which occurs with routine activities", "Bone pain or tenderness", "Collection of fat between the shoulders and above the collar bone", "Rib and spine fractures caused by thinning of the bones", "Weak muscles, especially of the hips and shoulders ", "Excess hair growth on the face, neck, chest, abdomen, and thighs", "Periods that become irregular or stop ", "Decreased or no desire for sex", "Impotence", "Mental changes, such as depression, anxiety, or changes in behavior", "Fatigue", "Headache", "Increased thirst and urination "], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider will perform a physical exam and ask about your symptoms.Tests to confirm Cushing syndrome:24-hour urine sample to measure cortisol and creatinine levels, Blood tests to check ACTH, cortisol, and potassium levels, Dexamethasone suppression test, Blood cortisol levels, Blood DHEA level, Saliva cortisol level . Tests to determine cause or complications include:Abdominal CT, ACTH, Bone mineral density, Cholesterol, Fasting glucose . ", "Treatment": "Surgery is done to remove the adrenal tumor. Often, the entire adrenal gland is removed.Glucocorticoid replacement treatment is usually needed until the other adrenal gland recovers from surgery. You may need this treatment for 9 to 12 months.If surgery is not possible, such as in cases of adrenal cancer, medicines can be used to stop the release of cortisol. ", "Prevention": "Appropriate treatment of adrenal tumors may reduce the risk of complications in some patients with tumor-related Cushing syndrome.", "Causes": "Cushing syndrome is a disorder that occurs when your body has a higher than normal level of the hormone cortisol. This hormone is made in the adrenal glands. Too much cortisol can be due to various problems. One such problem is a tumor on one of the adrenal glands. Adrenal tumors release cortisol.Adrenal tumors are rare. They can be noncancerous (benign) or cancerous (malignant).Noncancerous tumors that can cause Cushing syndrome include:Adrenal adenomas, Micronodular hyperplasia. Cancerous tumors that may cause Cushing syndrome include an adrenal carcinoma."}, "Constipation - self-care": {"description": "Try to get to know your normal bowel movement pattern, so that you can keep constipation from getting worse."}, "Cri du chat syndrome": {"description": "Cri du chat syndrome is a group of symptoms that result from missing a piece of chromosome number 5. The syndrome\u2019s name is based on the infant\u2019s cry, which is high-pitched and sounds like a cat.", "Possible Complications": "Complications depend on the amount of intellectual disability and physical problems. Symptoms may affect the person's ability to care for themselves.", "Symptoms": ["Cry that is high-pitched and sounds like a cat", "Downward slant to the eyes", "\r\n  Low birth weight and slow growth", "Low-set or abnormally shaped ears", "Intellectual disability", "Partial webbing or fusing of fingers or toes", "Single line in the palm of the hand", "Skin tags just in front of the ear", "Slow or incomplete development of motor skills", "Small head (microcephaly)", "Small jaw (micrognathia)", "Wide-set eyes"], "Exams and Tests": "The doctor will perform a physical exam. This may show:Inguinal hernia, Diastasis recti (separation of the muscles in the belly area), Low muscle tone, Epicanthal folds, an extra fold of skin over the inner corner of the eye, Problems with the folding of the outer ears . Genetic tests can show a missing part of chromosome 5. Skull x-ray may reveal any problems with the shape of the base of the skull.", "Treatment": "There is no specific treatment. Your doctor will suggest ways to treat or manage the symptoms.Parents of a child with this syndrome should have genetic counseling and testing to determine if one parent has a change in chromosome 5.", "Prevention": "There is no known prevention. Couples with a family history of this syndrome who wish to become pregnant may consider genetic counseling.", "Causes": "Cri du chat syndrome is rare. It is caused by a missing piece of chromosome 5.Most cases are believed to occur during the development of the egg or sperm. A small number of cases occur when a parent passes a different, rearranged form of the chromosome to their child."}, "CSF coccidioides complement fixation": {"description": "CSF coccidioides complement fixation\u00a0is a test that check for infection due to the fungus Coccidioides immitis in the cerebrospinal (CSF) fluid. This is the fluid surrounding the brain and spine."}, "Complement fixation test to C. burnetii": {"description": "The complement fixation test to C. burnetii is a blood test that checks for infection due to bacterium called Coxiella burnetii (C. burnetii) which causes Q fever."}, "Castor oil overdose": {"Symptoms": ["Abdominal cramps", "Diarrhea", "Dizziness", "Hallucinations (rare)", "Fainting", "Nausea", "Shortness of breath and chest pain", "Skin rash", "Throat tightness"], "description": "See also: Laxative overdose"}, "Crutches and children - stairs": {"description": "\r\n\r\n \r\nTaking stairs with crutches can be tricky and scary. Learn how to help your child take stairs safely.\r\n"}, "Cervical dysplasia": {"description": "The changes are not cancer. But they can lead to cancer of the cervix if not treated.", "Symptoms": [], "Exams and Tests": "You will have a pelvic exam. Cervical dysplasia that is seen on a Pap smear is called squamous intraepithelial lesion (SIL). On the Pap smear report, these changes will be described as:Low-grade (LSIL), High-grade (HSIL), Possibly cancerous (malignant), Atypical glandular cells (AGUS) . You will need more tests if a Pap smear shows abnormal cells or cervical dysplasia. If the changes were mild, follow-up Pap smears may be all that is needed.A biopsy to confirm the condition is often needed, however. This may be done using:Colposcopy-directed biopsy, Cone biopsy, LEEP excision may be done after colposcopy . Dysplasia that is seen on a biopsy of the cervix is called cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN). It is grouped into three categories:CIN I -- mild dysplasia, CIN II -- moderate to marked dysplasia, CIN III -- severe dysplasia to carcinoma in situ . Some strains of human papillomavirus (HPV) are known to cause cervical cancer. An HPV DNA test can identify the high-risk types of HPV linked to this cancer. This test may be done:As a screening test for women over age 30, For women of any age who have a slightly abnormal Pap test result . ", "Causes": "Cervical dysplasia can develop at any age, but is most often seen in women ages 25 to 35.Most often, cervical dysplasia is caused by the human papilloma virus (HPV). HPV is a common virus that is spread through sexual contact. There are many types of HPV. Some types lead to cervical dysplasia or cancer. Other types of HPV can cause genital warts.The following may increase your risk of cervical dysplasia:Having sex before age 18, Having a baby before age 16, Having multiple sexual partners, Having other illnesses or using medicines that suppress your immune system, Smoking . ", "Prevention": "Ask your health care provider about the HPV vaccine. Girls who receive this vaccine before they become sexually active reduce their chance of getting cervical cancer.You can reduce your risk of developing cervical dysplasia by taking the following steps:Do not smoke. Smoking increases your risk of developing more severe dysplasia and cancer., Get vaccinated for HPV between ages 9 and 26., Do not have sex until you are 18 or older., Practice safe sex, and use a condom., Practice monogamy. This means you have only one sexual partner at a time. . ", "Treatment": "Treatment depends on the degree of dysplasia. Mild dysplasia (LSIL or CIN I) may go away without treatment.You may only need careful follow-up by your doctor with repeat Pap smears every 6 to 12 months., If the changes do not go away or get worse, treatment is needed. . Treatment for moderate-to-severe dysplasia or mild dysplasia that does not go away may include:Cryosurgery to freeze abnormal cells, Laser therapy, which uses light to burn away abnormal tissue, LEEP (loop electrosurgical excision procedure), which uses electricity to remove abnormal tissue, Surgery to remove the abnormal tissue (cone biopsy), Hysterectomy (in rare cases) . If you have had dysplasia, you will need to have repeat exams every 12 months or as recommended by your doctor."}, "Cerebral palsy - resources": {"description": "The following organizations are good resources for information on cerebral palsy:"}, "Celiac disease - resources": {"description": "The following organizations provide additional information:"}, "Color blindness": {"description": "Color blindness is the inability to see certain colors in the usual way.", "Possible Complications": "People who are colorblind may not be able to get a job that requires the ability to see colors accurately. For example, electricians painters, fashion designers and need to be able to see colors accurately.", "Symptoms": ["Trouble seeing colors and the brightness of colors in the usual way", "Inability to tell the difference between shades of the same or similar colors"], "Exams and Tests": "Your doctor or eye specialist can check your color vision in several ways. Testing for color blindness is a common part of an eye exam.", "Treatment": "There is no known treatment. Special contact lenses and glasses may help people with color blindness tell the difference between similar colors.", "Causes": "Color blindness occurs when there is a problem with the pigments in certain nerve cells of the eye that sense color. These cells are called cones. They are found in the light-sensitive layer of tissue at the back of the eye, called the retina.If just one pigment is missing, you may have trouble telling the difference between red and green. This is the most common type of color blindness. If a different pigment is missing, you may have trouble seeing blue-yellow colors. People with blue-yellow color blindness often have problems seeing reds and greens, too.The most severe form of color blindness is achromatopsia. This is a rare condition in which a person cannot see any color, only shades of gray. Most color blindness is due to a genetic problem. About 1 in 10 men have some form of color blindness. Very few women are color blind.The drug hydroxychloroquine (Plaquenil) can also cause color blindness. It is used to treat rheumatoid arthritis and other conditions."}, "Colorado tick fever": {"description": "Colorado tick fever is an acute viral infection spread by the bite of the Dermacentor andersoni wood tick.", "Possible Complications": "Complications include aseptic meningitis, encephalitis, and hemorrhagic fever.", "Symptoms": ["Generalized weakness", "Headache behind the eyes", "Muscle aches", "Nausea and vomiting", "Rash (may be light-colored)", "Sensitivity to light ( photophobia)", "Skin pain", "Sweating"], "Exams and Tests": "Antibody tests can be done to confirm the infection. Other blood tests may include:Complete blood count (CBC), Creatine kinase, Liver function tests. ", "Treatment": "Make sure the tick is fully removed from the skin. Take a pain reliever if necessary. Do not give aspirin to children. Aspirin has been linked\u00a0with Reye syndrome in children. It may also cause other problems in Colorado tick fever.If complications develop, treatment will be aimed at controlling the symptoms.", "Prevention": "When walking or hiking in tick-infested areas, wear closed shoes, long sleeves, and tuck long pants into socks to protect the legs. Wear light-colored clothing, which shows ticks more easily than darker colors, making them easier to remove.Check yourself and your pets frequently. If you find ticks, remove them immediately by using a tweezers, pulling carefully and steadily. Insect repellent may be helpful.", "Causes": "This disease is usually seen between March and September. Most cases occur in April, May, and June.Risk factors are recent outdoor activity and recent tick bite.Colorado tick fever is seen most often in Colorado. Up to 15% of campers have been exposed to the virus that causes the disease. The disease is much less common in the rest of the United States."}, "COPD flare-ups": {"description": "COPD symptoms can worsen suddenly. You may find it hard to breathe. You may cough or wheeze more or produce more phlegm. You might also feel anxious and have trouble sleeping or doing your daily activities. This problem is called a COPD exacerbation, or COPD flare-up.", "Causes": "Certain illnesses, colds, and lung infections from viruses or bacteria can lead to flare-ups. Other causes may include:Being around smoke or other pollutants, Weather changes, Doing too much activity, Being run-down, Feeling stressed or anxious . You can often manage a flare-up right away with medicines and self-care. Work with your doctor on an action plan for COPD exacerbations so that you know what to do.Get to know your usual symptoms, sleep patterns, and when you have good or bad days. This can help you learn the difference between your normal symptoms and signs of a COPD flare-up."}, "Cushing syndrome - exogenous": {"description": "Other forms of Cushing syndrome include:", "Possible Complications": "Constant discomfort, Damage to the eyes, kidneys, and nerves due to untreated high blood sugar, Diabetes, High cholesterol levels, Increased risk of heart attack from untreated diabetes and high cholesterol, Weak bones (osteoporosis) and increased risk of fractures. These complications can generally be prevented with proper treatment.", "Symptoms": ["Round, red, full face (moon face)", "Slow growth rate in children", "Weight gain with fat accumulation on the trunk, but fat loss from the arms, legs, and buttocks (central obesity) ", "Skin infections", "Purple marks (1/2 inch or more wide), called striae, on the skin of the abdomen, thighs, and breasts", "Thin skin with easy bruising ", "Backache, which occurs with routine activities", "Bone pain or tenderness", "Collection of fat between the shoulders and above the collar bone", "Rib and spine fractures caused by thinning of the bones", "Weak muscles, especially of the hips and shoulders ", "Excess hair growth on the face, neck, chest, abdomen, and thighs", "Periods that become irregular or stop ", "Decreased or no desire for sex", "Impotence", "Mental changes, such as depression, anxiety, or changes in behavior", "Fatigue", "Headache", "Increased thirst and urination "], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider will perform a physical exam and ask about your symptoms and the medicines you are taking. Tell the provider about all medicines you have been taking for the past several months.If you use cortisone, prednisone, or other corticosteroids, the following test results may suggest exogenous Cushing syndrome:Low ACTH level, Low cortisol level, No response to an ACTH stimulation test, Higher than normal fasting glucose, Low blood potassium level, Low bone density, as measured by bone mineral density test, High cholesterol, particularly high triglycerides and low high-density lipoprotein (HDL) . A method called high performance liquid chromatography (HPLC) can show a high level of the suspected medicine in the urine.", "Treatment": "Treatment is to slowly decrease and eventually stop taking any corticosteroids. Do not stop taking any medicine without first talking to your health care provider. Suddenly stopping corticosteroids after taking them for a long time can results in an adrenal crisis. If you cannot stop taking the medicine because of disease (for example, you need steroids to treat severe asthma), follow your doctor's instructions on how to reduce the possibility of developing complications, including:Treating high blood sugar with diet, oral medicines, or insulin., Treating high cholesterol with diet or medications., Taking medicines to prevent bone loss. This can help reduce the risk of fractures if you develop osteoporosis. . ", "Prevention": "If you take a corticosteroid, know the signs and symptoms of Cushing syndrome. Getting treated early can help prevent any long-term effects of Cushing syndrome. If you use inhaled steroids, you can decrease your exposure to the steroids by using a spacer and by rinsing your mouth after breathing in the steroids.", "Causes": "Cushing syndrome is a disorder that occurs when your body has a higher than normal level of the hormone cortisol. This hormone is made in the adrenal glands.Exogenous means caused by something outside the body. Exogenous Cushing syndrome occurs when a person takes man-made (synthetic) glucocorticoid medicines to treat a disease. Glucocorticoids are given for many diseases, such as asthma. These medicines come in many forms, including pill, intravenous (IV), injection, enema, topical, and eyedrop."}, "Coccidioides complement fixation": {"description": "Coccidioides complement fixation is a blood test that looks for antibodies to the fungus Coccidioides immitis. This fungus causes the disease coccidioidomycosis."}, "Carotid artery surgery - discharge": {"description": "During your surgery, your heart and brain activity were monitored closely."}, "Crigler-Najjar syndrome": {"description": "Crigler-Najjar syndrome is a very rare inherited disorder in which bilirubin (a substance made by the liver) cannot be broken down.", "Possible Complications": "Possible complications include:A form of brain damage caused by jaundice (kernicterus), Chronic yellow skin/eyes. ", "Symptoms": ["Confusion and changes in thinking", "Yellow skin (jaundice) and yellow in the whites of the eyes (icterus), which begin a few days after birth and get worse over time"], "Exams and Tests": "Tests of liver function include:Conjugated (bound) bilirubin, Enzyme assay, Liver biopsy, Total bilirubin level, Unconjugated (unbound) bilirubin in blood. ", "Treatment": "Light treatment (phototherapy) is needed throughout a person's life. In infants, this is done using bilirubin lights (bili or 'blue' lights). Phototherapy does not work as well after age 4, because thickened skin blocks the light.A liver transplant can be done in some people with type 1 disease.Blood transfusions may help control the amount of bilirubin in blood. Calcium compounds are sometimes used to remove bilirubin in the gut.The drug phenobarbitol is sometimes used to treat Arias syndrome (type 2).", "Prevention": "Genetic counseling is recommended for people with a family history of Crigler-Najjar syndrome who want to have children. Blood tests can identify people who carry the gene.", "Causes": "Crigler-Najjar syndrome occurs when the enzyme that normally converts bilirubin into a form that can easily be removed from the body does not work correctly. Without this enzyme, bilirubin can build up in the body and lead to jaundice (yellow discoloration of skin and eyes) and damage to the brain, muscles, and nerves.Crigler-Najjar (type 1) is the form of the disease that starts early in life. Arias syndrome (type 2) starts later in life.The syndrome runs in families (inherited). A child must receive a copy of the defective gene from both parents to develop the severe form of the condition. Parents who are carriers (with just one defective gene) have about half the enzyme activity of a normal adult, but do not have symptoms."}, "Cryoglobulins": {"description": "Cryoglobulins come in three main types, but in 90% of cases, the cause is hepatitis C. The disease in which cryoglobulins are found is called cryoglobulinemia."}, "Capillary sample": {"description": "A capillary sample is a blood sample collected by pricking the skin. Capillaries are tiny blood vessels near the surface of the skin."}, "Coronary artery fistula": {"description": "Fistula means abnormal connection.", "Possible Complications": "Abnormal heart rhythm (arrhythmia), Heart attack, Heart failure, Opening (rupture) of the fistula, Poor oxygen to the heart. Complications are more common in older patients.", "Symptoms": ["Chest discomfort or pain", "Easy fatigue", "Failure to thrive ", "Fast or irregular heartbeat (palpitations) ", "Shortness of breath (dyspnea) "], "Exams and Tests": "This condition is usually not diagnosed until later in life. It is usually diagnosed during tests for other heart diseases. However, the doctor may hear a heart murmur that will lead to the diagnosis with further testing.Tests to determine the size of the fistula include:An x-ray of the heart using dye to see how and where blood is flowing (angiogram), Passing a thin, flexible tube into the heart to evaluate pressure and flow in the heart and surrounding arteries and veins (cardiac catheterization), Ultrasound exam of the heart (echocardiogram), Using magnets to create images of the heart (MRI) . ", "Treatment": "A small fistula that is not causing symptoms usually will not need treatment. Some small fistulas will close on their own. Often, even if they do not close, they will never cause symptoms or need treatment.Infants with a larger fistula will need to have surgery to close the abnormal connection. The surgeon closes the site with a patch or stitches.Another treatment plugs up the opening without surgery, using a special wire (coil) that is inserted into the heart with a long, thin tube called a catheter. After the procedure in children, the fistula will usually close.", "Prevention": "There is no known way to prevent this condition.", "Causes": "A coronary artery fistula is often congenital, meaning that it is present at birth. It generally occurs when one of the coronary arteries fails to form properly, usually when the baby is developing in the womb. The coronary artery abnormally attaches to one of the chambers of the heart (the atrium or ventricle) or another blood vessel (for example, the pulmonary artery).A coronary artery fistula can also develop after birth. It may be caused by:An infection that weakens the wall of the coronary artery and the heart, Certain types of heart surgery, Injury to the heart. Coronary artery fistula is a rare condition. Infants who are born with it sometimes also have other heart defects."}, "CSF smear": {"description": "A cerebrospinal fluid (CSF) smear is an exam of the fluid that moves in the space\u00a0around\u00a0the spinal cord and brain. CSF protects the brain and spinal cord from injury."}, "Cochlear implant": {"description": "Most patients with cochlear implants cannot get MRI scans, because the implant is made of metal."}, "Crying - excessive (0-6 months)": {"description": "Excessive crying (infants 0-6 months)", "Causes": "Boredom or loneliness, Colic, Discomfort or irritation from a wet or dirty diaper, excessive gas, or feeling cold, Hunger or thirst, Illness, Infection (a likely cause if the crying is accompanied by irritability, lethargy, poor appetite, or fever -- consult your baby's health care provider), Medications, Normal muscle jerks and twitches that disturb the sleep, Pain, Teething. "}, "CEA blood test": {"description": "The CEA test measures the level of carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) in the blood. CEA is a protein normally found in the tissue of a developing baby in the womb. The blood level of this protein disappears or becomes very low after birth. In adults, an abnormal level of CEA may be a sign of cancer."}, "Copper poisoning": {"Symptoms": ["Abdominal pain", "Diarrhea", "Vomiting", "Yellow skin (jaundice)", "Chest pain", "Chills", "Cough", "Fever", "Generalized weakness", "Headache", "Metallic taste in the mouth", "Anemia (low red blood cell count)", "Burning sensation", "Chills", "Convulsions", "Diarrhea (often bloody and may be blue in color)", "Fever", "Liver failure", "Metallic taste", "Muscle aches", "Nausea", "No urine output", "Pain", "Shock", "Vomiting", "Weakness", "Yellow eyes", "Yellow skin "], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or a local poison control center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "C1 esterase inhibitor": {"description": "This article discusses the test that is done to measures the amount of C1-INH in your blood.\r\n"}, "Conversion disorder": {"Symptoms": ["Blindness", "Inability to speak", "Numbness", "Paralysis", "A debilitating symptom that begins suddenly", "History of a psychological problem that gets better after the symptom appears", "Lack of concern that usually occurs with a severe symptom"], "Exams and Tests": "Diagnostic testing does not find any physical cause for the symptoms.The\u00a0doctor will do a physical exam and\u00a0may order\u00a0diagnostic tests. These are to make sure there are no physical causes for the symptom.", "description": "Conversion disorder is a mental health condition in which a person has blindness, paralysis, or other nervous system (neurologic) symptoms that cannot be explained by medical evaluation.", "Causes": "Conversion disorder symptoms may occur because of a psychological conflict.Symptoms usually begin suddenly after a stressful experience. People are at risk of conversion disorder if they also have a medical illness, or\u00a0the other\u00a0mental health problem of dissociative disorder (escape from reality that is not on purpose)\u00a0or a personality disorder (inability to manage feelings and behaviors that are expected in certain social situations).Persons who have conversion disorder\u00a0are not making up their symptoms (malingering). Some doctors falsely believe that\u00a0this disorder is not a real condition and may tell patients the problem is all in their head.\u00a0But this condition\u00a0is real.\u00a0It causes distress and cannot be turned on and off at will.The physical symptoms are thought to be an attempt to resolve the conflict the person feels inside. For example, a woman who believes it is not acceptable to have violent feelings may suddenly feel numbness in her arms after becoming so angry that she wanted to hit someone. Instead of allowing herself to have violent thoughts about hitting someone, she experiences the physical symptom of numbness in her arms.", "Treatment": "Talk therapy and stress management training may help reduce symptoms.The affected body part or physical function will need physical or occupational therapy until the symptoms go away. For example, a paralyzed\u00a0arm must be exercised to keep the muscles strong."}, "Creutzfeldt-Jakob disease": {"description": "Creutzfeldt-Jakob disease (CJD) is a form of brain damage that leads to a rapid decrease of movement and mental function.", "Symptoms": ["Dementia that gets worse quickly over a few weeks or months", "Blurred vision (sometimes)", "Changes in gait (walking)", "Confusion, disorientation", "Hallucinations (seeing things that aren't there)", "Lack of coordination (for example, stumbling and falling)", "Muscle stiffness", "Muscle twitching", "Nervous, jumpy feelings", "Personality changes", "Sleepiness", "Sudden\u00a0jerky movements\u00a0or seizures", "Trouble speaking"], "Exams and Tests": "Early in the disease, a nervous system and mental examination will show memory problems and changes in other intellectual functions. Later in the disease, a motor system examination (an exam to test muscle reflexes, strength, coordination, and other physical functions) may show:Abnormal reflexes or increased normal reflex responses, Increase in muscle tone, Muscle twitching and spasms, Strong startle response, Weakness and loss of muscle tissue (muscle wasting) . There is a loss of coordination and changes in the cerebellum, the area of the brain that controls coordination. An eye examination shows areas of blindness that the person may not notice.Tests used to diagnose this condition may include:Blood tests to rule out other forms of dementia and to look for markers that sometimes occur with the disease, CT scan of the brain, Electroencephalogram (EEG), MRI of the brain, Spinal tap to test for a protein called 14-3-3. The disease can only be confirmed with a brain biopsy or autopsy. Today, it is very rare for a brain biopsy to be done to look for this disease.", "Causes": "CJD is caused by a protein called a prion. A prion causes normal proteins to fold abnormally. This affects other proteins' ability to function.CJD is very rare. It occurs in about 1 out of every 1 million people. There are several types of CJD. It can be grouped into sporadic, familial, or acquired types.The classic types of CJD are:Sporadic CJD makes up most cases. It occurs for no known reason. The average age at which it starts is 65., Familial CJD occurs when a person inherits the abnormal prion from a parent (this form of CJD is rare)., Acquired CJD includes variant CJD (vCJD), the form related to mad cow disease; and iatrogenic CJD, in which the disease is sometimes passed through a blood product transfusion, transplant, or contaminated surgical instruments.. Variant CJD is caused by eating infected meat. The infection that causes the disease in cows is believed to be the same one that causes vCJD in humans.Varient CJD causes less than 1% of all CJD cases. It tends to affect younger people. Fewer than 200 people worldwide have had this disease. Almost all cases occurred in England and France. CJD may be related to several other diseases caused by prions, including:Chronic wasting disease (found in deer), Kuru (seen in New Guinea women who ate the brains of dead relatives as part of a funeral ritual), Scrapie (found in sheep), Other very rare inherited human diseases, such as Gerstmann-Straussler-Scheinker disease and fatal familial insomnia. ", "Prevention": "Medical equipment should be treated to remove the proteins that may cause the disease. People who have a history of CJD should not donate a cornea or other body\u00a0tissue.Most countries now have strict guidelines for managing infected cows to avoid transmitting CJD to humans.", "Treatment": "There is no known cure for this condition. Interleukins and other medications may help slow the disease. The person may need care early in the disease. Medications may be needed to control aggressive behaviors.Providing a safe environment, controlling aggressive or agitated behavior, and meeting the person's needs may require monitoring and assistance in the home or in a care facility. Family counseling may help the family cope with the changes needed for home care.Visiting nurses or aides, volunteer services, homemakers, adult protective services, and other community resources may help care for the person with CJD.People with this condition may need help controlling unacceptable or dangerous behaviors. This involves rewarding positive behaviors and ignoring negative behaviors (when it is safe). They may also need help getting oriented to their surroundings.Getting legal help with advance directives, powers of attorney, and other legal actions early in the disorder can make it easier to make ethical decisions about the CJD patient's care."}, "Chiggers": {"description": "Chiggers are tiny, 6-legged wingless organisms (larvae) that mature to become a type of mite. Chiggers are found in tall grass and weeds. Their bite causes severe itching.", "Possible Complications": "A secondary infection may occur from scratching.", "Symptoms": ["Severe itching", "Red pimple-like bumps or hives"], "Exams and Tests": "Your health care provider can diagnose chiggers by examining the rash.", "Treatment": "The goal of treatment is to stop the itching. Antihistamines and corticosteroid creams or lotions may be helpful. Antibiotics are not necessary unless you also have another skin infection.", "Prevention": "Avoid outdoor areas that you know are contaminated with chiggers. Applying bug spray containing DEET to skin and clothing can help prevent chigger bites. ", "Causes": "Chiggers are found in certain outdoor areas, such as: Berry patches, Tall grass and weeds, Edges of woodlands . Chiggers bite humans around the waist, ankles, or in warm skin folds. Bites commonly occur in the summer and fall months."}, "Cholesterol and lifestyle": {"description": "Cholesterol is measured in milligrams per deciliter (mg/dL). Extra cholesterol in your blood builds up inside the walls of your blood vessels. This buildup is called plaque, or atherosclerosis. Plaque reduces or stops blood flow. This can cause a heart attack, stroke, or other serious heart or blood vessel disease."}, "Communicating with patients ": {"description": "Often, the first step is to find out what the patient already knows. Use these guidelines to do a thorough assessment before starting patient education:"}, "Changing your urostomy pouch": {"description": "Urinary pouch; Urinary appliance"}, "Cataract - adult": {"description": "A cataract is a clouding of the lens of the eye.", "Possible Complications": "Early diagnosis and treatment are key to preventing permanent vision problems.Although rare, a cataract that goes on to an advanced stage (called a hypermature cataract) can begin to leak into other parts of the eye. This may cause a painful form of glaucoma and inflammation inside the eye.", "Symptoms": ["Mild clouding of the lens often occurs after age 60. But it may not cause any vision problems.", "By age 75, most people have cataracts that affect their vision.", "Being sensitive to glare", "Cloudy, fuzzy, foggy, or filmy vision", "Difficulty seeing at night or in dim light", "Double vision", "Loss of color intensity", "Problems seeing shapes against a background or the difference between shades of colors", "Seeing halos around lights", "Frequent changes in eyeglass prescriptions"], "Exams and Tests": "A standard eye exam and slit-lamp examination are used to diagnose cataracts. Other tests are rarely needed, except to rule out other causes of poor vision.", "Treatment": "\r\n\r\nFor early cataract, the eye doctor may recommend the following:Change in eyeglass prescription, Better lighting, Magnifying lenses, Sunglasses. As vision gets worse, you may need to make changes around the home to avoid falls and injuries.The only treatment for a cataract is surgery to remove it.\u00a0If a cataract is not making it hard for you to see, surgery is usually not necessary. Cataracts do not harm the eye, so you can have surgery when you and your eye doctor decide it is right for you. Surgery is usually recommended when you cannot do normal activities such as driving, reading, or looking at computer or video screens, even with glasses.", "Prevention": "The best prevention involves controlling diseases that increase the risk of a cataract. Avoiding exposure to things that promote cataract formation can also help. For example, if you smoke, now is the time to quit. Also, when outdoors, wear sunglasses to protect your eyes from harmful UV rays.", "Causes": "The lens of the eye is normally clear. It acts like the lens on a camera, focusing light as it passes to the back of the eye.Until a person is around age 45, the shape of the lens is able to change. This allows the lens to focus on an object, whether it is close or far away. As a person ages, proteins in the lens begin to break down. As a result, the lens becomes cloudy. What the eye sees may appear blurry. This condition is known as a cataract.Factors that may speed cataract formation are:Diabetes, Eye inflammation, Eye injury, Family history of cataracts, Long-term use of corticosteroids (taken by mouth) or certain other medications, Radiation exposure, Smoking, Surgery for another eye problem, Too much exposure to ultraviolet light (sunlight). In many cases, the cause of cataract is unknown."}, "Craniosynostosis repair": {"description": "Craniosynostosis repair is surgery to correct a problem that causes the bones of a child's skull to grow together (fuse) too early."}, "Culdocentesis": {"description": "Culdocentesis is a procedure that checks for abnormal fluid in the space just behind the vagina. This area is called the cul-de-sac."}, "Coronary artery spasm": {"description": "Coronary artery spasm is a temporary, sudden narrowing of one of the coronary arteries (the arteries that supply blood to the heart). The spasm slows or stops blood flow through the artery and starves part of the heart of oxygen-rich blood.", "Possible Complications": "Abnormal heart rhythms, which may cause cardiac arrest and sudden death, Heart attacks. ", "Symptoms": ["Constricting", "Crushing", "Pressure", "Squeezing", "Tightness", "Often occurs at rest", "May occur at the same time each day, usually between midnight and 8:00 AM", "Lasts from 5 to 30 minutes"], "Exams and Tests": "Tests to diagnose coronary artery spasm may include:Coronary angiography, ECG, Echocardiography. ", "Treatment": "The goal of treatment is to control chest pain and prevent a heart attack. A medicine called nitroglycerin can relieve an episode of pain.Your health care provider may prescribe other medications to prevent chest pain. You may need a type of medicine called a calcium channel blocker or a long-acting nitrate long-term. Your doctor may also prescribe a short-acting nitrate to use during an episode of chest pain.Beta-blockers are another type of medication that may be used. However, beta-blockers may make the condition worse, and may be harmful if used with cocaine.", "Prevention": "Take measures to reduce your risk of atherosclerosis. This includes not smoking, eating a low-fat diet, and increasing exercise.If you have this condition, you should avoid coronary artery spasm triggers, including exposure to cold, cocaine use, cigarette smoking, and high-stress situations.", "Causes": "The spasm often occurs in coronary arteries that have not become hardened due to plaque buildup (atherosclerosis). However, it also can occur in arteries with plaque buildup.These spasms are due to a squeezing of muscles in the artery wall. They usually occur in just one area of the artery. The coronary artery may appear normal during testing, but it does not function normally.About 2% of patients with angina (chest pain and pressure) have coronary artery spasm.Coronary artery spasm occurs most commonly in people who smoke or who have high cholesterol or high blood pressure. It may occur without cause, or it may be triggered by:Alcohol withdrawal, Emotional stress, Exposure to cold, Medications that cause narrowing of the blood vessels (vasoconstriction), Stimulant drugs, such as amphetamines and cocaine. Cocaine use and cigarette smoking can cause severe spasms of the arteries, and can cause the heart to work harder. In many people, coronary artery spasm may occur without any other heart risk factors (such as smoking, diabetes, high blood pressure, and high cholesterol)."}, "Cleft palate - resources": {"description": "The following organization is a good resource for information on cleft palate:"}, "CSF total protein": {"description": "CSF total protein is a test to determine the amount of protein in your spinal fluid, also called cerebrospinal fluid (CSF). "}, "Cord blood testing": {"description": "Cord blood testing can be done to evaluate a newborn's health."}, "Congenital nephrotic syndrome": {"description": "See also: Nephrotic syndrome", "Possible Complications": "Acute kidney failure, Blood clots, Chronic kidney failure, End-stage kidney disease, Frequent, severe infections, Malnutrition and related diseases. ", "Symptoms": ["Cough", "Decreased urine output", "Foamy appearance of urine", "Low birth weight", "Poor appetite", "Swelling (total body)"], "Exams and Tests": "An ultrasound done on the pregnant mother before birth may show a larger-than-normal placenta. The placenta is the organ that develops during pregnancy to feed the growing baby.Pregnant mothers may have a screening test done during pregnancy to check for this condition. The test looks for higher-than-normal levels of alpha-fetoprotein in a sample of amniotic fluid. Genetic tests should be used to confirm the diagnosis if the screening test is positive.After birth, the infant will show signs of severe fluid retention and swelling. The health care provider will hear abnormal sounds when listening to the baby's heart and lungs with a stethoscope. Blood pressure may be high. There may be signs of malnutrition.A urinalysis reveals fat and large amounts of protein in the urine. Total protein in the blood may be low.", "Treatment": "Early and aggressive treatment is needed to control this disorder.Treatment may involve:Antibiotics to control infections, Blood pressure medicines called ACE inhibitors and ARBs to reduce the amount of protein leaking into the urine, Diuretics (\"water pills\") to remove excess fluid, Nonsteroidal anti-inflammatory drugs (NSAIDs) such as indomethacin to reduce the amount of protein leaking into the urine. Fluids may be limited to help control swelling.The health care provider may recommend removing the kidneys to stop protein loss. This may be followed by dialysis or a kidney transplant.", "Causes": "Congenital nephrotic syndrome is a very rare form of nephrotic syndrome. It occurs mostly in families of Finnish origin and develops shortly after birth. It is inherited, which means it is passed down through families.Children with this disorder have an abnormal form of a protein called nephrin. The kidney's filters (glomeruli) need this protein to function normally."}, "Cystoscopy": {"description": "Cystoscopy is a procedure to see the inside of the bladder and urethra using a telescope."}, "COPD - managing stress and your mood": {"description": "When you have COPD, caring for your emotional health is just as important as taking care of your physical health. Learning how to deal with stress and anxiety and seeking care for depression can help you manage COPD and feel better in general."}, "CSD skin test": {"description": "The test is rarely used today and is not recommended. There are better methods available to diagnose cat scratch disease, such as antibody detection by the EIA test or bacteria detection by a PCR test."}, "Cardiomyopathy": {"description": "Most people with cardiomyopathy have heart failure.", "Causes": "There are many types of cardiomyopathy, with different causes:Dilated cardiomyopathy is a condition in which the heart becomes weak and the chambers get large. As a result, the heart cannot pump enough blood out to the body. It can be caused by many medical problems.Hypertrophic cardiomyopathy (HCM) is a condition in which the heart muscle becomes thick. This makes it harder for blood to leave the heart. This type of cardiomyopathy is most often passed down through families.Ischemic cardiomyopathy is caused by\u00a0a narrowing of the arteries that supply the heart with blood. It makes the heart walls thin so they do not pump well.Restrictive cardiomyopathy is a group of disorders. The heart chambers are unable to fill with blood because the heart muscle is stiff. The most common causes of this type of cardiomyopathy are amyloidosis and scarring of the heart from an unknown cause.Peripartum cardiomyopathy occurs during pregnancy or in the first 5 months afterward.", "Treatment": "When possible, the cause of cardiomyopathy is treated. Medicines and lifestyle changes are often needed to treat the symptoms of heart failure, angina, and abnormal heart rhythms.Procedures or surgeries may also be used, including:A defibrillator that sends an electrical pulse to stop life-threatening abnormal heart rhythms, A pacemaker that treats a slow heart rate or helps both sides of the heart beat at the same time, Coronary artery bypass (CABG) surgery or angioplasty\u00a0that may\u00a0improve blood flow to the damaged or weakened heart muscle, Heart transplant that may be tried when all other treatments have failed . Recently, implantable artificial heart pumps have been developed. These may be used for very severe cases. However, not all patients need or are able to have this advanced treatment. "}, "Chronic fatigue syndrome - resources": {"description": "The following organizations provide information on chronic fatigue syndrome:"}, "Colitis": {"description": "Colitis is swelling (inflammation) of the large intestine (colon).", "Possible Complications": "Bleeding, Hole in the colon, Toxic megacolon, Sore (ulceration). ", "Symptoms": ["Abdominal pain and bloating: It may be constant, or come and go", "Bloody stools", "Chills", "Constant urge to have a bowel movement", "Dehydration", "Diarrhea", "Fever "], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider will perform a physical exam. You will also be asked questions about your symptoms such as: How long have you had the symptoms?, How severe is your pain?, How often do you have pain and how long does it last?, How often so you have diarrhea?, Have you have been traveling? . The health care provider can diagnose colitis by inserting a flexible tube into the rectum (flexible sigmoidoscopy or colonoscopy) and looking at certain areas of the colon. You may have biopsies taken during this exam. Biopsies may show changes related to inflammation.Other studies that can identify colitis include:CT scan of the abdomen, MRI of the abdomen, Barium enema. ", "Treatment": "Your treatment will depend on the cause of the disease. ", "Causes": "Causes of colitis include:Infections, including those caused by a virus, parasite, and food poisoning due to bacteria, Ulcerative colitis and Crohn's disease, Lack of blood flow (ischemic colitis), Past radiation to the large bowel, Necrotizing enterocolitis in newborns, Pseudomembranous colitis. "}, "CMV serology test": {"description": "The CMV serology test determines the presence of antibodies to a virus called cytomegalovirus (CMV) in the blood."}, "Cervical spondylosis": {"description": "Cervical spondylosis is a disorder in which there is abnormal wear on the cartilage and bones of the neck (cervical vertebrae). It is a common cause of chronic neck pain.", "Possible Complications": "Inability to hold in feces (fecal incontinence) or urine (urinary incontinence), Loss of muscle function or feeling, Permanent disability (occasionally), Poor balance. ", "Symptoms": ["After standing or sitting", "At night", "When you sneeze, cough, or laugh", "When you bend the neck backwards or walk more than a few yards", "Neck stiffness that gets worse over time", "Numbness or abnormal sensations in the shoulders, arms, or legs (in rare cases)", "Headaches, especially in the back of the head", "Loss of balance", "Loss of control over the bladder or bowels (if there is pressure on the spinal cord)"], "Exams and Tests": "A physical exam may show that you have trouble moving your head toward your shoulder and rotating your head.Your health care provider may ask you to bend your head forward and to each\u00a0side while putting slight downward pressure on the top of your head. Increased pain or numbness during this test is usually a sign that there is pressure on a nerve in your spine.Weakness or loss of feeling can be signs of damage to certain nerve roots or to the spinal cord. A spine or neck x-ray may be done to look for arthritis or other changes in your spine.MRI of the neck is done when you have:Severe neck or arm pain that does not get better with treatment, Weakness or numbness in your arms or hands. EMG and nerve conduction velocity test may be done to examine nerve root function. ", "Treatment": "Your doctor and other health professionals can help you manage your pain\u00a0so that\u00a0you can stay active.Your doctor may refer you for physical therapy. The physical therapist will help you reduce your pain using stretches. The therapist will\u00a0teach you exercises that make your neck muscles stronger., The therapist can also use neck traction to relieve some of the pressure in your neck., You may also see a massage therapist, someone who performs acupuncture, or someone who does spinal manipulation (a chiropractor, osteopathic doctor, or physical therapist). Sometimes a few visits will help with neck pain., Cold packs and heat therapy may help your pain during flare-ups.. A type of talk therapy called cognitive behavioral therapy may be helpful if the pain is having a serious impact on your life. This technique helps you better understand your pain and teaches you how to manage it.Medicines can help your\u00a0neck\u00a0pain. Your doctor may prescribe nonsteroidal anti-inflammatory medications (NSAIDs) for long-term pain control. Narcotics may be prescribed if the pain is severe and does not respond to NSAIDs.If the pain does not respond to these treatments, or you have a loss of movement or feeling, surgery is considered. Surgery is done to relieve the pressure on the nerves or spinal cord.\u00a0\u00a0\u00a0 ", "Causes": "Cervical spondylosis is caused by chronic wear on the cervical spine. This includes the disks or cushions between the neck vertebrae and the joints between the bones of the cervical spine. There may be abnormal growths or spurs on the bones of the spine (vertebrae).Over time these changes can press down on (compress) one or more of the nerve roots. In advanced cases, the spinal cord becomes involved. This can affect not just the arms, but the legs as well.Everyday wear and tear may start these changes. People who are very active at work or in sports may be more likely to have them.The major risk factor is aging. By age 60, most\u00a0persons show signs of cervical spondylosis on x-ray. Other factors that can make a person more likely to develop spondylosis are:Being overweight and not exercising, Having a job that requires heavy lifting or a lot of bending and twisting, Past neck injury (often several years before), Past spine surgery, Ruptured or slipped disk, Severe arthritis, Small fractures to the spine from osteoporosis. "}, "Complement component 3 (C3)": {"description": "There are nine major complement proteins. They are labeled C1 through C9. This test measures C3."}, "Craniosynostosis": {"description": "Early closing of a suture\u00a0causes the baby to have an abnormally shaped head.", "Possible Complications": "Craniosynostosis results in head deformity that can be severe and permanent if it is not corrected. Increased intracranial pressure, seizures, and developmental delay can occur.", "Symptoms": ["No \"soft spot\" (fontanelle) on the newborn's skull", "A raised hard ridge along the affected sutures", "Unusual head shape", "Slow or no increase in the head size over time as the baby grows ", "Sagittal synostosis (scaphocephaly) is the most common type. It affects the main\u00a0suture on the very top of the head. The early closing forces the head to grow long and narrow, instead of wide. Babies with this type tend to have a broad forehead. It is more common in boys than girls.\u00a0", "Frontal plagiocephaly is the next most common type. It affects the suture that runs from ear to ear on the top of the head. It is more common in girls.", "Metopic synostosis is a rare form that affects the suture close to the forehead. The child's head shape may be described as trigonocephaly. It\u00a0may range from mild to severe. "], "Exams and Tests": "The doctor will feel the infant's head and perform a physical exam.\u00a0The following tests may be done:Measuring the width of the infant's head, X-rays of the skull, CT scan of the head. Well-child visits are an important part of your child's health care. They allow your doctor or nurse to regularly check the growth of your infant's head over time. This will help identify any problems early. ", "Treatment": "Surgery is done while the baby is still an infant. The goals of surgery are:Relieve any pressure on the brain, Make sure there is enough room in the skull to allow the brain to properly grow, Improve the appearance of the child's head. ", "Causes": "The cause of\u00a0craniosynostosis is unknown. Genes may play a role. However, there is usually no family history of the condition. One type that is passed down through families (inherited) can occur with other health problems, such as seizures, decreased intelligence, and blindness. Genetic disorders commonly linked to\u00a0craniosynostosis include Crouzon, Apert, Carpenter, Chotzen, and Pfeiffer syndromes.However, most children with craniosynostosis are otherwise healthy and have normal intelligence."}, "Cardioversion": {"description": "Cardioversion is a method to return an abnormal heart rhythm back to normal."}, "Chorionic villus sampling": {"description": "The test is\u00a0done to screen your baby for genetic problems."}, "Crush injury": {"description": "Damage related to crush injuries include:"}, "Consumer rights and responsibilities": {"description": "For more information visit the Office for Civil Rights - HIPAA website - www.hhs.gov/ocr/hipaa"}, "Cranial mononeuropathy VI": {"description": "Cranial mononeuropathy VI is a nerve disorder. It affects the function of the sixth cranial nerve. As a result, the person may have double vision.", "Possible Complications": "Complications may include permanent vision changes.", "Symptoms": ["Double vision when looking to one side", "Headaches", "Pain around the eye "], "Exams and Tests": "Tests typically show that one eye has trouble looking to the side, while the other eye moves normally. An examination shows the eyes do not line up either at rest or when looking in the direction of the weak eye.Your health care provider will do a complete examination to determine the possible effect on other parts of the nervous system. Depending on the suspected cause, you may need:Blood tests, Head imaging study (such as an MRI or CT scan), Spinal tap (lumbar puncture) . You may need to be referred to a doctor who specializes in vision problems related to the nervous system (neuro-ophthalmologist).", "Treatment": "If your health care provider diagnoses swelling or inflammation of, or around the nerve, medications called corticosteroids may be used.Sometimes, the condition disappears without treatment. People with diabetes may benefit from close control of blood sugar levels.Until the nerve heals, wearing an eye patch relieves double vision.", "Prevention": "There is no way to prevent this condition. Persons with diabetes may reduce the risk by controlling their blood sugar.", "Causes": "Cranial mononeuropathy VI is damage to the sixth cranial (skull) nerve. This nerve, also called the abducens nerve, helps you move your eye sideways toward your temple.Disorders of this nerve can occur with:Brain aneurysms, Diabetic neuropathy, Gradenigo syndrome (which also causes discharge from the ear and eye pain), Increased or decreased pressure in the skull, Infections (such as meningitis or sinusitis), Multiple sclerosis, Pregnancy, Stroke, Trauma (caused by head injury or accidentally during surgery), Tumors around or behind the eye . In some people, there is no clear cause.Because there are common nerve pathways through the skull, the same disorder that damages the sixth cranial nerve may affect other cranial nerves (such as the third or fourth cranial nerve)."}, "Cleft lip and palate repair": {"description": "Cleft lip and cleft palate repair is surgery to fix birth defects of the upper lip and palate (roof of the mouth)."}, "Condoms - male": {"description": "Condoms for women can also be purchased."}, "Calcium pyrophosphate arthritis": {"description": "Calcium pyrophosphate\u00a0arthritis (CPPD) is a joint disease that can cause attacks of arthritis. Like with gout, crystals form in the joints. But in calcium pyrophosphate arthritis, the crystals are not formed from uric acid.", "Possible Complications": "Permanent joint damage can occur without treatment.", "Symptoms": ["Attacks of joint pain and fluid buildup in the joint, leading to joint pain, swelling, warmth and redness", "Chronic (long-term) arthritis"], "Exams and Tests": "An exam of joint fluid\u00a0to detect\u00a0white blood cells and calcium pyrophosphate crystals, Joint x-rays to look for joint damage and calcium deposits in joint spaces, Blood tests to screen for conditions that are linked to calcium pyrophosphate arthritis\u00a0. Carefully testing the joint fluid for crystals can help the doctor diagnose the condition. Because most conditions involving joint pain are treated\u00a0with the same medicines (such as steroids and nonsteroidal anti-inflammatory drugs), you may still get the right treatment, even if your diagnosis was incorrect at first.", "Treatment": "Treatment may involve removing fluid to relieve pressure in the joint. A needle is placed into the joint and fluid is removed (aspirated).Steroid injections may help treat severely\u00a0swollen joints. Oral steroids are sometimes used when\u00a0many joints are swollen.Nonsteroidal anti-inflammatory medications (NSAIDS) may help ease painful attacks. Colchicine may be useful in some people.", "Prevention": "There is no known way to prevent this disorder. However, treating other problems that may cause pseudogout may make the condition less severe, and may help prevent it from developing in patients who don't already have it.", "Causes": "Calcium pyrophosphate arthritis\u00a0is caused by the collection of salt called calcium pyrophosphate dihydrate (CPPD). The buildup of this salt forms crystals in the joints. This leads to attacks of joint swelling and pain in the knees, wrists, ankles, and other joints.Among older adults,\u00a0calcium pyrophosphate arthritis\u00a0is a common cause of sudden (acute) arthritis in one joint.Calcium pyrophosphate arthritis mainly affects the elderly because joint degeneration and osteoarthritis increases with age. However, it can sometimes affect younger people who have conditions such as:Hemochromatosis, Parathyroid disease, Thyroid disease. Because the symptoms are similar,\u00a0calcium pyrophosphate arthritis\u00a0can be misdiagnosed as:Gouty arthritis (gout), Osteoarthritis, Rheumatoid arthritis. "}, "Cor pulmonale": {"description": "Cor pulmonale is a condition that causes the right side of the heart to fail. Long-term high blood pressure in the arteries of the lung and right ventricle of the heart can lead to cor pulmonale.", "Possible Complications": "Cor pulmonale may lead to:Life-threatening shortness of breath, Severe fluid buildup in your body, Shock, Death. ", "Symptoms": ["Fainting spells during activity", "Chest discomfort, usually in the front of the chest", "Chest pain", "Swelling of the feet or ankles", "Symptoms of lung disorders, such as wheezing or coughing", "Lips and fingers that turn blue (cyanosis) "], "Exams and Tests": "Your health care provider will perform a physical exam. This may show:Fluid buildup in your belly, Abnormal heart sounds, Bluish skin, Liver swelling, Swelling of the neck veins, which is a sign of high pressure in the right side of the heart, Ankle swelling . These tests may help diagnose cor pulmonale:Blood antibody tests, Blood test to check for a substance called brain natriuretic peptide (BNP), Chest x-ray, CT scan of the chest, with or without an injection of a contrast fluid (dye), Echocardiogram (ECG or EKG), Lung biopsy (rarely done), Measurement of blood oxygen by checking arterial blood gas (ABG), Pulmonary (lung) function tests, Right heart catheterization, Ventilation and perfusion scan of the lungs (V/Q scan) . ", "Treatment": "The goal of treatment is to control symptoms. It is important to treat medical problems that cause pulmonary hypertension, because they can lead to cor pulmonale.Many treatment options are available. Your doctor will decide which medicine is best for you. In general, the cause of your cor pulmonale will determine which treatment you receive. If your doctor prescribes medicines, you may take them by mouth (oral), receive them through a tube that goes into a vein (intravenous or IV), or breathe them in (inhaled). You will be closely monitored during treatment to watch for side effects and to see how well the medicine works for you. Never stop taking your medicines without first talking to your doctor. Other treatments may include:Blood thinners to reduce the risk of blood clots, Oxygen therapy at home, A lung or heart-lung transplant, if medicine does not work . Important tips to follow:Avoid strenuous activities and heavy lifting., Avoid traveling to high altitudes., Get a yearly flu vaccine, as well as other vaccines, such as the pneumonia vaccine., If you smoke, stop., Use oxygen if your doctor prescribes it., Do not get pregnant (women).. ", "Prevention": "Avoid cigarette smoking to help prevent lung disease, because lung disease can lead to cor pulmonale.", "Causes": "High blood pressure in the arteries of the lungs is called pulmonary hypertension. It is the most common cause of cor pulmonale. In people who have pulmonary hypertension, changes in the small blood vessels inside the lungs can lead to increased blood pressure in the right side of the heart. This makes it harder for the heart to pump blood to the lungs. If this high pressure continues, it puts a strain on the right side of the heart. That strain can cause cor pulmonale.Chronic lung conditions that cause low blood oxygen levels in the blood over a long time can also lead to cor pulmonale. A few of these are:Chronic obstructive pulmonary disease (COPD), Chronic blood clots in the lungs, Cystic fibrosis (CF), Scarring of the lung tissue (interstitial lung disease), Severe curving of the upper part of the spine (kyphoscoliosis), Obstructive sleep apnea, which causes stops in breathing because of airway inflammation . "}, "Closed reduction of a fractured bone - aftercare": {"description": "Fracture reduction - closed - aftercare; Cast care"}, "Calcium hydroxide poisoning": {"Symptoms": ["Loss of vision", "Severe pain in the throat", "Severe pain or burning in the nose, eyes, ears, lips, or tongue", "Blood in the stool", "Burns in the esophagus (food pipe)", "Severe abdominal pain", "Vomiting", "Vomiting blood", "Collapse", "Low blood pressure that develops rapidly", "Too much or too little acid in the blood (leads to organ damage)", "Breathing difficulty (from breathing in substance)", "Throat swelling (which may also cause breathing difficulty)", "Burns", "Holes (necrosis) in the skin or tissues underneath", "Irritation"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Cervical cancer - screening and prevention": {"description": "There is a lot you can do to decrease your chance of having cervical cancer. Also, tests done by your health care provider can find early changes that may lead to cancer or find cervical cancer in the early stages."}, "Congenital platelet function defects": {"description": "Congenital platelet function defects are problems with one of the blood elements needed for normal clots to form. These cells are called platelets. Congenital means present from birth.", "Possible Complications": "Severe bleeding\r\n, Iron deficiency anemia in menstruating women. ", "Symptoms": ["Bleeding during and after surgery", "Bleeding gums", "Easy bruising", "Heavy menstrual periods", "Nosebleeds ", "Prolonged bleeding with small injuries"], "Exams and Tests": "The following tests may be used to diagnose this condition:Bleeding time, Complete blood count (CBC), Partial thromboplastin time (PTT), Platelet aggregation test, Prothrombin time (PT). You may need other tests. Your relatives may need to be tested.", "Treatment": "There is no specific treatment for these disorders.People with bleeding disorders should avoid taking aspirin and nonsteroidal anti-inflammatory drugs (such as ibuprofen and naproxen) because they are known to affect blood clotting. Patients who have severe bleeding may need platelet transfusions.", "Prevention": "A blood test can detect the gene responsible for the platelet defect. You may wish to seek genetic counseling if you have a family history of this problem and are considering having children. ", "Causes": "Congenital platelet function defects are bleeding disorders that cause reduced platelet function, even though there are normal platelet counts.Most of the time, people with these disorders have a family history of a bleeding disorder. Bernard-Soulier syndrome occurs when platelets lack a substance that sticks to the walls of blood vessels. This disorder may cause severe bleeding.Glanzmann's thrombasthenia is a condition caused by the lack of a protein needed for platelets to clump together. This disorder may also cause severe bleeding., Platelet storage pool disorder (also called platelet secretion disorder) is due to a defect that cause easy bleeding or bruising. It is caused by the faulty storage of substances inside platelets. These substances are usually released to help platelets function properly.. "}, "Chronic kidney disease": {"description": "Chronic kidney disease is the slow loss of kidney function over time. The main\u00a0job of the kidneys is to remove wastes and excess water from the body.", "Possible Complications": "Anemia, Bleeding from the stomach or intestines, Bone, joint, and muscle pain, Changes in blood sugar, Damage to nerves of the legs and arms (peripheral neuropathy), Dementia, Fluid buildup around the lungs (pleural effusion), Heart and blood vessel complications \r\n\r\nCongestive heart failure, Coronary artery disease, High blood pressure, Pericarditis, Stroke. , High phosphorous levels, High potassium levels, Hyperparathyroidism, Increased risk of infections, Liver damage or failure, Malnutrition, Miscarriages and infertility, Seizures, Swelling (edema), Weakening of the bones and increased risk of fractures. ", "Symptoms": ["Appetite loss", "General ill feeling and fatigue", "Headaches", "Itching (pruritus) and dry skin", "Nausea", "Weight loss without trying to lose weight ", "Abnormally dark or light skin", "Bone pain", "Drowsiness\u00a0or problems concentrating or thinking", "Numbness or swelling in the hands and feet", "Muscle twitching or cramps", "Breath odor", "Easy bruising, or blood in the stool", "Excessive thirst", "Frequent hiccups", "Problems with sexual function", "Menstrual periods stop (amenorrhea)", "Shortness of breath", "Sleep problems ", "Vomiting, often in the morning"], "Exams and Tests": "Most people will have high blood pressure at all stages of chronic kidney disease. During an exam, your health care provider may also hear abnormal heart or lung sounds in your chest. You may have signs of nerve damage during a nervous system exam.A urinalysis may show protein or other changes in your urine. These changes may appear 6 months to 10 or more years before symptoms appear.Tests that check how well the kidneys are working include:Creatinine clearance, Creatinine levels, BUN. Chronic kidney disease changes the results of several other tests. You\u00a0will need to have the following tests as often as every 2 - 3 months when kidney disease gets worse:Albumin, Calcium, Cholesterol, Complete blood count (CBC), Electrolytes, Magnesium, Phosphorous, Potassium, Sodium. Other tests that may be done to look for the cause or type of kidney disease include: CT scan of the abdomen\u00a0\u00a0 , MRI of the abdomen\u00a0 , Ultrasound of the abdomen\u00a0\u00a0\u00a0 , Kidney biopsy\u00a0\u00a0\u00a0 , Kidney scan, Kidney ultrasound. This disease may also change the results of the following tests:Erythropoietin, PTH, Bone density test, Vitamin D\u00a0level\r\n  . ", "Treatment": "Controlling blood pressure will slow further kidney damage.Angiotensin-converting enzyme (ACE) inhibitors or angiotensin receptor blockers (ARBs) are used most often., The goal is to keep blood pressure at or below 130/80 mmHg. . Making lifestyle changes can help protect the kidneys, and prevent heart disease and stroke, such as:Do not smoke., Eat meals that are low in fat and cholesterol., Get regular exercise (talk to your doctor or nurse before starting to exercise)., Take drugs to lower your cholesterol, if needed., Keep your blood sugar under control., Avoid eating too much salt or potassium. . Always talk to your kidney doctor before taking any over-the-counter medicine. This includes vitamins, herbs and supplements. Make sure all of the doctors you visit know you have chronic kidney disease.Other treatments may include:Medicines called phosphate binders, to help prevent high phosphorous levels, Extra iron in the diet, iron pills, iron given through a vein (intravenous iron) special shots of a medicine called erythropoietin, and blood transfusions to treat anemia, Extra calcium and vitamin D (always talk to your doctor before taking) . Your doctor may have you follow a special diet for chronic kidney disease. Limiting fluids, Eating less protein, Restricting salt, potassium, phosphorous, and other electrolytes, Getting enough calories to prevent weight loss . All people with chronic kidney disease should be up-to-date on the following vaccinations:Hepatitis A vaccine, Hepatitis B vaccine, Flu vaccine, Pneumonia vaccine (PPV). ", "Prevention": "Treating the condition that is causing the problem may help prevent or delay chronic kidney disease. People who have diabetes should control their blood sugar and blood pressure levels and should not smoke.", "Causes": "Chronic kidney disease (CKD) slowly gets worse over months or years.\u00a0 you may not notice any symptoms for some time. The loss of function may be\u00a0so slow that you do not have symptoms until your kidneys\u00a0have almost stopped working.The final stage of chronic kidney disease is called end-stage renal disease (ESRD). At this stage, the kidneys are no longer able to remove enough wastes and excess fluids from the body. At this point, you would need dialysis or a kidney transplant.Diabetes and high blood pressure are the two most common causes and account for most cases.Many other diseases and conditions can damage the kidneys, including:Autoimmune disorders (such as systemic lupus erythematosus and scleroderma), Birth defects of the kidneys (such as polycystic kidney disease), Some\u00a0toxic chemicals\r\n  , Injury to the kidney, Kidney stones and infection, Problems with the arteries feeding the kidneys, Some medicines, such as pain and cancer drugs, \r\n  Backward flow of urine into the kidneys (reflux nephropathy), Other kidney diseases. Chronic kidney disease leads to a buildup of fluid and waste products in the body. This condition affects most body systems and functions, including:High blood pressure, Low blood cell count, Vitamin D and bone health. "}, "Calcitonin blood test": {"description": "The calcitonin blood test measures the level of the hormone calcitonin in the blood."}, "Cosmetic breast surgery": {"description": "Breast augmentation is a procedure to change the size or shape of the breasts."}, "Caput succedaneum": {"description": "Caput succedaneum is swelling of the scalp in a newborn. It is most often brought on by pressure from the uterus or vaginal wall during a head-first (vertex) delivery.", "Possible Complications": "Complications may include a yellow color to the skin (jaundice). ", "Symptoms": ["Soft, puffy swelling on the scalp in a newborn infant", "Possible bruising or color change on the scalp swelling", "Swelling that may extend to both sides of the scalp", "Swelling that is most often seen on the portion of the head which presented first", "Increase in molding of the bones of the head "], "Exams and Tests": "The doctor will look at the swelling to confirm that it is a caput succedaneum. No other testing is needed.", "Treatment": "No treatment is needed. The problem usually goes away on its own within a few days.", "Causes": "A caput succedaneum is more likely to form during a\u00a0long or hard\u00a0delivery. It is more common after\u00a0the membranes have broken. This is because the amniotic sac is no longer providing a cushion for the baby's head. Vacuum extraction done during a difficult birth can also increase the chances of a caput succedaneum.A caput succedaneum\u00a0may be detected\u00a0by prenatal ultrasound even before labor or delivery begins. It has been found as early as 31 weeks of pregnancy. Very often, this is due to an early rupture of the membranes or too little amniotic fluid. It is less likely that a caput will form if the membranes stay intact."}, "Concussion": {"description": "A concussion can affect how the brain works for awhile. It may lead to a bad headache, changes in alertness, or loss of consciousness. ", "Symptoms": ["Acting somewhat confused, feeling unable to concentrate, or not thinking clearly", "Being drowsy, hard to wake up, or similar changes", "Headache", "Loss of consciousness for a fairly short period of time", "Memory loss (amnesia) of events before the injury or right after", "Nausea and vomiting", "Seeing flashing lights", "Feeling like you have \"lost time\"", "Changes in alertness and consciousness", "Confusion that does not go away", "Seizures", "Muscle weakness on one or both sides", "Pupils of the eyes that are not equal in size", "Unusual eye movements", "Repeated vomiting", "Walking or balance problems", "Unconsciousness for a longer period of time or that continues (coma) "], "Exams and Tests": "The doctor will perform a physical exam. The person's nervous system will be checked. There may be changes in the person's pupil size, thinking ability, coordination, and reflexes.Tests that may be done:EEG (brain wave test) may be needed if seizures continue, Head CT scan, MRI of the brain. ", "Causes": "A concussion can result from a fall, sports activities, or car accidents. A big movement of the brain (called jarring) in any direction can cause a person to lose alertness (become unconscious). How long the person stays unconscious may be a sign of how bad the concussion is.Concussions do not always lead to loss of consciousness. Most people never pass out. They may describe seeing all white, all black, or stars. A person can also have a concussion and not realize it.Watch this video about:Concussion", "Prevention": "Although no child is injury-proof, parents can take some simple steps to help keep their children from getting head injuries. Not all head injuries can be prevented. Increase safety for you and your child by following these steps:\u00a0Always use safety equipment during activities that could cause a head injury. These include seat belts, bicycle or motorcycle helmets, and hard hats., Learn and follow bicycle safety recommendations.. Do not drink and drive. Do not allow yourself to be driven by someone who may have been drinking alcohol or is otherwise impaired. ", "Treatment": "For a mild head injury, no treatment may be needed. But be aware that the symptoms of a head injury can show up later. Your health care providers will explain what to expect, how to manage any headaches, how to treat your other symptoms, when to return to sports, school, work, and other activities, and signs or symptoms to worry about.Children will need to be watched and make activity changes., Adults also need close observation and activity changes. . Both adults and children must follow the health care provider\u2019s instructions about when it will be possible to return to sports.You will likely need to stay in the hospital if:Emergency or more severe symptoms of head injury are present, Skull fracture, There is any bleeding under your skull or in the brain . "}, "Cholesteatoma": {"description": "Cholesteatoma is a type of skin cyst that is located in the middle ear and mastoid bone in the skull.", "Possible Complications": "Brain abscess, Deafness in one ear, Dizziness (vertigo), Erosion into the facial nerve (causing facial paralysis), Labyrinthitis, Meningitis, Persistent ear drainage, Spread of the cyst into the brain. ", "Symptoms": ["Dizziness", "Drainage from the ear", "Hearing loss in one ear"], "Exams and Tests": "An ear exam may show a pocket or opening (perforation) in the eardrum, often with drainage.\u00a0A deposit of old skin cells may be seen with a microscope or an otoscope --\u00a0a special instrument to view the ear. Sometimes a group of blood vessels may be seen in the ear.The following tests may be performed to rule out other causes of dizziness:CT scan, Electronystagmography. ", "Treatment": "Surgery is needed to remove the cyst.", "Prevention": "Prompt and thorough treatment of chronic ear infection may help prevent cholesteatoma.", "Causes": "Cholesteatoma can be a birth defect (congenital). It more commonly occurs as a complication of chronic ear infection.The eustachian tube helps equalize pressure in the middle ear. When it is not working well, negative pressure can build up and pull part of the eardrum (tympanic membrane) inward. This creates a pocket or cyst that fills with old skin cells and other waste material. The cyst may become infected or get bigger. This can cause the breakdown of some of the middle ear bones or other structures of the ear. This can affect hearing, balance, and possibly the function of the facial muscles."}, "Coccidioides precipitin": {"description": "Coccidioides precipitin is a blood test that looks for\u00a0infections due to a fungus called Coccidioides immitis, which causes the disease coccidioidomycosis."}, "Cataract removal": {"description": "Cataract removal is surgery to remove a clouded lens (cataract) from the eye. Cataracts are removed to help you see better. The procedure almost always includes placing an artificial lens (IOL) in the eye."}, "Creatine phosphokinase test": {"description": "Creatine phosphokinase (CPK) is an enzyme found mainly in the heart, brain, and skeletal muscle. This article discusses the test to measure the amount of CPK in the blood."}, "Circumcision": {"description": "Circumcision is the surgical removal of the foreskin of the penis."}, "Chest MRI": {"description": "A chest MRI (magnetic resonance imaging) scan is an imaging test that uses powerful magnetic fields and radio waves to create pictures of the chest (thoracic area). It does not use radiation (x-rays)."}, "C-section": {"description": "A C-section is the delivery of a baby through a surgical opening in the mother's lower belly area. It is also called a cesarean delivery."}, "Cocaine withdrawal": {"description": "Cocaine withdrawal occurs when a heavy cocaine user cuts down or quits taking the drug. Complete abstinence and a serum drug level of zero are not required.\r\n", "Possible Complications": "Depression, Craving and overdose, Suicide. Because many users will abuse more than one drug, other withdrawal syndromes, such as alcohol withdrawal, need to be ruled out.", "Symptoms": ["Agitation and restless behavior", "Depressed mood", "Fatigue", "Generalized malaise", "Increased appetite", "Vivid and unpleasant dreams", "Slowing of activity"], "Exams and Tests": "A physical examination and history of cocaine use are sufficient to diagnose this condition.A toxicology (poison) screen may be performed to see if other drugs may have been taken.Other routine\u00a0tests may include:Blood chemistries and liver function tests such as CHEM-20, Cardiac enzymes (look for evidence of heart damage or heart attack), CBC (complete blood count, measures red and white blood cells, and platelets, which help blood to clot), EKG (heart tracing), Chest x-ray, Urinalysis. ", "Treatment": "The withdrawal from cocaine may not be as unstable as withdrawal from alcohol. However, the withdrawal from any chronic substance abuse is very serious. There is a risk of suicide or overdose.Symptoms usually disappear over time. People who have cocaine withdrawal will often use alcohol, sedatives, hypnotics, or anti-anxiety medications such as diazepam (Valium) or lorazepam (Ativan)to treat their symptoms. Use of these drugs is not recommended because it simply shifts addiction from one substance to another.At least half of all people addicted to cocaine also have a mental disorder (particularly depression and attention-deficit disorder). These conditions should be suspected and treated. When diagnosed and treated, relapse rates are dramatically reduced. All prescription drug use should be monitored carefully in patients who abuse substances.", "Prevention": "Avoid cocaine use. If you have previously used cocaine and wish to stop, try to avoid people, places, and things you associate with the drug. If you find yourself considering the euphoria produced by cocaine, force yourself to think of the negative consequences that follow its use. Group participation is helpful for many people.", "Causes": "Cocaine produces a sense of extreme joy by causing the brain to release higher than normal amounts of some biochemicals. However, cocaine's effects on other parts of the body can be very serious or even deadly.When cocaine use is stopped or when a binge ends, a crash follows almost immediately. This crash is accompanied by a strong craving for more cocaine. Additional symptoms include fatigue, lack of pleasure, anxiety, irritability, sleepiness, and sometimes agitation or extreme suspicion or paranoia.Cocaine withdrawal often has no visible physical symptoms like the vomiting and shaking that accompanies the withdrawal from heroin or alcohol.In the past, people underestimated the how addictive cocaine can be. However, cocaine is addictive when addiction is defined as a desire for more of the drug, despite negative consequences.The level of craving, irritability, delayed depression, and other symptoms produced by cocaine withdrawal rivals or exceeds that felt with other withdrawal syndromes.See also:Drug abuse, Drug abuse and dependence, Stroke secondary to cocaine. "}, "Culture - duodenal tissue": {"description": "A duodenal tissue culture is a laboratory exam to check a piece of tissue from the first part of the small intestine (duodenum). The test is to look for organisms that cause infection."}, "Crohn's disease": {"description": "Ulcerative colitis is a related condition.", "Possible Complications": "You have a higher risk for small bowel and colon cancer if you have Crohn's disease. At some point, your doctor may recommend tests to screen for colon cancer. Those with more severe Crohn's disease may have these problems: Abscess or infection in the intestines , Anemia, a lack of red blood cells , Bowel blockage , Fistulas in the bladder, skin, or vagina , Slow growth and sexual development in children , Swelling of the joints , Lack of important nutrients, such as vitamin B12 and iron , Problems with maintaining a healthy weight . ", "Symptoms": ["Crampy pain in the abdomen (belly area)", "Fever", "Fatigue", "Loss of appetite ", "Feeling that you need to pass stools, even though your bowels are already empty. It may involve straining, pain, and cramping. ", "Watery diarrhea, which may be bloody ", "Weight loss ", "Constipation ", "Sores or swelling in the eyes ", "Draining of pus, mucus, or stools from around the rectum or anus (caused by something called a fistula) ", "Joint pain and swelling ", "Mouth ulcers ", "Rectal bleeding and bloody stools ", "Swollen gums", "Tender, red bumps (nodules) under the skin which may turn into skin ulcers"], "Exams and Tests": "A physical exam may show a mass or tenderness in the abdomen, skin rash, swollen joints, or mouth ulcers. Tests to diagnose Crohn's disease include: Barium enema or upper GI series , Colonoscopy or sigmoidoscopy , CT scan of the abdomen , Capsule endoscopy , MRI of the abdomen , Enteroscopy . A stool culture may be done to rule out other possible causes of the symptoms. This disease may also alter the results of the following tests: Low albumin levels , High sed rate , Fecal fat, Low blood count (hemoglobin and hematocrit) , Abnormal liver blood tests , High white blood cell count . ", "Treatment": "DIET AND NUTRITION You should eat a well-balanced, healthy diet. Include enough calories, protein, and nutrients from a variety of food groups. No specific diet has been shown to make Crohn's symptoms better or worse. Types of food problems may vary from person to person. Some foods can make diarrhea and gas worse. To help ease symptoms, try: Eating small amounts of food throughout the day., Drinking lots of water (drink small amounts often throughout the day)., Avoiding high-fiber foods (bran, beans, nuts, seeds, and popcorn)., Avoiding fatty, greasy or fried foods and sauces (butter, margarine, and heavy cream)., Limiting dairy products if you have problems digesting dairy fats. Try low-lactose cheeses, such as Swiss and cheddar, and an enzyme product, such as Lactaid, to help break down lactose., Avoiding foods that you know cause gas, such as beans. . Ask your doctor about extra vitamins and minerals you may need, such as: Iron supplements (if you are anemic), Calcium and vitamin D supplements to help keep your bones strong, Vitamin B12 to prevent anemia . STRESS You may feel worried, embarrassed, or even sad and depressed about having a bowel disease. Other stressful events in your life, such as moving, a job loss, or the loss of a loved one can worsen digestive problems. Ask your doctor or nurse for tips on how to manage your stress.MEDICINES You can take medication to treat very bad diarrhea. Loperamide (Imodium) can be bought without a prescription. Always talk to your doctor or nurse before using these drugs. Other medicines to help with symptoms include: Fiber supplements may help your symptoms. You can buy psyllium powder (Metamucil) or methylcellulose (Citrucel). Ask your doctor before taking these products or laxatives., Acetaminophen (Tylenol) for mild pain. Avoid drugs such as aspirin, ibuprofen (Advil, Motrin), or naproxen (Aleve, Naprosyn) which can make your symptoms worse. . Your doctor may also prescribe medicines to help control Crohn's disease: Aminosalicylates (5-ASAs) - medicines that help control mild to moderate symptoms. Some forms of the drug are taken by mouth; others must be given rectally., Corticosteroids, such as prednisone - treat moderate to severe Crohn's disease. They may be taken by mouth or inserted into the rectum., Medicines that quiet the immune system's reaction., Antibiotics - treat abscesses or fistulas., Biologic therapy- used for severe Crohn's disease that does not respond to any other types of medication. . SURGERYSome people with Crohn's disease may need surgery to remove a damaged or diseased part of the intestine. In some cases, the entire large intestine is removed, with or without the rectum. People who have Crohn's disease that does not respond to medications may need surgery to treat problems such as: Bleeding , Failure to grow (in children) , Fistulas (abnormal connections between the intestines and another area of the body) , Infections , Narrowing of the intestine . Surgeries that may be done include: Ileostomy , Removal of part of the large bowel or small bowel (link to surgery) , Removal of the large intestine to the rectum. , Removal of the large intestine and most of rectum . ", "Causes": "The exact cause of Crohn's disease is unknown. It occurs when your body's immune system mistakenly attacks and destroys healthy body tissue (autoimmune disorder).When parts of the digestive tract remain swollen or inflamed, \u00a0the walls of the intestines become thickened.Factors that may play a role in Crohn's disease include:Your genes and family history (People of Jewish descent are at higher risk.), Environmental factors, Tendency of your body to over-react to normal bacteria in the intestines, Smoking . Crohn's disease may occur at any age. It most often occurs in people between ages 15 - 35."}, "Complement component 4": {"description": "There are nine major complement proteins. They are labeled C1 through C9. This test measures C4."}, "Carpal tunnel syndrome": {"description": "The area in your wrist where this nerve enters the hand is called the carpal tunnel. This tunnel is normally narrow. Any swelling can pinch the nerve and cause pain, numbness, tingling, or weakness. This is called carpal tunnel syndrome.", "Symptoms": ["Clumsiness of the hand when gripping objects", "Numbness or tingling in the thumb and next two or three fingers of one or both hands", "Numbness or tingling of the palm of the hand", "Pain that extends to the elbow", "Pain in the wrist or hand in one or both hands", "Problems with fine finger movements (coordination) in one or both hands", "Wasting away of the muscle under the thumb (in advanced or long-term cases)", "Weak grip or difficulty carrying bags (a common complaint)", "Weakness in one or both hands "], "Exams and Tests": "During a physical exam, your health care provider may find:Numbness in the palm, thumb, index finger, middle finger, and\u00a0thumb side of your ring finger, Weak hand grip, Tapping over the median nerve at your wrist may cause pain to shoot from your wrist to your hand (this is called the Tinel sign), Bending your wrist forward all the way for 60 seconds will usually result in numbness, tingling, or weakness (this is called the Phalen test) . Tests that may be ordered include:Wrist x-rays to rule out other problems, such as arthritis in your wrist, Electromyography (EMG, a test to check muscles and the nerves that control them), Nerve conduction velocity (a test to see how fast electrical signals move through a nerve) . ", "Causes": "Some people who develop carpal tunnel syndrome were born with a small carpal tunnel.Carpal tunnel syndrome can also be caused by making the same hand and wrist motion over and over. Using hand tools that vibrate may also lead to carpal tunnel. Studies have not proved that carpal tunnel is caused by typing on a computer, using a mouse, or repeating movements while working, playing a musical instrument, or playing sports. But, these activities may cause pain and swelling of the tendons or bursa.Carpal tunnel syndrome occurs most often in people ages 30 to 60. It is more common in women than men.Other factors that may lead to carpal tunnel syndrome include:Alcohol abuse, Bone fractures and arthritis of the wrist, Cyst or tumor that grows in the wrist, Infections, Obesity, Extra fluids\u00a0that build\u00a0up in the body during pregnancy or menopause (in women), Rheumatoid arthritis. ", "Prevention": "Use tools and equipment that are properly designed to reduce the risk of wrist injury.Ergonomic aids, such as split keyboards, keyboard trays, typing pads, and wrist braces, may be used to improve wrist posture during typing. Take frequent breaks when typing and always stop if you feel tingling or pain.", "Treatment": "Your health care provider may suggest the following:Wearing a splint at night for several weeks. If this does not help, you may need to wear the splint during the day, as well., Avoid sleeping on your wrists., Placing warm and cold compresses on the affected area. . Changes you can make in your workplace to reduce the stress on your wrist include:Using special devices, such as keyboards, different types of computer mouse, cushioned mouse pads, and keyboard drawers, Having someone review the position you are in when performing your work activities. For example, make sure the keyboard is low enough so that your wrists are not bent upward while typing. Your health care provider may suggest an occupational therapist., You may also need to make changes in your work duties or home and sports activities. Some of the jobs linked with carpal tunnel syndrome include those that involve vibrating tools. . MEDICATIONSMedications used in the treatment of carpal tunnel syndrome include nonsteroidal anti-inflammatory drugs (NSAIDs), such as ibuprofen or naproxen. Corticosteroid injections given into the carpal tunnel area may relieve symptoms for a period of time.SURGERYCarpal tunnel release is a surgical procedure that cuts into the ligament that is pressing on the nerve. Surgery is successful most of the time, but it depends on how long the nerve compression has been occurring and how severe it is."}, "Colds and the flu - what to ask your doctor - adult": {"description": "Below are some questions you may want to ask your doctor or nurse to help you take care of your cold or flu. "}, "Compression stockings": {"description": "Wearing stockings helps with:"}, "Chest radiation - discharge": {"description": "For weeks to months after radiation treatment, you may notice shortness of breath. You are more likely to notice this when you are active. Contact your doctor if you develop this symptom."}, "Choking - unconscious adult or child over 1 year": {"Symptoms": ["Bluish color to the lips and nails", "Inability to breathe"], "Prevention": "To prevent choking:Eat slowly and chew food completely., Do not drink too much alcohol before or during eating., Keep small objects away from young children., Make sure dentures fit properly.. ", "description": "This article discusses choking in adults or children over age 1 who have lost alertness (are unconscious).", "Causes": "Choking may be caused by:Eating too fast, not chewing food well, or eating with dentures that do not fit well, Drinking alcohol (even a small amount of alcohol affects awareness), Being unconscious and breathing in vomit , Breathing in or swallowing small objects (young children), Injury to the head and face (for example, swelling, bleeding, or a deformity can cause choking), Swallowing problems caused by a stroke or other brain disorders, Enlarging tonsils or tumors of the neck and throat, Problems with the esophagus (food pipe or swallowing tube). "}, "Cystic fibrosis - resources": {"description": "The following organizations are good resources for information on cystic fibrosis:"}, "Central sleep apnea": {"description": "Central sleep apnea is a sleep disorder in which breathing stops over and over during sleep.\r\n", "Possible Complications": "Complications may result from the underlying disease causing the central sleep apnea.", "Symptoms": ["Chronic fatigue", "Daytime sleepiness", "Morning headaches", "Restless sleep", "Swallowing problems", "Voice changes", "Weakness or numbness throughout the body"], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider will perform a physical exam. Tests will be done to diagnose an underlying medical condition. A sleep study (polysomnography) can confirm sleep apnea.Other tests that may be done include:Echocardiogram, Lung function, MRI of the spine or neck. ", "Treatment": "Treating the condition that is causing central sleep apnea can help manage symptoms. For example, if central sleep apnea is due to heart failure, the goal is to treat the heart failure itself.Devices used during sleep to aid breathing may be recommended. These include nasal continuous positive airway pressure (CPAP), bilevel positive airway pressure (BiPAP) or adaptive servo-ventilation (ASV). Some types of central sleep apnea are treated with medicines that stimulate breathing.Oxygen treatment may help ensure the lungs get enough oxygen while sleeping.If narcotic medicine is causing the apnea, the dosage may need to be lowered or the medicine changed.", "Causes": "Central sleep apnea results when the brain temporarily stops sending signals to the muscles that control breathing. The condition often occurs in people who have certain medical problems. For example, it can develop in\u00a0someone who has\u00a0a problem with the brainstem, which controls breathing.Conditions that can cause or lead to central sleep apnea include:Problems that affect the brainstem (the brainstem controls breathing) including brain infection, stroke, or conditions of the cervical spine (neck), Parkinson disease, Obesity, Certain medicines,\u00a0such as narcotic painkillers, Heart failure. If the apnea is not associated with another disease, it is called idiopathic central sleep apnea.A condition called Cheyne-Stokes respiration can mimic central sleep apnea. This involves breathing to a variable depth, usually while sleeping.Central sleep apnea is not the same as obstructive sleep apnea. With obstructive sleep apnea, breathing stops and starts because the airway is narrowed or blocked. But a person can have both conditions, such as with a medical problem called obesity hypoventilation syndrome. "}, "Cologne poisoning": {"Symptoms": ["Abdominal pain", "Anxiety", "Decreased level of consciousness, including coma (lack of responsiveness)", "Diarrhea, nausea, and vomiting (may be bloody)", "Dizziness", "Headache", "Inability to walk in a normal manner", "Low body temperature, low blood sugar, and low blood pressure", "Too little or too much urine output", "Rapid heart rate", "Seizures (convulsions)", "Slowed breathing", "Slurred speech", "Stupor", "Swaying from side to side", "Throat pain", "Uncoordinated movement ", "Confusion", "Irritability", "Nausea", "Sleepiness", "Weakness "], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Cortisol urine test": {"description": "Cortisol can also be measured using a blood test."}, "CPR": {"description": "See also:"}, "CPR - infant": {"Symptoms": ["No breathing", "No pulse", "Unconsciousness"], "Prevention": "Most children need CPR because of a preventable accident. The following tips may help prevent some accidents in children:Never underestimate what an infant can do. Assume the baby can move more than you think., Never leave an infant unattended on a bed, table, or other surface from which the infant could roll off., Always use safety straps on high chairs and strollers. Never leave an infant in a mesh playpen with one side down. Follow the guidelines for using infant car seats., Teach your baby the meaning of \"don't touch.\" The earliest safety lesson is \"No!\", Choose age-appropriate toys. Do not give infants toys that are heavy or fragile. Inspect toys for small or loose parts, sharp edges, points, loose batteries, and other hazards., Create a safe environment. Watch children carefully, particularly around water and near furniture., Keep toxic chemicals and cleaning solutions safely stored in childproof cabinets., To reduce the risk of choking accidents, make sure infants and small children cannot reach buttons, watch batteries, popcorn, coins, grapes, or nuts., Sit with an infant while he or she eats. Do not allow an infant to crawl around while eating or drinking from a bottle., Never tie pacifiers, jewelry, chains, bracelets, or anything else around an infant's neck or wrists.. ", "description": "This article discusses CPR done on an infant.", "Causes": "There are many things that cause an infant's heartbeat and breathing to stop. Some reasons you may need to do CPR on an infant include:Choking, Drowning, Electrical shock, Excessive bleeding, Head trauma or serious injury, Lung disease, Poisoning, Suffocation. "}, "Chylomicronemia syndrome": {"description": "Chylomicronemia syndrome is a disorder in which the body does not break down fats (lipids) correctly. This causes fat particles called chylomicrons to build up in the blood. The disorder is passed down through families. ", "Possible Complications": "When untreated, the excess chylomicrons may lead to bouts of pancreatitis. This condition can be very painful and even life threatening. There seems to be no increased risk for atherosclerotic heart disease.", "Symptoms": ["Abdominal pain due to pancreatitis (inflammation of the pancreas)", "Symptoms of nerve damage such as loss of feeling in the feet or legs, and memory loss", "Yellow deposits of fatty material in the skin called xanthomas. These growths may appear on the back, buttocks, soles of the feet, or knees and elbows."], "Exams and Tests": "A physical exam and tests may show:Enlarged liver and spleen, Inflammation of the pancreas, Fatty deposits under the skin, Possibly fatty deposits in the retina of the eye . A creamy layer will appear when blood spins in a laboratory machine. This layer\u00a0is due to chylomicrons in the blood.The triglyceride level is extremely high.", "Treatment": "A fat-free, alcohol-free diet is required. You may need to stop taking certain medicines that can make symptoms worse. Do not stop taking any medicine without first talking to your doctor. Conditions that can make symptoms worse, such as diabetes, should be treated and controlled. ", "Prevention": "There is no way to prevent\u00a0someone from inheriting this\u00a0syndrome.", "Causes": "Chylomicronemia syndrome can occur due to a rare genetic disorder in which a protein (enzyme) called lipoprotein lipase (LpL) is broken or missing. LpL is normally found in fat and muscle. It helps break down certain lipids. When LpL is missing or broken, fat particles called chylomicrons build up in the blood. This buildup is called chylomicronemia."}, "Cytochrome b5 reductase": {"description": "Persons who do not have enough of this enzyme may develop a condition called methemoglobinemia."}, "Cerebral hypoxia": {"description": "Cerebral hypoxia refers to the largest parts of the brain, called the cerebral hemispheres. However, the term is often used to refer to a lack of oxygen supply to the entire brain.", "Possible Complications": "Complications of cerebral hypoxia include a prolonged vegetative state. This means the person may have basic life functions, such as breathing, blood pressure, sleep-wake cycle, and eye opening, but the person is not alert and does not respond to their surroundings. Such people usually die within a year, although some may survive longer.Length of survival depends partly on how much care is taken to prevent other problems. Major complications may include:Bed sores, Clots in the veins (deep vein thrombosis), Lung infections (pneumonia), Malnutrition. ", "Symptoms": ["Change in attention (inattentiveness)", "Poor judgment", "Uncoordinated movement ", "Complete unawareness and unresponsiveness (coma)", "No breathing", "No response of the pupils of the eye to light "], "Exams and Tests": "Cerebral hypoxia can usually be diagnosed based on the person's medical history and a physical exam. Tests are done to determine the cause of the hypoxia, and may include:Angiogram of the brain, Blood tests, including arterial blood gases and blood chemical levels, CT scan of the head, Echocardiogram, Electrocardiogram (ECG), a measurement of the heart's electrical activity, Electroencephalogram (EEG), a test of brain waves that can identify seizures and show how well brain cells work, Evoked potentials, a test that determines whether certain sensations, such as vision and touch, reach the brain, Magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) of the head . If only blood pressure and heart function remain, the brain may be completely dead.", "Treatment": "Cerebral hypoxia is an emergency condition that needs to be treated right away. The sooner the oxygen supply is restored to the brain, the lower the risk of severe brain damage and death.Treatment depends on the cause of the hypoxia. Basic life support is most important. Treatment involves:Breathing assistance (mechanical ventilation) and oxygen, Controlling the heart rate and rhythm, Fluids, blood products, or medicines to raise blood pressure if it is low, Medicines including phenytoin, phenobarbital, valproic acid, or general anesthetics to calm seizures . Sometimes a person with cerebral hypoxia is cooled to slow down the activity of the brain cells and decrease their need for oxygen. However, the benefit of this treatment has not been firmly established.", "Prevention": "Prevention depends on the specific cause of hypoxia. Unfortunately, hypoxia is usually unexpected. This makes the condition somewhat difficult to prevent.Cardiopulmonary resuscitation (CPR) can be lifesaving, especially when it is started right away.", "Causes": "In cerebral hypoxia, sometimes only the oxygen supply is interrupted. This can be caused by:Breathing in smoke (smoke inhalation), such as during a fire, Carbon monoxide poisoning, Choking, Diseases that prevent movement (paralysis) of the breathing muscles, such as amyotrophic lateral sclerosis (ALS), High altitudes, Pressure on (compression) the windpipe (trachea), Strangulation . In other cases, both oxygen and nutrient supply are stopped, caused by:Cardiac arrest (when the heart stops pumping), Cardiac arrhythmia, Complications of general anesthesia, Drowning, Drug overdose, Injuries to a newborn that occurred before, during, or soon after birth (See: Cerebral palsy), Stroke, Very low blood pressure. Brain cells are extremely sensitive to a lack of oxygen. Some brain cells start dying less than 5 minutes after their oxygen supply disappears. As a result, brain hypoxia can rapidly cause severe brain damage or death."}, "Carbon monoxide poisoning": {"Symptoms": ["Breathing problems, including no breathing, shortness of breath, or rapid breathing", "Chest pain (may occur suddenly in people with angina)", "Coma", "Confusion", "Convulsions", "Dizziness", "Drowsiness", "Fainting", "Headache", "Hyperactivity", "Impaired judgment", "Irritability", "Low blood pressure", "Muscle weakness", "Rapid or abnormal heart beat", "Shock", "Nausea and vomiting", "Unconsciousness"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or a local poison control center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Central pontine myelinolysis": {"description": "Central pontine myelinolysis is brain cell dysfunction caused by the destruction of the layer (myelin sheath) covering nerve cells in the\u00a0middle of the brainstem (pons).", "Possible Complications": "Decreased ability to interact with others, Decreased ability to work or care for self, Inability to move, other than to blink eyes (\"locked in\" syndrome), Permanent nervous system damage. ", "Symptoms": ["Confusion, delirium", "Balance problems", " \r\n Difficulty swallowing \r\n ", "Hallucinations", "Reduced alertness, drowsiness or sleepiness, lethargy, poor responses", "Speech changes, poor enunciation", "Tremor", "Weakness in the face, arms, or legs, usually affecting both sides of the body"], "Exams and Tests": "An examination may show:Abnormal reflexes, Confusion, Involvement of all four arms and legs (spastic quadriplegia), Weakness of the face, arms, and legs (upper motor neuron syndromes). A head MRI scan may reveal a problem in the brainstem (pons). This is the main diagnostic test.Other tests may include:Blood sodium levels and other blood tests, Brainstem auditory evoked response (BAER). ", "Treatment": "This is an emergency disorder. You will need to go to a hospital for diagnosis and treatment. However, most people with this condition are already in the hospital for another condition.There is no known cure for central pontine myelinolysis. Treatment is focused on relieving symptoms.Physical therapy may help maintain muscle strength, mobility, and function in weakened arms and legs.", "Prevention": "Gradual, controlled treatment of low sodium levels may reduce the risk of nerve damage in the pons. Being aware of how some medications can change sodium levels can prevent these levels from changing too quickly.", "Causes": "The destruction of the myelin sheath that covers nerve cells prevents signals from being properly transmitted from one nerve to another. The most common cause of central pontine myelinolysis is a quick change in the body's sodium levels. This most often occurs when someone is being treated for low blood levels of sodium (hyponatremia) and the sodium is replaced too fast. It also can occasionally occur when high levels of sodium in the body (hypernatremia) are corrected too quickly.This condition does not usually occur on its own. It is typically a complication of treatment for other conditions, or from the other conditions themselves.Risks include:Alcoholism, Liver disease, Malnutrition from serious illnesses. "}, "Cuts and puncture wounds": {"Symptoms": ["Bleeding", "Problems with function or feeling below the wound site", "Pain", "Bites", "Punctures", "Crushing injuries", "Dirty wounds", "Wounds on the feet", "Wounds that are not promptly treated"], "description": "A puncture is a wound made by a pointed object such as a nail, knife, or sharp tooth. ", "Prevention": "Keep knives, scissors, firearms, and fragile items out of the reach of children. When children are old enough, teach them to how to use knives and scissors safely.Make sure you and your child are up to date on vaccinations. A tetanus vaccine is generally recommended every 10 years."}, "Carbolic acid poisoning": {"Symptoms": ["Blue- or green-colored urine", "Decreased urine output", "No urine output ", "Severe burns in the mouth and windpipe (esophagus)", "Yellow eyes ", "Abdominal pain - severe", "Bloody stools", "Diarrhea", "Nausea", "Stomach pain", "Vomiting - possibly bloody ", "Low blood pressure", "Rapid heart rate ", "Deep, rapid breathing", "Wheezing ", "Coma (decreased level of consciousness and lack of responsiveness)", "Convulsions", "Hyperactivity", "Lack of alertness (stupor)", "Seizures ", "Blue lips and fingernails", "Burns", "Yellow skin ", "Excessive thirst", "Heavy sweating"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Chlordiazepoxide overdose": {"Symptoms": ["Difficult breathing", "Shallow breathing", "Difficulty urinating", "Double vision or blurred vision", "Rapid side-to-side movement of the eyes", "Irregular heartbeat", "Low blood pressure", "Rapid heartbeat", "Coma", "Confusion", "Depression", "Dizziness", "Drowsiness", "Low body temperature", "Memory loss", "Seizures", "Stupor", "Tremor", "Uncoordinated movement", "Weakness", "Bluish-colored lips and fingernails", "Rash", "Yellow skin", "Abdominal pain", "Nausea"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222.", "Prevention": "Keep all medications in child-proof bottles and out of the reach of children."}}